1
THE SPY;
A TALE OF
THE NEUTRAL GROUND.
CHAPTER I.
And though amidst the calm of thought entire,
Some high and haughty features might betray
A soul impetuous once'twas earthly fire
That fled composure's intellectual ray,
As Etna's fires grow dim before the rising day.
Gertrude of Wyoming
.
It
was near the close of the year 1780, that a
solitary
traveller was seen pursuing his way through
one of the numerous little valleys of West-Chester.
The easterly wind, with its chilling dampness,
and increasing violence, gave unerring notice of
the approach of a storm, which, as usual, might
be expected to continue for several days: and the
experienced eye of the traveller was turned, in
vain, through the darkness of the evening, in quest
of some convenient shelter, in which, for the term
of his confinement by the rain, that already
began
to mix with the atmosphere in a thick mist,
he might obtain such accommodations as his age
and purposes required. Nothing, however,
offered
,
but the small and inconvenient tenements
of the lower order of inhabitants, with whom, in
that immediate neighbourhood, he did not think it
either safe or politic to trust himself.
The county of West-Chester, after the British
had obtained possession of the island of
New-York
,
became common ground, in which both
parties continued to act for the remainder of the
war of the revolution. A large proportion of its
inhabitants, either restrained by their attachments,
or influenced by their fears, affected a neutrality
they did not always feel. The lower towns were,
of course, more particularly under the dominion
of the crown, while the upper, finding a security
from the vicinity of the continental troops, were bold
in asserting their revolutionary opinions, and their
right to govern themselves. Great numbers,
however
,
wore masks, which even to this day have not
been thrown aside; and many an individual has
gone down to the tomb, stigmatized as a foe to the
rights of his countrymen, while, in secret, he has
been the useful agent of the leaders of the
revolution
;
and, on the other hand, could the hidden
repositories
of divers flaming patriots have been
opened to the light of day, royal protections would
have been discovered, concealed under piles of
British gold.
At the sound of the tread of the noble horse
ridden by the traveller, the mistress of the farm
house he was passing at the time, might be seen
cautiously opening the door of the building to
examine
the stranger; and, perhaps, with an averted
face, communicating the result of her observations
to her husband, who, in the rear of the building,
was prepared to seek, if necessary, his ordinary
place of concealment in the adjacent woods. The
valley was situated about mid-way in the length of
the county, and was sufficiently near to either
army
to make the restitution of stolen goods no
uncommon
occurrence in that vicinity. It is true, the
same articles were not always regained, but a
summary
substitute was generally resorted to, in the
absence of legal justice, which restored to the
loser the amount of his loss, with no
inconsiderable
addition for the temporary use of his property.
The passage of a stranger, with an appearance
of somewhat doubtful character, and mounted on
an animal, which, although unfurnished with any
of the ordinary trappings of war, partook largely
of the bold and upright carriage that distinguished
his rider, gave rise to many surmises among the
gazing inmates of the different habitations; and, in
some instances, where conscience was more than
ordinarily awake, to no little alarm.
Tired with the exercise of a day of unusual
fatigue
,
and anxious to obtain a speedy shelter from
the increasing violence of the storm, that now
began
to change its character to large drops of
driving
rain, the traveller determined, as a matter of
necessity, to make an application for admission to
the next dwelling that offered. An opportunity
was not long wanting; and, riding through a pair of
neglected bars, he knocked loudly at the outer door
of a building, of very humble exterior, without
quitting his saddle. A female of middle age,
with an outward bearing but little more
prepossessing
than her dwelling, appeared to answer to his
summons. The startled woman half closed her
door again, in affright, as she saw, by the glare of a
large wood fire, a mounted man so unexpectedly
near its threshold; and an expression of terror,
mingled with her natural curiosity, as she required
his pleasure.
Although the door was too nearly closed to
admit
of a minute scrutiny of the accommodations
within, sufficient had been seen to cause the
horse-man
to endeavour, once more, to penetrate the
gloom, with longing eyes, in search of a more
promising
roof, before, with an ill-concealed
reluctance
,
he stated his necessities and wishes. His
request was listened to with evident unwillingness,
and while yet unfinished, was interrupted, in a
tone of reviving confidence, and an air of pert
volubility
,
as she replied, in a sharp key
I can't say I like to give lodgings to a stranger
in these ticklish times; I'm nothing but a forlorn
lone body; or, what's the same thing, there's
nobody
but the old gentleman at home; but a half
mile further up the road, is a house, where you
can get entertainment, and that all for nothing
I am sure 'twill be much convenienter to them,
and more agreeabler to me; because, as I said
before
,
Harvey is awayI wish he'd take advice, and
leave off wandering; he's well to do in the world by
this time; and he ought to leave off his unsteady
courses, and settle in life.But Harvey Birch will
have his own way, and die a vagabond after all.
The horseman did not wait to hear more than
the advice to pursue his course up the road;
but had slowly turned his horse towards the bars,
and was gathering the folds of an ample cloak
around him, preparatory to again facing the storm,
when something in the speech of the female
suddenly
arrested the movement.
Is this, then, the dwelling of Harvey Birch? he
inquired, in an apparently involuntary manner
checking himself, as he was about to utter more.
Why, one can hardly say it is his dwelling,
replied the other, drawing a breath somewhat
between
a sigh and a groan; he is never in it, or
so seldom, that I hardly remember his face, when
he does think it worth his while to show it to his
poor old father andme. But it matters little
to me, I'm sure, if he ever comes back again, or
notturn in the first gate on your left;no, I care
but little, for my part, whether Harvey ever shows
his face again or notno, not I;and she closed
the door abruptly on the horseman, who gladly
1*
extended his ride a half mile further, to obtain
lodgings, which promised both more comfort and
greater security.
Sufficient light yet remained to enable the
traveller
to distinguish the improvements which had
been made in the cultivation, and general
appearance
of the grounds around the building to which
he was now approaching. The house was of stone,
long, low, and with a small wing at either extremity.
A piazza, extending along the front, with neatly
turned pillars, together with the good order and
preservation of its fences and out buildings, gave
it an air altogether superior to the common farm
houses of the country. After leading his horse
behind
an angle of the wall, where he was in some
degree protected from the wind and rain, the
traveller
threw his valisse over his arm, and knocked
loudly at the entrance of the building for
admission
.
An aged black soon appeared; and, without
seeming to think it necessary, under the
circumstances
,
to consult his superiorsfirst taking one
prying look at the applicant, by the light of the
candle in his handhe acceded to the request for
accommodations. The traveller was shown into
an extremely neat parlour, where a fire had been
lighted, to cheer the dulness of an easterly storm,
and an October evening. After giving the valisse
into the keeping of his civil attendant, and politely
repeating his request to the old gentleman who
rose to receive him, and paying his compliments to
the three ladies who were seated at their needles,
the stranger commenced laying aside some of the
outer garments which he had worn in his ride.
On taking an extra handkerchief from his neck,
and removing a cloak of blue cloth, with a surtout
of the same material, he exhibited, to the scrutiny
of the party within, a tall and extremely graceful
person, of apparently fifty years of age; his
countenance
evinced a settled composure and dignity;
his nose was straight, and approaching to Grecian;
his eye, quiet, thoughtful, and rather melancholy;
the mouth and lower part of his face expressive of
decision and much character. His dress, being
suited
to the road, was simple and plain, but such as
was worn by the higher class of his countrymen; he
wore his own hair, dressed in a manner that gave
a military air to his appearance, and which was
rather
heightened by his erect and conspicuously
graceful carriage. His whole appearance was so
impressive and decidedly that of a gentleman, that
as he finished laying aside the garments, the ladies
rose from their seats, and, together with the
master
of the house, received anew, and returned, the
complimentary greetings which were again offered.
The host was by several years the senior of the
traveller, and by his manner, dress, and every thing
around him, showed he had seen much of life and
the best society. The ladies werea maiden of
forty, and two younger ones, who did not seem to
have reached half those years. The bloom of the
elder of these ladies had vanished, but her eyes,
and fine hair, gave an extremely agreeable
expression
to her countenance; and there was a softness
and affability in her deportment, that added a
charm many more juvenile faces do not possess.
The sistersfor such the resemblance between the
younger maidens denoted them to bewere in all
the pride of youth; and the roses, so eminently the
property of the West-Chester fair, glowed with
their richest colours on their cheeks, and lighted
their deep blue eyes with that lustre which gives
so much pleasure to the beholder, and indicates
so much innocence and happiness in themselves.
There was much of that feminine delicacy in the
appearance of the three, which, in a great degree,
distinguishes the sex in this country; and, like the
gentleman, their demeanor proved them to be
women
of the higher order of life.
After handing a glass of excellent Madeira to his
guest, Mr. Wharton resumed his seat by the fire,
with another in his own hand. For a moment he
paused, as if debating with his politeness, but, at
length, threw an inquiring glance on the
stranger
,
as he inquired, with a formal bow
To who's health am I to have the honor of
drinking?
The traveller had also seated himself, and sat,
unconsciously gazing on the fire, when Mr.
Wharton
spoke; turning his eyes slowly on his host, with
a look of close observation, he replied, bowing in
his turn, while a faint tinge gathered on his pale
features
Mr. Harper.
Mr. Harper, resumed the other, with the
formal
precision of the day, I have the honor to
drink your health, and hope you will sustain no
injury
from the rain to which you have been exposed.
Mr. Harper bowed in silence to the compliment,
and soon resumed the meditations from which he
appeared to have been interrupted.
The young ladies had again taken their seats
beside
the work-stand, while their aunt, Miss
Jeanette
Peyton, had withdrawn, to superintend the
preparations necessary to appease the hunger of
their unexpected visitor. A short silence
prevailed
,
during which Mr. Harper was apparently
enjoying
the change in his situation, when Mr.
Wharton
again broke it, by inquiring, in the same polite,
but formal manner, whether smoke was
disagreeable
to his companion; to which he received as
polite
a negative, and immediately resumed the pipe
he had laid aside at the entrance of the traveller.
There was an evident desire on the part of the
host to enter into conversation, but either from an
apprehension of treading on dangerous ground, or
an unwillingness to intrude upon the rather studied
taciturnity of his guest, he several times hesitated
before he could venture to make any further
remark
.
At length, a movement of Mr. Harper, as
he raised his eyes to the party in the room,
encouraged
him to proceed.
I find it very difficult, said Mr. Wharton,
cautiously avoiding, at first, such subjects as he
wished to introduce, to procure that quality of
tobacco for my evenings' amusement, to which I
have been accustomed.
I should think the shops in New-York might
furnish the best in the country, rejoined the other,
with his usual gravity.
Whyyes, returned the host, in rather a
hesitating manner, lifting his eyes to the face of
Harper, and lowering them quickly, under his
steady look, there must be plenty in town, but
the war has made any communications with the
city, however innocent in themselves, too
dangerous
to be risked for so trifling an article as
tobacco
.
The box from which Mr. Wharton had just taken
a supply for his pipe, was lying open, within a
few inches of the elbow of Harper, who took a
small quantity of the article, and applied it to his
tongue, in a manner perfectly natural, but one
that filled his companion with instant alarm.
Without
,
however, observing that the quality was of
the most approved kind, the traveller relieved his
host by relapsing again into his meditations. Mr.
Wharton now felt unwilling to lose the
advantage
he had gained, and, making an effort of more
than usual vigor, he continued
I wish, from the bottom of my heart, this
unnatural
struggle was over, that we might again
meet our friends and relatives in peace and love.
It is much to be desired, said Harper,
emphatically
,
again raising his eyes to the
countenance
of his host.
I hear of no movements of consequence since
the arrival of our new allies, said Mr. Wharton,
shaking the ashes from his pipe, and turning his
back to the other, under the pretence of
receiving
a coal from his youngest daughter.
None have reached the public yet, I believe,
replied the traveller, crossing his leg with steady
composure.
Is it thought any important steps are about to
be taken? continued Mr. Wharton, still
occupied
with his daughter, yet unconsciously
suspending
his employment, in expectation of a reply.
Is it intimated any are in agitation?
inquired
the other, evasively, and, in a slight degree,
adopting the affected indifference of Mr.
Wharton's
manner.
Oh! nothing in particular, said the host,
hastilybut it is natural to expect something,
you know, sir, from so powerful a force as the
one under Rochambeau.
Harper made an assenting inclination with his
head, but no other reply to this remark; while
Mr. Wharton resumed the subject, by saying
They appear more active in the SouthGates
and Cornwallis seem willing to bring the war to
an issue there.
The brow of Harper contracted; and a
deeper
shade of melancholy crossed his features
his eye kindled with a transient beam of fire,
that spoke a latent source of deep feeling. The
admiring gaze of the younger of the sisters had
barely time to read its expression, before it
passed
away, leaving in its room the acquired
composure
which marked the countenance of the
stranger
,
and that impressive dignity which so
conspicuously
denotes the empire of reason.
The elder sister made one or two movements
in her chair, before she ventured to say, in a
tone, which partook in no small measure, of
triumph
General Gates has been less fortunate with
the Earl, than with General Burgoyne.
But General Gates is an Englishman, Sarah,
cried the younger lady, with quickness; and then
coloring to the eyes at her own boldness, she
employed
herself in tumbling over the contents of
her work-basket, silently hoping her remark would
be unnoticed.
The traveller had turned his face from one sister
to the other, as they had spoken in succession,
and an almost imperceptible movement of the
muscles of his mouth betrayed a new emotion, as
he inquired of the younger sister, with much
courtesy of manner
May I venture to ask, what inference you
draw from that fact?
Frances blushed yet deeper at this direct appeal
to her opinions, upon a subject on which she had
incautiously spoken in the presence of a stranger;
but, finding an answer necessary, after some little
hesitation, and with a good deal of stammering in
her manner, replied
Onlyonlysirmy sister and myself
sometimes
differ in our opinions of the prowess of the
British. A smile of much meaning played on a
face of naturally infantile innocency of expression,
as she concluded, in a voice, that shared in the
covert
humour of the speaker.
On what particular points of prowess do you
differ? continued Harper, meeting her look of
animation with an open smile of almost paternal
softness.
Why, Sarah thinks the British are never
beaten
;
but I do not put so much faith in their
invincibility
.
The traveller listened to her with that pleased
indulgence, with which virtuous age loves to
contemplate
the ardour of youthful innocence; but
making no reply, he turned to the fire, and
continued
for some time gazing on its embers in
silence
.
Mr. Wharton had in vain endeavoured to
pierce the disguise of his guest's political feelings;
but, while there was nothing forbidding in his
countenance, there was nothing communicative
it was strikingly reserved; and the master of the
house rose, in profound ignorance of what, in
those days, was the most material point in the
character of his guestto lead the way into
another
room to the supper table. Mr. Harper
offered
his hand to Sarah Wharton, and they entered
the room together; while Frances followed,
greatly
at a loss to know whether she had not wounded
the feelings of her father's inmate.
The storm began to rage with great violence
without; and the dashing rain on the sides of the
building, awakened that silent sense of
enjoyment
,
which is excited by such sounds in a room
of quiet comfort and warmth, when a loud
summons
at the outer door again called the faithful
black to the portal. In a minute the servant
returned
,
and informed his master that another
traveller
,
overtaken by the storm, desired to be
admitted
to the house, for a shelter through the night.
At the first sounds of the impatient summons of
this new applicant, Mr. Wharton had risen from
his seat in evident uneasiness, and with eyes
glancing
,
with alternate quickness, from his guest to
the door of the room, seemed to be expecting
something to proceed from this second
interruption
,
which was connected with the stranger who
had occasioned the first. He scarcely had time
to bid the black, with a faint voice, to show this
second comer in, before the door was thrown
hastily
open, and the intruder himself entered the
apartment. He paused a moment, as the person
of Harper met his view, and then, in a more
formal
manner, repeated the request he had before
made through the servant. Mr. Wharton and his
family disliked the appearance of this new visitor
excessively; but the inclemency of the weather,
and the uncertainty of the consequences if he were
refused the desired lodgings, compelled the old
gentleman to give a reluctant acquiescence.
Some of the removed dishes were replaced by
the orders of Miss Peyton, and the weather-beaten
intruder invited to partake of the remains of the
repast from which the party had just risen.
Throwing
aside a rough great coat, he very composedly
took the offered chair, and gravely proceeded to
allay the cravings of an appetite, which appeared
by no means delicate. But at every mouthful
he would turn an unquiet eye on Harpur, who
studied his appearance with a closeness of
investigation
,
that was very embarrassing to its
subject
.
At length, pouring out a glass of wine, the
new comer nodded significantly to his examiner,
previously to swallowing the liquor, and said, with
something of bitterness in his manner
I drink to our better acquaintance, sir,I
believe
,
this is the first time we have met.The
quality of the wine seemed greatly to his fancy,
for, on replacing the glass upon the table, he gave
his lips a smack, that resounded through the room;
and, taking up the bottle, held it between himself
and the light for a moment, in silent
contemplation
of its clear and brilliant color.
I think, we have never met before, sir,
replied
Harper, with a slight smile on his features,
as he observed the movements of the other; but
appearing satisfied with his scrutiny, he turned to
2
Sarah Wharton, who sat next him, and remarked,
with much suavity
You doubtless find your present abode
solitary
,
after being accustomed to the gaieties of the
city.
Oh! excessively so, said Sarah hastily, I
do wish with my father, that this cruel war was at
an end, that we might return to our friends once
more.
And you, Miss Frances, do you long as
ardently
for peace as your sister?
On many accounts, I certainly do, returned
the maid, venturing to steal a timid glance at her
interrogator; and, meeting the same benevolent
expression of feeling as before, she continued, as
her own face lighted into one of its animated and
lovely smiles of intelligence, but, not at the
expence
of the rights of my countrymen.
Rights, repeated her sister, impatiently;
whose rights can be stronger than those of a
sovereign; and what duty is clearer, than to obey
those who have a natural right to command?
None, certainly, said Frances, laughing with
great pleasantry; and taking the hand of her sister
affectionately within both of her own, she added,
with a smile directed towards Harper
I gave you to understand, that my sister and
myself differed in our political opinionsbut we
have an impartial umpire in my father, who loves
his own countrymen, and loves the British, so
sides with neither.
Yes, said Mr. Wharton, in a little alarm,
eyeing first one guest, and then the other; I
have near friends in both armies; and I dread a
victory by either, as a source of misfortune to
myself
.
I take it, you have little reason to apprehend
much from the Yankees in that way, cried the
guest at the table, abruptly, as he coolly helped
himself to another glass, from the bottle he had
admired.
His majesty may have more experienced troops
than the continentals, answered the host,
fearfully
,
but the Americans have met with
distinguished
success.
Harper disregarded the observations of both;
and, rising, desired to be shown to his place of
rest. A small boy was directed to guide him to his
room; and, wishing a courteous good-night to the
whole party, the traveller withdrew. The knife
and fork fell from the hands of the unwelcome
intruder, as the door closed on the retreating
figure
of Harper;he rose slowly from his seat;
listening attentively, he approached the door of
the roomopened itseemed to attend to the
retreating footsteps of the otherand, amidst the
panic and astonishment of his companions, closed
it again. In an instant, the red wig, which
concealed
his black locksthe large patch, which
hid half his face from observationthe stoop,
which had made him appear fifty years of age,
disappeared.
My father!my dear fathercried the now
handsome young man; and you, my dearest
sisters
and aunthave I at last met you again.
Heaven bless youmy Henrymy son,
exclaimed
the astonished, but delighted, parent;
while both his sisters sunk on his shoulders,
dissolved
in tears.
The faithful old black, who had been reared
from infancy in the house of his present master,
and who, as if in mockery of his degraded state,
had been complimented with the name of Csar,
was the only other witness of this unexpected
discovery
of the son of Mr. Wharton. After
receiving
the extended hand of his young master, and
imprinting on it a kiss, and leaving on it a tear,
Csar withdrew. The body did not re-enter the
room; and the black himself, after some time,
returned
,
as the young British captain exclaimed
But, who is this Mr. Harper?is he likely to
betray me?
NononoMassa Harry, cried the
African
,
shaking his head confidently, I been to see
Massa Harper on his kneespray to Godno
gentleman
who pray to God, tell of good son, come
to see old fatherSkinner do thatno christian.
This poor opinion of the Skinners was not
confined
to Mr.Csar Thompson, as he called
himself
but
Csar Wharton, as he was styled, by the
little world to which he was known. The
convenience
,
and perhaps the necessities, of the leaders
of the American arms, in the neighbourhood of
New-York, had induced them to employ certain
subordinate agents, of extremely irregular habits,
in executing their lesser plans of annoying the
enemy
.
It was not a moment for fastidious inquiries
into abuses of any description; and oppression
and injustice were the natural consequences of
the possession of power, which was uncurbed by
the restraints of civil authority. In time, a
distinct
order of the community was formed, whose
sole occupation appears to have been relieving
their fellow citizens from any little excess of
temporal
prosperity, they might be thought to enjoy,
under the pretence of patriotism, and the love of
liberty.
Occasionally, the aid of military authority was
not wanting, in enforcing these salutary
distributions
of worldly goods; and a petty holder of a
commission, in the state militia, was to be seen
giving the sanction, of something like legality, to
acts of the most unlicensed robberyand, not
unfrequently
,
bloodshed.
On the part of the British, the stimulus of
loyalty
was by no means suffered to sleep, where so
fruitful a field offered, on which it might be
expended
.
But their freebooters were enrolled, and
their efforts more systematized. Long experience
had taught their leaders the efficacy of
concentrated
force; and, unless tradition does great
injustice
to their exploits, the result did no little credit
to their foresight. This corpswe presume, from
their known affection to that useful animalhad
received
the significant appellation of Cow-Boys.
Csar was, however, far too loyal to associate
men who held the commission of George III., with
the irregular warriors, whose excesses he had so
often witnessed, and from whose rapacity, neither
his poverty, nor his bondage, had suffered even
him to escape uninjured. The Cow-Boys,
therefore
,
did not receive their proper portion of the
severity of the black's remark, when he said, no
Christiannothing but a Skinner, could betray
a pious child, while honoring his father with a
visit
,
full of peril, and the danger of captivity.
2*
CHAPTER II.
The rose of England bloom'd on Gertrude's cheek
What though these shades had seen her birth, her sire
A Briton's Independence taught to seek
Far Western worlds; and there his household fire
The light of social love did long inspire,
And many a huleyon day he liv'd to see
Unbroken, but by one misfortune dire,
When fate had reft his mutual heartbut she
Was goneand Gertrude climb'd a widow'd father's knee.
Gertrude of Wyoming
.
The
father of Mr. Wharton was a native of
England; and of a family, whose parliamentary
interest
,
had enabled them to provide for a younger
son, in the colony of New-York. The young man,
like hundreds of others in his situation, had settled
permanently in the country. He married, and the
sole issue of his connexion had been sent, early in
life, to receive the benefits of the English schools.
After taking his degrees at one of the universities
of the mother country, the youth had been
suffered
to acquire a knowledge of life, with the
advantages
of European society. But the death of his
father recalled him, after passing two years in this
manner, to the possession of an honorable name,
and very ample estate.
It was much the fashion of that day, to place the
youth, of certain families, in the army or navy of
England, as the regular stepping-stones to
preferment
.
Most of the higher offices in the colonies,
were filled by men who had made arms their
profession
;
and it was no uncommon sight to see a
veteran warrior laying aside the sword, to assume
the ermine on the benches of the highest judicial
authority.
In conformity with this system, the senior Mr.
Wharton had intended his son for a soldier, but a
natural imbecility of character in his child, had
interfered with his wishes.
A twelvemonth had been spent by the young
man, in weighing the advantages of the different
description of troops, among which he was to serve,
when the death of his father occurred. The ease
of his situation, and the attentions lavished upon a
youth, in the actual enjoyment of one of the largest
estates in the colonies, interfered greatly with his
ambitious projects. Love decided the matterand
Mr. Wharton, in becoming a husband, ceased to
think of becoming a soldier. For many years he
continued happy in his family, and respected, by
his countrymen, as a man of integrity and
consequence
,
when all his enjoyments vanished, as it
were, at a blow. His only son, the youth
introduced
in the preceding chapter, had entered the
army, and had arrived in his native country but
a short time before the commencement of
hostilities
,
with the re-inforcements the ministry had
thought it prudent to throw into the disaffected
parts of North America. His daughters were just
growing into life, and their education required all
the advantages the city could afford. His wife had
been, for some years, in declining health, and had
barely time to fold her son to her bosom, and
rejoice
in the re-union of her family, before the
revolution
burst forth, in a continued blaze, from
Georgia to Maine. The shock was too much for
the feeble condition of the mother, who saw her
child called to the field, to combat against the
members
of her own family in the South; and she sunk
under the blow.
There was no part of the continent where the
manners of England, and its aristocratic notions of
blood and alliances, prevailed with more force,
than in a certain circle immediately around the
metropolis of New-York. The customs of the
early Dutch inhabitants had, indeed, blended, in
some measure, with the English manners; but still
the latter prevailed. This was increased by the
frequent inter-marriages of the officers of the
mother
country, with the wealthier and more
powerful
families of the vicinity, until, at the
commencement
of hostilities, their united influence had very
nearly thrown the colony into the scales, on the
side of the crown. A few, however, of the
leading
families espoused the cause of the people;
and a sufficient stand was made against the efforts
of the ministerial party, to organize, and, aided by
the army of the confederation, to maintain an
independent
and republican form of government.
The city of New-York, and the adjacent
territory
,
were alone exempted from the rule of the
new commonwealth; and the royal authority
extended
no further than its dignity could be
supported
by the presence of an army. In this
condition
of things, the loyalists, of consequence,
adopted such measures, as best accorded with their
different characters and situations. Many bore
arms in support of the ancient laws; and, by their
bravery and exertion, endeavoured to secure what
they deemed the rights of their prince, and their
own estates from confiscation. Others left the
country; seeking, in that place they emphatically
called home, an asylum, as they fondly hoped, for
a season only, against the confusion and dangers of
war. A third, and more wary portion, remained
in the place of their nativity, with a prudent
regard
to their ample possessions, and, perhaps,
influenced
by their attachments to the scenes of their
youth. Mr. Wharton was of this description.
After
making a provision against future contingencies,
by secretly transmitting the whole of his money
to the British funds, this gentleman determined to
continue in the theatre of strife, and to maintain
so strict a neutrality, as to insure the safety of his
large estate, whichever party succeeded. He was
apparently engrossed in the education of his
daughters
,
when a relation, high in office in the new
state, intimated, that a residence in what was now
a British camp, differed but little, in the eyes of
his countrymen, from a residence in the British
capital. Mr. Wharton soon saw this was an
unpardo
able offence in the existing state of things,
and instantly determined to remove the difficulty
by retiring to the country. He possessed a
convenient
residence in the county of West-Chester,
and having been for many years in the habit of
withdrawing thither, during the heats of the
summer
months, it was kept furnished, and ready for
his accommodation. His eldest daughter was
already
admitted into the society of women; but
Frances, the younger, required a year or two more
of the usual cultivation, to appear with proper
eclatat least so thought Miss Jeanette Peyton;
and as this lady, a younger sister of their deceased
mother, had left her paternal home, in the colony
of Virginia, with the devotedness and affection
peculiar
to her sex, to superintend the welfare of her
orphan nieces, Mr. Wharton felt her opinions were
entitled to profound respect. In conformity to her
advice, therefore, the feelings of the parent were
made to yield to the welfare of his children.
Mr. Wharton withdrew to the Locusts, with
a heart rent with the pain of separating from all
that was left to him of a wife he had adored, but
in obedience to a constitutional prudence that
pleadly loudly in behalf of his wordly goods. His
handsome town residence was inhabited, in the
meanwhile, by his daughters and their aunt. The
regiment to which Captain Wharton belonged,
formed part of the permanent garrison of the city,
and the knowledge of the presence of his son was
no little relief to the father, in his unceasing
meditations
on his absent daughters. But Captain
Wharton was a young man, and a soldier; his
estimate
of character was not always the wisest, and
his propensities led him to imagine, that a red coat
never concealed a dishonorable heart.
The house of Mr. Wharton became a fashionable
lounge to the officers of the royal army, in
common
with those, of every other family, thought
worthy of their notice. The consequences of this
association were, to some few of the visited,
fortunate
to
more, injurious, by exciting
expectations
which were never to be realized, and,
unhappily
,
to no small number ruinous. The known
wealth of the father, and, possibly, the presence of
a high-spirited brother, forbid any apprehension
of the latter danger to the young ladies; but it
was impossible for all the admiration, bestowed
on the fine figure and lovely face of Sarah
Wharton
,
to be thrown away. Her person was formed
with the early maturity of the climate, and a strict
cultivation of the graces had made her, decidedly,
the belle of the city. No one promised to dispute
with her this female sovereignty, unless it might
be her younger sister. Frances, however, wanted
some months to the charmed age of sixteen; and
the idea of competition was far from the minds of
either of the affectionate girls. Indeed, next to
the conversation of Colonel Wellmere, the
greatest
pleasure of Sarah was in contemplating the
budding beauties of the little Hebe, who played
around her with all the innocency of youth, with
all the enthusiasm of her ardent temper, and with
no little of the archness of her native humour
Whether it was, that Frances received none of the
compliments which fell to the lot of her elder
sister
,
in the often repeated discussions on the merits
of the war, between the military beaux who
frequented
the house; it is certain their effects on
the sisters were exactly opposite. It was much
the fashion, then, for the British officers to speak
slightingly of their enemies; and Sarah took all
the idle vapourings of her danglers to be truths.
The first political opinions which reached the ears
of Frances, were coupled with sneers on the
conduct
of her countrymen. At first she believed
them; but there was occasionally a general, who
was obliged to do justice to his enemy, in order to
obtain justice for himself, and Frances became
somewhat sceptical on the subject of her
countrymen's
inefficiency. Colonel Wellmere was among
those who delighted most in expending his wit on
the unfortunate Americans, and, in time, Frances
began to listen to his eloquence with great
suspicion
,
and some little resentment.
It was on a hot sultry day, the three were sitting
in the parlour of Mr. Wharton's house, the Coloned
and Sarah, seated on a sofa, engaged in one of
their combats of the eyes, aided by no little flow
of small talk, and Frances, occupied at her
tambouring
frame, in an opposite corner of the room,
when the gentleman suddenly exclaimed
How gay the arrival of the army under
General
Burgoyne will make the city, Miss
Wharton
.
Oh! how pleasant it must be, said the
thoughtless
Sarah, in reply; I am told there are many
charming women with that army; as you say, it
will make us all life and gaiety.
Frances shook back the abundance of her
golden
hair, and raised from the work her eyes,
dancing with the ardor of her national feeling, and
laughing, with a kind of concealed humour, as she
asked
Is it then so certain, that General Burgoyne
will be permitted to reach the city?
Permitted! echoed the Colonel, in affected
surprise; who is there to prevent it, if he wishes
it himself, my pretty Miss Fanny?
Frances was at precisely that age, when young
people are most jealous of their station in
society
;
neither quite a woman, nor yet a child.
The pretty Miss Fanny was rather too familiar
to be relished; and she dropped her eyes on her
work again, with cheeks that glowed with
crimson
,
as she continued very gravely
General Stark took the Germans into custody
may not General Gates think the British too
dangerous to go at large?
Oh! they were Germans, as you say, cried
the Colonel, excessively vexed at the necessity of
explaining at all, mere mercenary troops; but,
when the really British regiments come in
question
,
you will see a very different result.
Of that there is no doubt, cried Sarah,
without
in the least partaking of the resentment of
the Colonel to her sister, but hailing already in
her heart the triumph of the British.
Pray, Colonel Wellmere, said Frances,
recovering
her good humour, and raising her joyous
eyes once more to the face of the gentleman,
was the Lord Percy of Lexington, a kinsman of
him who fought at Chevy Chase?
Why, Miss Fanny, you are becoming a rebel,
said the Colonel, endeavouring to laugh away the
anger he felt; what you are pleased to insinuate
as a chase at Lexington, was nothing more than a
judicious retreatakind of
Runningfight, interrupted the
good-humoured
girl, laying great emphasis on the first
word.
Positively, young lady Colonel Wellmere
was interrupted by a laugh from a person who had
hitherto been unnoticed.
There was a small family apartment adjoining
the room occupied by the trio, and the air had
blown open the door communicating between the
two. A fine young man was now seen sitting near
the entrance, and, by his smiling countenance,
evidently
a pleased listener to the foregoing
conversation
.
He rose instantly, and coming through the
door, with his hat in his hand, appeared a tall
graceful
youth, of dark complexion, and sparkling eyes
of black, from which the mirth had not yet
entirely
vanished, as he made his bow to the ladies.
Mr. Dunwoodie! cried Sarah, in surprise, I
was ignorant of your being in the house; you will
find a cooler seat in this room.
I thank you, replied the young man, but I
must go and seek your brother, who placed me
there in ambuscade, as he called it, with a promise
of returning an hour ago. Without making any
further explanation, he bowed politely to the young
womendistantly, and with hauteur, to the
gentleman
,
and withdrew. Frances followed him into
the hall, and blushing richly, inquired, in a hurried
voice
But whywhy do you leave us, Mr.
Dunwoodie
Henry
must soon return.
The gentleman caught one of her hands in his
own, and the stern expression of his countenance,
gave place to a look of admiration, as he replied
You managed him famously, my dear little
kinswomanneverno never, forget the land of
your birthremember, Miss Wharton, if you are
the grand-daughter of an Englishman, you are, also,
the grand-daughter of a Peyton.
3
Oh! returned the laughing girl, it would
be difficult to forget that, with the constant
lectures
on genealogy before me, with which aunt
Jeanette favours mebut why do you go?
I am on the wing for Virginia, and have much
to dohe pressed her hand as he spoke, and
looking back, while in the act of closing the door,
exclaimed, be true to your countrybe
American
.
The ardent girl kissed her hand to
him, as he retired, and then instantly applying
it with its beautiful fellow to her burning cheeks,
ran into her own apartment to hide her confusion.
Between the open sarcasm of Frances, and the
ill-concealed disdain of the young man, Colonel
Wellmere had felt himself placed in an awkward
predicament; but ashamed to resent such trifles,
and in the presence of his mistresshe satisfied
himself with observing superciliously, as
Dunwoodie
left the room
Quite a liberty for a youth in his situation
a shop-boy with a bundle, I fancy.
The idea of picturing the elegant and graceful
Peyton Dunwoodie as a shop-boy, could never
enter the mind of Sarah, and she looked around
her in surprise, when the Colonel continued:
This Mr. DunDun
Dunwoodie! Oh nohe is a relation of my
aunt's, cried the young lady, and an intimate
friend of my brother; they were at school together,
and only separated in England, when one went
into the army, and the other to a French military
academy.
His money appears to have been thrown
away, observed the Colonel, showing the spleen
he was unsuccessfully striving to conceal.
We ought to hope so, added Sarah, with a
smile; for it is said he intends joining the rebel
armyhe was brought in here in a
Freneh
ship,
and has just been exchangedyou may soon meet
him in arms.
Well let himI wish Washington plenty
of such heroesand he turned to a more
pleasant
subject, by changing the discourse to
themselves
.
A few weeks had elapsed after this scene
occurred, and the army of Burgoyne laid down
their arms. Mr. Wharton, beginning to think the
result of the contest to be doubtful, resolved to
conciliate his countrymen, and gratify himself, by
taking his daughters into his own abode. Miss
Peyton consented to be their companion; and from
that time, until the period at which we
commenced
our narrative, they had formed one
family.
Whenever the main army had made any
movements
,
Capt. Wharton had, of course, accompanied
it; and once or twice, under the protection of
strong parties, acting in the neighbourhood of
the Locusts, he had enjoyed rapid and stolen
interviews with his friends. A twelvemonth had
however passed without his seeing them; and the
impatient Henry had adopted the disguise we
have mentioned, and unfortunately arrived on
the very evening an unknown and rather
suspicious
guest was the inmate of a house, that
seldom
contained any others than its regular
inhabitants
.
But, do you think he suspects me? asked
the captain, with anxiety, after pausing to listen
to Csar's opinion of the Skinners.
How should he? cried Sarah, when your
sisters and father could not penetrate your
disguise
.
There is something mysterious in his manner;
his looks are too prying for an indifferent
observer
,
continued young Wharton thoughtfully, and
his face seems familiar to methe recent fate of
Andr has created much irritation on both sides.
Sir Henry threatens retaliation for his death; and
Washington is as firm as if half the world were at
his command. The rebels would think me a fit
subject for their plans just now, should I be so
unlucky
as to fall into their hands.
But, my son, cried his father, in great alarm,
you are not a spyyou are not within the
rebel
that
is, the American lines;there is nothing
here to spy.
That might be disputed, rejoined the young
man, musing; their picquets were out at the
White Plains when I passed through in disguise.
It is true, my purposes are innocent; but how is
it to appear. My visit to you would seem a cloak
to other designs. Remember, sir, the treatment
received by yourself, not a year ago, for sending
me a supply of fruit for the winter.
That proceeded from the misrepresentations
of my kind neighbours, said Mr. Wharton, who
hoped, by getting my estate confiscated, to
purchase
good farms, at low prices.Peyton
Dunwoodie
,
however, soon obtained our discharge
we were detained but a mouth.
We! repeated the son, in amazement, did
they take my sisters also?Fanny, you wrote me
nothing of this.
I believe, said Frances, colouring highly, I
mentioned the kind treatment received from your
old friend, Major Dunwoodie; and that he
procured
my father's release.
True;but were you with him in the rebel
camp?
Yes, said the father, kindly; Fanny would
not suffer me to go alone. Jeanette and Sarah
took charge of the Locusts, and this little girl was
my companion in captivity.
And Fanny returned from such a scene a
greater rebel than ever, cried Sarah, indignantly;
one would think the hardships her father
suffered
would have cured her of such whims.
What say you to the charge, my bonny sister?
cried the Captain, gaily;Did Peyton strive to
make you hate your king, more than he does
himself
?
Peyton Dunwoodie hates no one, said
Frances
,
quickly; and, blushing at her own ardor, she
added immediately, he loves you Henry, I know,
for he has told me so again and again.
Young Wharton tapped his sister on the cheek,
with a shrewd smile, as he asked her, in an
affected
whisper,Did he tell you also that he loved
my little sister Fanny?
Nonsense, said Frances; and the remnants
of the supper table soon disappeared under her
superintendance.
3*
CHAPTER III.
'Twas when the fields were swept of autumn's store,
And growling winds the finding follage tore,
Behind the Lowmon hill, the short-liv'd light,
Descending slowly, usher'd in the night;
When from the noisy town, with mournful look,
His lonely way a meagre pedlar took.
Wilson
.
A storm
below the highlands of the Hudson, if
if it be introduced with an easterly wind, seldom
lasts less than two days. Accordingly, as the
inmates
of the Locusts assembled, on the
following
morning, around their early breakfast, the
driving rain was seen to strike, in nearly
horizontal
lines, against the windows of the building,
and forbad the idea of exposing either man or
beast to the tempest. Harper was the last to
appear
:
after taking a view of the state of the
weather
,
he apologized to Mr. Wharton for the
necessity
that existed, for his trespassing upon his
goodness for a longer time. To appearances,
the reply was as courteous as the excuse; yet
Harper
wore a resignation in his deportment that
was widely different from the uneasy manner of
the father. Henry Wharton had resumed his
disguise
with a reluctance amounting to disgust, but
in obedience to the commands of his parent.
No other communications passed between him and
the stranger, after the first salutations of the
morning had been paid to him by Harper, in
common with the rest of the family. Frances
had, indeed, thought there was something like a
smile passing over the features of the traveller,
when, on entering the room, he first confronted
her brother; but it was confined to the eyes,
seeming to want power to affect the muscles of the
face, and was soon lost in the settled and
benevolent
expression which reigned in his countenance,
with a sway but seldom interrupted. The eyes
of the affectionate sister were turned, in anxiety,
for a moment, on her brother; and, glancing again
on their unknown guest, met his look as he
offered
her, with peculiar grace, one of the little
civilities of the table; and the heart of the maiden,
which had begun to throb with violence, regained
a pulsation as tempered as youth, health, and
buoyant spirits could allow. While yet seated at
the table, Csar entered, and, laying a small
parcel
in silence by the side of his master, modestly
retired behind his chair; where, placing one hand
on its back, he continued in an attitude half
familiar
,
but profoundly respectful.
What is this Csar? inquired Mr. Wharton,
turning the bundle over in examination of its
envelope
,
and eyeing it rather suspiciously.
The 'baccy, sir; Harvey Birch, he got home,
and bring you a little good 'baccy from York.
Harvey Birch, rejoined the master, with
great deliberation, stealing a look at his guest.
I do not remember desiring him to purchase
any tobacco for me; but as he has bought it, he
must be paid for his trouble.
For an instant only, as the negro spoke, did
Harper suspend his silent mealhis eye moved
slowly from the servant to the master, and again
all remained in its impenetrable reserve.
To Sarah Wharton, this intelligence gave
unexpected
pleasur; rising from her seat, with
impatience
,
she bid the black shew Birch into the
apartment; when, suddenly recollecting herself,
she turned to the traveller with an apologizing
look, and added, if Mr. Harper will excuse the
presence of a pedlar.
The indulgent benevolence expressed in the
countenance of the stranger, as he bowed in silent
acquiescence, spoke more eloquently than the
nicest framed period, and the young lady
repeated
her order with a confidence in its truth, that
removed all embarrassment.
In the deep recesses of the windows of the
cottage
,
were seats of panneled work; and the rich
damask curtains, that had ornamented the parlour
in Queen-street, had been transferred to the
Locusts, and gave to the room that
indescribable
air of comfort, which so gratefully announces
the approach of a domestic winter. Into one of
these recesses Captain Wharton now threw
himself
,
drawing the curtain before him in such a
manner as to conceal most of his person from
observation; while his younger sister, losing her
natural frankness of manner in an air of artificial
constraint, silently took possession of the other.
Harvey Birch had been a pedlar from his
youth; at least, so he frequently asserted, and his
skill in the occupation went far to prove the truth
of the declaration. He was supposed to be a native
of one of the Eastern Colonies; and, from
something
of superior intelligence which belonged to
his father, it was thought they had known better
fortunes in the land of their nativity. Harvey
possessed
,
however, the common manners of the
country, and was in no way distinguished from
men of his class but by his acutenessand the
mystery which enveloped his movements. Ten
years before they had arrived together in the
valc, and, purchasing the humble dwelling at
which Harper had made his unsuccessful
application
,
continued peaceful inhabitants, but little
noticed and but little known. Until age and
infirmities
had prevented, the father devoted himself to
the cultivation of the small spot of ground
belonging
to his purchase, while the son pursued with
avidity his humble barter. Their orderly quietude
had soon given them so much of consideration in
the neighbourhood, as to induce a maiden of five
and thirty to forget the punctilio of her sex, and
to accept the office of presiding over their
domestic
comforts. The roses had long before vanished
from the cheeks of Katy Haynes, and she had
seen in succession, both her male and female
acquaintances forming the union so desirable to
her sex, with but little or no hope left for herself,
when, with views of her own, she entered the
family of the Birch's. Necessity is a hard master
but still Katy was not wanting in some qualities,
which made her a very tolerable housekeeper.
On the one hand, she was neat, industrious,
honest, and a good manager.On the other,
she was talkative, selfish, superstitious, and
inquisitive
.
By dint of using the latter quality with
consummate skill, she had not lived in the family
but five years when she triumphantly declared,
that she had heard, or rather over heard,
sufficient
to say what had been the former fate of her
associates.Could Katy have possessed enough
of divination to pronounce upon their future lot,
her task would have seemed comparatively easy.
From the private conversations of the parent and
child, she learnt that a fire had reduced them
from competence to poverty, and at the same
time diminished the number of their family to
two. There was a tremulousness in the voice of
the father, as he touched lightly on the event,
which affected even the heart of Katy; but no
barrier is sufficient to repel vulgar curiosity. She
persevered, until a very direct intimation from
Harvey, by threatning to supply her place with a
female a few years younger than herself, gave her
awful warning, that there were bounds beyond
which she was not to pass. From that period,
the curiosity of the housekeeper had been held
in such restraint, that, although no opportunity
of listening was ever neglected, she had been
able to add but little to her stock of knowledge.
There was, however, one piece of intelligence,
and that of no little interest to herself, which she
had succeeded in obtaining; and, from the moment
of its acquisition, she had directed her energies
to the accomplishment of one object, aided by the
double stimulus of love and avarice.
Harvey was in the frequent habit of paying
mysterious visits, in the depth of the night, to the
fire-place of the apartment, that served for both
kitchen and parlor. Here he was observed by
Katy; and, availing herself of his absence and
the occupations of the father, by removing one of
the hearth-stones, she discovered an iron pot,
glittering with a metal that seldom fails to soften
the hardest heart. Katy succeeded in replacing
the stone without discovery, and never dared to
trust herself with another visit. From that
moment
,
however, the heart of the virgin lost its
obduracy
;
and nothing interposed between Harvey
and his happiness, but his own want of
observation
.
The war did not interfere with the traffic of the
pedlar, who seized on the golden opportunity which
the interruption to the regular trade afforded, and
appeared absorbed in the one grand object of
amassing money. For a year or two his
employment
was uninterrupted, and his success
proportionate
;
but, at length, dark and threatening hints
began to throw suspicion around his movements,
and the civil authority thought it incumbent on
them to examine narrowly into his mode of life.
His imprisonments were not long, though frequent;
and his escapes from the guardians of the law
comparatively easy, to what he endured from the
persecution of the military. Still Birch survived,
and still he continued his trade, though compelled
to be very guarded in his movements, especially
whenever he approached the northern boundaries
of the county; or, in other words, the neighbourhood
of the American lines. His visits to the Locusts
had become less frequent, and his appearance at
his own abode so seldom, as to draw forth from
the disappointed Katy, in the fullness of her heart,
the complaint we have related, in her reply to
Harper. Nothing seemed to interfere with the
pursuits of this indefatigable trader; and, with a
view to dispose of certain articles which could
only find purchasers in the very wealthiest families
of the county, he had now braved the fury of the
tempest, for the half mile between his own
residence
and the house of Mr. Wharton.
In a few minutes after receiving the commands
of his young mistress, Csar reappeared, ushering
into the apartment the subject of the foregoing
digression. In person, the pedlar was a man of
middle height, spare, but full of bone and muscle:
at first sight, his strength seemed unequal to
manage
the unwieldy burden of his pack; yet he
threw it on and off with great dexterity, and with
as much apparent ease as if it had been feathers.
His eyes were graysunken, restless, and, for the
flitting moments that they dwelt on the
countenances
of those with whom he conversed, seemed
to read the very soul. They possessed, however,
two distinct expressions, which, in a great
measure
,
characterized the whole man. When
engaged
in traffic, the intelligence of his face
appeared
lively, active, and flexible, though
uncommonly
acute; if the conversation turned on the
ordinary transactions of life, his air became
abstracted
and restless; but if, by chance, the
revolution
and the country were the topic, his whole
system seemed alteredall his faculties were
concentratedhe would listen for a great length
of time, without speaking, and then would break
silence by some light and jocular remarks, that
were too much at variance with his former
manner
,
not to be affectation. But of the war, and of
his father, he seldom spoke, and always from some
apparent necessity.
To a superficial observer, avarice would seem
his ruling passionand, all things considered, he
was as unfit a subject for the plans of Katy Haynes
as can be readily imagined. On entering the
room the pedlar relieved himself from his burden,
which, as it stood on the floor, reached nearly to
his shoulders, and saluted the family with modest
civility. To Harper he made a silent bow,
without
lifting his eyes from the carpet; but the
curtain
prevented any notice of the presence of
Captain
Wharton. Sarah gave but little time for the
usual salutations before she commenced her
survey
of the contents of the pack; and, for several
minutes, the two were engaged in bringing to light
the varied articles it contained. The tables,
chairs, and floor, were soon covered with silks,
crapes, gloves, muslins, and all the stock of an
itinerant trader. Csar was employed to hold
open the mouth of the pack, as its hordes were
discharged, and occasionally aided his young lady,
by directing her admiration to some articles of
finery
,
which, from their deeper contrast in colours,
he thought more worthy of her notice. At length,
Sarah having selected several articles, and
satisfactorily
arranged the prices, observed in a
cheerful voice
But, Harvey, you have told us no news.Has
Lord Cornwallis beaten the rebels again?
The question could not have been heard; for
the pedlar, burying his body in the pack, brought
forth a quantity of lace of exquisite fineness, and,
holding it up to view, required the admiration of
the young lady. Miss Peyton dropped the cup she
was engaged in washing, from her hand; and
Frances exhibited the whole of that lovely face,
which had hitherto only suffered one of its
joyous
eyes to be seen beaming with a colour that
shamed the damask, which enviously concealed
her figure.
The aunt quitted her employment; and Birch
soon disposed of a large portion of this valuable
article. The praises of the ladies had drawn the
whole person of the younger sister into view; and
Frances was slowly rising from the window, as
Sarah repeated her question, with an exultation in
her voice, that proceeded more from pleasure in
her purchase, than her political feelings. The
younger sister resumed her seat, apparently
examining
into the state of the clouds, while the
pedlar, finding a reply was expected, answered
slowly
There is some talk below about Tarleton
having defeated General Sumpter, on the Tyger
river.
Captain Wharton now involuntarily thrust his
head between the opening of the curtains into the
room; and Frances, in turning her ear, in
breathless
silence, noticed the quiet eyes of Harper
looking at the pedlar, over the book he was
affecting
to read, with an expression that denoted him
a listener of no ordinary interest.
Indeed! cried the exulting Sarah,
Sumpter
Sumpterwho
is he? I'll not buy even a pin,
until you tell me all the news; she continued
laughing, and throwing down a muslin she had
been examining.
4
For a moment the pedlar hesitated; his eye
glanced towards Harper, who was yet gazing on
him in settled meaning, and the whole manner of
Birch was altered. Approaching the fire, he took
from his mouth a large allowance of the Virginian
weed, and depositing it, with the superabundance
of its juices, without mercy to Miss Peyton's
shining
andirons, returned to his goods, and replied
in a more lively tone
He lives somewhere among the negroes to the
south.
No more negur than be yourself, Mister
Birch, interrupted Csar tartly, and dropping
the covering of the goods in high displeasure.
Hush, Csarhushnever mind it now,
said Sarah Wharton soothingly, waiting with
impatience
to hear further.
A black man as good as white, Miss Sally,
continued the offended African, so long he
behave
himself.
And frequently much better, rejoined his
mistress; but, Harvey, who is this Mr. Sumpter?
A slight indication of humour shewed itself on
the face of the pedlar, as he continuedAs I
was saying, he lives among the coloured people in
the south,Csar resumed his occupationand
has lately had a skirmish with this Colonel
Tarleton
.
Who defeated him of course, cried Sarah,
with confidence.
So say the troops at Morrisania, returned the
other laconically.
But what do you say? Mr. Wharton
ventured
to inquire, yet speaking involuntarily in a
low tone.
I repeat but what I hear, said Birch,
offering
a piece of cloth to the inspection of Sarah,
who rejected it in silence, evidently determined
to hear more before she made any further
purchases
.
They say, however, at the Plains, the
pedlar
continued, after first throwing his eyes again
round the room, and letting them rest for an
instant
on Harper, that Sumpter and one or two
more were all that were hurt, and that the rig'lers
were all cut to pieces, for the militia were fixed
snugly in a log barn.
Not very probable, said Sarah
contemptuously
,
though I make no doubt the rebels got
behind
the logs.
I think, said the pedlar coolly, again
offering
the silk, it's quite ingenious to get a log
between
one and a gun, instead of getting between
a gun and a log.The eye of Harper dropped
quietly on the pages of the volume in his hand,
while Frances, rising, came forward with a smile
in her face, as she inquired, in a tone of affability
the pedlar had never before witnessed
Have you more of the lace, Mr. Birch?
The desired article was immediately produced,
and Frances became a purchaser also; by her
order a glass of liquor was offered to the trader,
who took it with thanks, and, having paid his
compliments
to the master of the house and the ladies,
drank the beverage.
So it is thought that Colonel Tarleton has
worsted General Sumpter? said Mr. Wharton,
affecting to be employed in mending the cup,
broken by the eagerness of his sister-in-law.
I believe they think so at Morrisania, said
Birch drily.
Have you any other news, friend? asked
Captain Wharton, venturing to thrust his face
without
the curtains again.
Have you heard that Major Andr has been
hung? inquired the pedlar with emphasis, in
reply.
Captain Wharton started, and for a moment
glances of great significance were exchanged
between
him and the trader, when he observed, with
affected indifference, that must have been some
five weeks ago.
Does his execution make much noise? asked
the father, striving to make the broken china
unite.
People will talk, you know, Squire,
returned
the pedlar, exhibiting his goods respectfully to
the young ladies.
Is there any probability of movements below,
my friend, that will make travelling dangerous?
asked Harper, looking steadily at the other, in
expectation
of his reply.
Some bunches of ribbons fell from the hand of
Birch; his countenance changed instantly, losing
its keen expression in intent meaning, as he
answered
slowly.It is some time since the rig'lar
cavalry were out, and I saw some of De Lancey's
men cleaning their arms as I passed their quarters;
it would be no wonder if they took the scent soon,
for the Virginia horse are low in the county.
Are they in much force? asked Mr.
Wharton
,
suspending all employment in anxiety.
I did not count them, said the pedlar, giving
his attention to his trade again.
Frances was the only observer of the change in
the manner of Birch, and, on turning to Harper, he
had resumed his book in silence. The maid took
some of the ribbons in her handlaid them down
againand, bending over the goods, so that her
hair, falling in rich curls, shaded her face, she
observed
,
blushing with a colour that suffused her
neck
I thought the southern horse had marched
towards the Delaware.
It may be so, said Birch; I passed the troops
at a distance.
Csar had now selected a piece of calico, in
which the colours of yellow and red were contrasted
on a white ground; and after admiring it for
several
minutes, laid it down with a sigh, as he
exclaimed
,
very pretty calico!
That, said Sarah; yes, that would make a
proper gown for your wife, Csar.
Yes, Miss Sally, cried the delighted black,
make old Dinah heart leap for joyso very
genteel.
Yes, added the pedlar quaintly, that would
make Dinah look like a rainbow.
Csar eyed his young mistress eagerly, until,
laying it down with a smile, she inquired the price
of Harvey.
Why, much as I light of chaps, said the
pedlar.
How much? demanded Sarah in surprise.
According to my luck in finding purchasers
for my friend Dinah, you may have it at four
shillings
.
It is too much, said Sarah, turning to some
goods for herself.
Monstrous pricefor coarse calico, Mister
Birch, grumbled Csar, dropping the opening of
the pack again.
We will say three then, added the pedlar,
if you like that better.
Be sure, like'em bettersaid Csar smiling
good humouredly, re-opening the packMiss
Sally like a three shilling when she give, and a
four shilling when she take.
The bargain was immediately concluded; but
in measuring, the cloth wanted a little of the well
known ten yards required by the dimensions of
Dinah. By dint of a strong arm, however, it grew
to the desired length, under the experienced eye
of the pedlar, who conscientiously added a ribbon
4*
of corresponding brilliancy with the calico, and
Csar hastily withdrew, to communicate the
joyful
intelligence to his aged partner.
During the movements created by the
conclusion
of the purchase, Captain Wharton had
ventured
to draw aside the curtain, so as to admit a
view of his person, and he now inquired of the
pedlar, who had begun to collect his scattered
goods, at what time he had left the city.
At early twilight, was the answer.
So lately! cried the other in surprise; and
then correcting his manner, by assuming a more
guarded air, he continuedCould you pass the
picquets at so late an hour?
I did, was the laconic reply.
You must be well known by this time,
Harvey
,
to the officers of the British army, cried
Sarah
,
smiling archly on the pedlar.
I know some of them by sight, said Birch,
glancing his eyes round the apartment, taking in
their course Captain Wharton, and resting for an
instant on the countenance of Harper.
Mr. Wharton had listened intently to each
speaker in succession, and had so far lost the
affectation
of indifference, as to be crushing in his
hand the pieces of china he had expended so
much labour in endeavouring to mend; when,
observing
the pedlar tying the last knot in his pack,
he asked abruptly
Are we about to be disturbed again with the
enemy?
Who do you call the enemy? said the
pedlar
,
raising himself erect, and giving the other a
look, before which the eyes of Mr. Wharton sunk
in instant confusion.
All are enemies who disturb our peace, said
Miss Peyton, observing her brother unable to
speak. But are the royal troops out from below?
'Tis quite likely they soon may be, returned
Birch, raising his pack from the floor, and
preparing
to leave the room.
And the continentals, continued Miss Peyton
mildly, are the continentals in the county?
Harvey was about to utter something in reply,
when the door opened, and Csar made his
appearance
,
attended by his delighted spouse.
The race of blacks of which Csar was a
favorable
specimen is becoming very rare. The old
family servant, who, born and reared in the
dwelling
of his master, identified himself with the
welfare
of those whom it was his lot to serve, is giving
place in every direction to that vagrant class
which has sprung up within the last thirty years,
and whose members roam through the country,
unfettered
by principles, or uninfluenced by
attachments
.
For it is one of the curses of slavery,
that its victims become incompetent to the
attributes
of a freeman. The short curly hair of
Csar
had acquired from age a colouring of gray,
that added greatly to the venerable cast of his
appearance
.
Long and uninterrupted applications
of the comb had straightened the close curls of his
forehead, until they stood erect in a stiff and
formal
precision, that gave at least two inches to his
stature. The shining black of his youth had lost
its glistening hue, and had been succeeded by a
dingy brown. His eyes, which stood at a most
formidable distance from each other, were small,
and characterized by an expression of good
feeling
,
occasionally interrupted by the petulance of
an indulged servantthey, however, now danced
with inward delight. His nose possessed, in an
eminent manner, all the requisites for smelling,
but with the most modest unobtrusivenesshis
nostrils being abundantly capacious, without
thrusting themselves in the way of their
neighbours
.
His mouth capacious to a fault, that was
only tolerated on account of the double row of
pearls it contained. In person Csar was short,
and we would say square, had not all the angles
and curves of his figure bid defiance to any thing
like mathematical symmetry. His arms were long
and muscular, and terminated by two bony hands,
that exhibited on one side, a colouring of blackish
gray, and on the other a faded pink. It was in his
legs that nature had indulged in her most
capricious
humours. There was an abundance of the
material, but it had been injudiciously used. The
calves were neither before nor behind, but rather
on the outer side of the limb, inclining forward,
and so close to the knee as to render the free use
of that joint a subject of doubt. In the foot,
considering
it as a base on which the body was to rest,
Csar had no cause of complaint, unless, indeed, it
might be that the leg was placed so near the
centre
,
as to make it sometimes a matter of dispute,
whether he was not walking backwards. But
whatever might be the faults a statuary could
discover
in his person, the heart of Csar Thompson
was in the right place, and, we doubt not, of very
just dimensions.
Accompanied by his ancient companion, Csar
now advanced, and paid his tribute of gratitude in
wordsSarah received them with great
complacency
,
and made a few compliments to the taste of
the husband, and the probable appearance of the
wife. Frances took the hard and wrinkled hand of
her nurse into her own; and, with a face beaming
with a look of pleasure that corresponded to the
smiling countenances of the blacks, offered the
service
of her needle in fitting the admired calico to
its future uses. The offer was humbly and
gratefully
accepted.
As Csar followed the pedlar and his wife from
the apartment, and was in the act of closing the
door, he indulged himself in a grateful soliloquy,
by saying aloud
Good little ladyMiss Fannytake care of
old fatherlove to make a gown for old Dinah
too. What else his feelings might have induced
him to utter is unknown, but the sound of his voice
was heard sometime after the distance had made
his words indistinct.
Harper had dropped his book, and sat an
admiring
witness of the scene; and Frances enjoyed
a double satisfaction, as she received an approving
smile from a face which concealed, under the
traces of deep thought and engrossing care, the
expression
which characterizes all the best feelings
of the human heart.
CHAPTER IV.
It is the form, the eye, the word,
The bearing of that stranger Lord;
His stature, manly, bold, and tall,
Built like a castle's battled wall,
Yet moulded in such just degrees,
His giant-strength seems lightsome case,
Weather and war their rougher trace
Have left on that majestic face;
But 'tis his dignity of eye!
There, if a suppliant, would I fly,
Secure, 'mid danger, wrongs, and grief,
Of sympathy, redress, relief
That glance, if guilty, would I dread
More than the doom that spoke me dead!
Enough, enough, the princess cried,
'Tis Scotland's hope, her joy, her pride!
Walter Scott
.
The
party sat in silence for several minutes
after the pedlar withdrew. Mr. Wharton had
heard enough to increase his uneasiness, without
in the least removing his apprehensions on behalf
of his son. The Captain was impatiently wishing
Harper in any other place, than the one he
occupied
with such apparent composure; while Miss
Peyton completed the disposal of her breakfast
equipage, with the mild complacency of her
nature
,
aided a little by inward satisfaction at her
possessing so large a portion of the trader's lace
Sarah was busily occupied in arranging her
purchases
,
and Frances was kindly assisting her in the
occupation, disregarding her own neglected
bargains
for the moment, when the stranger suddenly
broke the silence by saying
If any apprehensions of me induce Captain
Wharton to maintain his disguise, I wish him to
be undeceivedhad I motives for betraying him,
they could not operate under present
circumstances
.
The younger sister sunk into her seat colourless
and astonished. Miss Peyton dropped the tea-tray
she was lifting from the table; and Sarah sat with
her purchases unheeded in her lap, in speechless
surprise. Mr. Wharton was stupified; but the
Captain, hesitating a moment from astonishment,
sprang into the middle of the room, and exclaimed,
as he tore off the instruments of his disguise
I believe you from my soul, and this tiresome
imposition shall continue no longer under the roof
of my father. Yet I am at a loss to conceive in
what manner you know me.
You really look so much better in your proper
person, Captain Wharton, said Harper with a
slight smile, I would advise you never to
conceal
it in future. There is enough to betray you,
if other sources of detection were wanting: as he
spoke, he pointed to a picture suspended over the
mantle-piece, which exhibited the British officer
in his regimentals.
I had flattered myself, cried young Wharton
with a laugh, that I looked better on the canvass
than in masqueradeyou must be a close
observer
,
sir!
Necessity has made me one, said Harper
mildly, rising from his seat.
Frances met him as he was about to withdraw,
and, taking his hand between both her own, said
with earnestnessher cheeks mantling with their
richest vermilionYou cannotyou will not
betray my brother.
Foran instant Harper paused in silent admiration
of the lovely pleader, and then, folding her hands
on his breast, replied solemnly I cannot, and I
will not; he released her hands, and laying his
own on her head gently, continued If the
blessing of a stranger can profit you, receive it.
He turned, and, bowing low, retired to his
apartment
.
The whole party were deeply impressed with
the ingenuous and solemn manner of the traveller,
and all but the father found immediate relief in
his declaration. Some of the cast-off clothes of
the captain, which had been removed with the
goods from the city, were produced; and young
Wharton, released from the uneasiness of his
disguise
,
began at last to enjoy a visit which had been
undertaken at so much personal risk to himself.
Mr. Wharton retiring to his apartment in
pursuance
of his regular engagements, the ladies, with
the young man, were left to an uninterrupted
communication
on such subjects as were most
agreeable
.
Even Miss Peyton was affected with the
spirits of her younger relatives; and they sat for
an hour enjoying in heedless confidence, the
pleasures
of an unrestrained conversation, without
reflecting
on any danger which might be impending
over them. The city and their acquaintances
were not long neglected; for Miss Peyton, who
had never forgotten the many agreeable hours of
her residence within its boundaries, soon inquired,
among others, after their old acquaintance Colonel
Wellmere.
Oh! cried the Captain gaily, he yet
continues
there, as handsome and as gallant as ever.
Although a woman be not actually in love, she
seldom hears without a blush, the name of a man
whom she
might
love, and who has been
connected
with herself, by idle gossips, in the amatory
rumour of the day. Such had been the case with
Sarah, and she dropped her eyes on the carpet
with a smile, that, aided by the blush which
suffused
her cheek, in no degree detracted from her
native charms.
Captain Wharton, without heeding this display
of interest in his sister, immediately continued
At times he is melancholywe tell him it must
be love. Sarah raised her eyes to the face of
her brother, and was consciously turning them on
the rest of the party, when she met those of her
sister, laughing with good-humour and high spirits,
as she cried, Poor mandoes he despair?
Why, noone would think he could notthe
eldest son of a man of wealth, so handsome, and
a Colonel.
Strong reasons, indeed, why he should
prevail
,
said Sarah, endeavouring to laugh, more
particularly the latter.
Let me tell you, replied the Captain
gravely
,
a Lieutenant-Colonelcy in the Guards is a
very pretty thing
And Colonel Wellmere a very pretty man,
cried Frances, with a laugh.
Nay, Frances, returned her sister, Colonel
Wellmere was never a favorite with youhe is
too loyal to his King to be agreeable to your
taste.
Frances took the hand of her sister, as she said
and is not Henry loyal to his King?
Come, come, said Miss Peyton, no
difference
of opinion about the Colonelhe is a
favorite
of mine.
Fanny likes Majors better, cried the brother,
pulling her upon his knee.
Nonsense, said the blushing girl, as she
endeavoured
to extricate herself from the grasp of
her laughing brother.
It surprizes me, continued the Captain,
that Peyton, when he procured the release of
my father, did not endeavour to detain my sister
in the rebel camp.
That might have endangered his own liberty,
5
said the maid, smiling archly, and resuming her
seat; you know it is liberty for which Major
Dunwoodie is fighting.
Liberty! exclaimed Sarah, very pretty
libertywhich exchanges one master for fifty.
The privilege of changing masters at all is a
liberty, returned the other good-humouredly.
And one you ladies would sometimes be glad
to exercise, cried the captain.
We like, I believe, to have the liberty of
choosing who they shall be in the first place,
said the laughing girl; don't we, aunt Jeanette.
Me! cried Miss Peyton starting; what do
I know of such things child; you must ask some
one else, if you wish to learn such matters.
Ah! returned the maid, looking playfully at
her aunt, you would have us think you were
never youngbut what am I to believe of all the
tales I have heard about the handsome Miss
Jeanette
Peyton.
Nonsencemy dearnonsense, said the
aunt, endeavouring to suppress a smile; it is
very silly to believe all you hear.
Nonsense! do you call it, cried the captain
gaily; to this hour General Montrose toasts
Miss Peyton; I heard him within the week, at Sir
Henry's table.
Why, Henry, you are as saucy as your sister,
returned the lady; and to break in upon your
folly, I must take you to see my new home-made
manufactures in contrast with the finery of Birch.
The young people rose to follow their aunt, in
perfect good humour with each other and the
world. On ascending the stairs to the place of
deposit for Miss Peyton's articles of economy, she
availed herself, however, of an opportunity to
inquire
of her nephew, whether General Montrose
suffered as much from the gout, as he had done
when she knew him.
It is a painful discovery that we make, as we
advance in life, that none of us are exempt from
its frailties. When the heart is fresh, and the
view of the future unsullied by the blemishes
which have been gathered from the experience of
the past, it is that our feelings are most holywe
love to identify with the persons of our natural
friends, all those qualities to which we ourselves
aspire, and all those virtues we have been taught
to revere. The confidence with which we esteem
seems a part of our nature; and there is a purity,
thrown around the affections which tie us to our
kindred, that after life can seldom hope to see
uninjured
.
The family of Mr. Wharton continued
to enjoy, for the remainder of the day, a happiness
to which they had long been strangers; and one
that sprung, in its younger members, from the
delights
of the most confiding affection, and the
exchange
of the most disinterested endearments.
Harper appeared only at the dinner table, and
retired with the cloth, under the pretence of some
engagements in his own room. Notwithstanding
the confidence created by his manner, the family
felt his absence a relief; for the visit of
Captain
Wharton was necessarily to be confined to a
very few days, both from the limitation to his
leave of absence, and the danger of a discovery.
All dread of consequences, however, were lost
in the pleasure of the meeting. Once or twice
during the day, Mr. Wharton had suggested a
doubt as to the character of his unknown guest,
and the possibility of the detection of his son
proceeding
in some manner from his information:
but the idea was earnestly opposed by all his
children
;
even Sarah united with her brother and
sister in pleading warmly in favor of the sincerity
expressed in the outward appearance of the
traveller
.
Such appearances, my children, replied the
desponding parent, are but too often deceitful;
when men like Major Andr lend themselves to
the purposes of fraud, it is idle to reason from
qualities, much less externals.
Fraud! cried his son quickly; surely, sir,
you forget that Major Andre was serving his king,
and that the usages of war justified the measure.
And did not the usages of war justify his death,
Henry? inquired Frances, speaking in a low voice,
unwilling to abandon what she thought the cause
of her country, and yet unable to suppress her
feelings for the man.
Never! exclaimed the young man, springing
from his seat, and pacing the floor rapidly
Frances
you shock me; suppose it should be my fate,
even now, to fall into the power of the rebels
you would vindicate my executionperhaps exult
in the cruelty of Washington.
Henry! said Frances solemnly, quivering
with emotion, and with a face pale as death, you
little know my heart.
Pardon memy sistermy little Fanny, cried
the repentant youth, pressing her to his bosom,
and kissing off the tears which had burst in torrents
from her eyes.
It is very foolish to regard your hasty words,
I know, said Frances, extricating herself from his
arms, and raising her yet humid eyes to his face
with a smileBut reproach from those we love
is most severe, Henryparticularlywhere we
we thinkwe know,the paleness of the maid
gradually gave place to the colour of the rose, as
she concluded in a low voice, with her eyes
directed
to the carpet,we are undeserving of
it.
Miss Peyton moved from her own seat to the
one next her niece, and, kindly taking her hand,
observed, you should not suffer the impetuosity
of your brother to affect you so muchboys, you
know, she continued with a smile, are
proverbially
ungovernable.
And you might add cruel, from my conduct,
said the Captain, seating himself on the other side
of his sister; but on the subject of the death of
Andr we are all of us uncommonly sensitive
you did not know himhe was all that was brave
that was accomplishedthat was estimable.
Frances smiled faintly and shook her head, but
made no reply. Her brother, observing the marks
of incredulity in her countenance, continued
you doubt it, and justify his death?
I do not doubt his worth, replied the maid
mildly, nor his being deserving of a more happy
fate; but I doubt the impropriety of Washington's
conduct. I know but little of the customs of war,
and wish to know less; but with what hopes of
success
could the Americans contend, if they yielded
all the principles which long use had established,
to the exclusive purposes of the British?
Why contend at all? cried Sarah
impatiently
;
besides, being rebels, all their acts are
illegal
.
Women are but mirrors, which reflect the
images before them, cried the captain good
naturedly
.In
Frances I see the picture of Major
Dunwoodieand in Sarah
Colonel Wellmere, interrupted the younger
sister laughing, and blushing crimson. I must
confess I am indebted to the Major for my
reasoning
am
I not aunt Jeanette?
I believe there is something like it, indeed,
child, replied Miss Peyton with a smile, in his
last letter to me.
5*
Yes, I plead guiltyand you, Sarah, have not
forgotten the learned discussions of Colonel
Wellmere
.
I trust I never forget the right, said Sarah,
emulating her sister in colour, and rising, under
the pretence of avoiding the heat of the fire.
Nothing occurred of any moment during the
rest of the day; but in the evening Csar reported
that he had overheard voices in the room of
Harper
,
conversing in a low tone. The apartment
occupied by the traveller was the wing at the
extremity
of the building, opposite to the parlor in
which the family ordinarily assembled; and it
seems, that Csar had established a regular
system
of espionage, with a view to the safety of his
young master. This intelligence gave some
uneasiness
to all the members of the family; but the
entrance of Harper himself, with the air of
benevolence
and sincerity which shone through his
reserve
,
soon removed the doubts from the breast
of all but Mr. Wharton. His children and sister
believed Csar to have been mistaken, and the
evening passed off without any additional alarm.
On the afternoon of the succeeding day, the
party were assembled in the parlor around the
tea-table of Miss Peyton, when a change in the
weather occurred. The thin
scud,
that
apparently
floated but a short distance above the tops of
the hills, began to drive from the west towards the
east in astonishing rapidity. The rain yet
continued
to beat against the eastern windows of the
house with incredible fury: in that direction all
was dark and gloomy. Frances was gazing at the
scene with the desire of youth to escape from the
tedium of confinement, when, as if by magic, all
was still. The rushing winds had ceased: the
pelting of the storm was overand, springing to
the window, the maid, with delight pictured in her
face, saw a glorious ray of sunshine lighting on the
opposite wood. The foliage glittered with the
chequered beauties of the October leaf
reflecting
back from the moistened boughs the richest
lustre of an American autumn. In an instant, the
piazza, which opened to the south, was thronged
with the inmates of the cottage. The air was
mild, balmy, and refreshingin the east, clouds,
which might be likened to the retreating masses
of a discomfited army, hung around the horizon in
awful and increasing darkness. At a little
elevation
above the cottage, the thin and vapory clouds
were still rushing towards the east with amazing
velocity; while in the west the sun had broken
forth in all his majesty, and shed his parting
radiance
on the scene below, aided by the fullest
richness of a clear atmosphere and freshened
herbage.Such moments belong only to the
climate
of America, and are enjoyed in a degree
proportioned
to the suddenness of the contrast, and
the pleasure we experience in escaping from the
turbulence of the elements to the quiet of a
peaceful
evening, and an air still as the softest mornings
in June.
What a magnificent scene! said Harper in a
low tone; how grand! how awfully sublime!
May such a quiet speedily await the struggle in
which my country is engaged, and such a glorious
evening follow the day of her adversity.
Frances, who stood next him, alone heard the
voiceturning in amazement from the view to
the speaker, she saw him standing bare headed,
erect, and with his eyes to heaven; there was no
longer the quiet which had seemed their
characteristic
,
but they were lighted into something like
enthusiasm, and a slight flush passed over his pale
features.
There can be no danger apprehended from such,
a man, thought Francessuch feelings belong only
to the virtuous.
The musings of the party were now interrupted
by the sudden appearance of the pedlar. He had
taken advantage of the first gleam of sunshine to
hasten to the cottage. Heedless of wet or dry as
it lay in his path, with arms swinging to and fro,
and with his head bent forward of his body
several
inches, Harvey Birch now approached the
piazza
,
with a gait peculiarly his ownthe quick,
lengthened pace of a vender of goods.
Fine evening, said the pedlar, saluting the
party without raising his eyes, quite warm and
agreeable for the season.
Mr. Wharton assented to the remark, and
inquired
kindly after the health of his father.
Harvey
heard him, and continued standing for some
time in moody silence; but the question being
repeated
,
he answered with a slight tremor in his
voice
He fails fast; old age and hardships will do
their work. The pedlar turned his body from
the view of most of the family; but Frances
noticed
his glistening eyes and quivering lips, and, for
the second time, Harvey rose in the estimation of
the maid.
The valley in which was the residence of Mr.
Wharton ran in a direction from North-west to
South-east, and the house stood on the side of a
hill which terminated its length in the former
direction
.
A small opening, occasioned by the
receding
of the opposite hill, and the fall of the
land to the level of the tide water, afforded a view
of the Sound over the tops of the distant woods on
its margin. The surface of the water, which had
so lately been lashing the shores with boisterous
fury, was already losing its ruffled darkness in the
long and regular undulations that succeed a
tempest
,
while the light air from the South-west was
gently touching their summits, lending its feeble
aid in stilling the waters. Some dark spots were
now to be distinguished, occasionally rising into
view, and again sinking behind the lengthened
waves which interposed themselves to the sight.
They were unnoticed by all but the pedlar. He
had seated himself on the piazza, at a distance
from Harper, and appeared to have forgotten the
object of his visit. His roving eye, however, soon
caught a glimpse of these new objects in the view,
and he sprang up with alacrity, gazing intently
towards the water. The juices of the tobacco
soon disfigured the floor of Miss Peytonhe moved
his placeglanced his eye with marked uneasiness
on Harperand then said with great emphasis
The rig'lars must be out from below.
Why do you think so? inquired Captain
Wharton eagerly; God send it may be true; I
want their escort in again.
Those ten whale boats would not move so fast,
answered Birch drily, unless they were better
manned than common.
Perhaps, cried Mr. Wharton in alarm, they
arethey are continentals returning from the
island
.
They look like rig'lars, said the pedlar with
great meaning.
Look! repeated the captain, there is
nothing
but spots to be seen.
Harvey disregarded his observation, but seemed
to be soliloquizing as he said, in an under tone
They came out before the galehave laid on the
island these two dayshorse are on the road
there will soon be fighting near us. During this
speech Birch several times glanced his eye
towards
Harper, with evident uneasiness, but no
corresponding emotion betrayed any interest of
that gentleman in the scene.He stood in silent
contemplation of the view, and seemed enjoying
the change in the air. As Birch concluded,
however
,
Harper turned to his host and mentioned,
that his business would not admit of unnecessary
delay; he would, therefore, avail himself of the
fine evening to ride a few miles on his journey.
Mr. Wharton made many professions of regret at
losing so agreeable an inmate; but was too
mindful
of his duty not to speed the parting guest, and
orders were instantly given to that effect.
The uneasiness of the pedlar increased in a
manner for which nothing apparent could account;
his eye was constantly wandering towards the
lower end of the vale, as if in expectation of some
interruption from that quarter. At length Csar
appeared leading the noble beast which was to
bear the weight of the traveller. The pedlar
officiously
assisted to tighten the girths, and fasten
the blue cloak and valisse to the mail straps.
Every preparation being completed, Harper
proceeded to take his leave. To Sarah and her
aunt he paid his compliments with ease and
kindness
but
when he came to Frances, he paused a
moment, while his face assumed an expression of
more than ordinary benignity; his eye repeated
the blessing which had before fallen from his lips,
and the maid felt her cheeks glow and heart
beat with a quicker pulsation, as he spoke his
adieus. There was a mutual exchange of polite
courtesy between the host and his parting guest;
but as Harper frankly offered his hand to Captain
Wharton, he remarked, in a manner of great
solemnity
The step you have undertaken is one of much
danger, and disagreeable consequences to yourself
may result from itin such a case I may have it
in my power to prove the gratitude I owe your
family for its kindness.
Surely, sir, cried the father, losing sight of
delicacy in apprehension for his child, you will
keep secret the discovery which your being in my
house has enabled you to make.
Harper turned quickly to the speaker, and then
losing the sternness which had begun to gather on
his countenance, he answered mildly, I have
learnt nothing in your family, sir, of which I was
ignorant beforebut your son is safer from my
knowledge of his visit, than he would be without
it.
He bowed to the whole party, and without
taking
any notice of the pedlar other than by simply
thanking him for his attentions, mounted his horse,
and riding steadily and gracefully through the
little
gate, was soon lost behind the hill which
sheltered
the valley to the northward.
The eye of the pedlar followed the retiring
figure
of the horseman so long as it continued
within view, and as it disappeared from his sight,
he drew a long and heavy sigh, as if relieved from
a load of apprehension. The Whartons had
meditated
in silence on the character and visit of their
unknown guest for the same period, when the
father
approached Birch, and observed
I am yet your debtor, Harvey, for the tobacco
you were so kind as to bring me from the city.
If it should not prove so good as the first,
replied
the pedlar, fixing a last and lingering look
on the direction of Harper's route, it is owing
to the scarcity of the article.
I like it much, continued the other, but
you have forgotten to name the price.
The countenance of the trader changed, and
losing its expression of deep care in a natural
acuteness, he answered
It is hard to say what ought to be the price;
I believe I must leave it to your own generosity.
Mr. Wharton had taken a hand well filled with
the images of Carolus III. from his pocket, and
now extended it towards Birch with three of the
pieces between his finger and thumb. Harvey's
eyes twinkled as he contemplated the reward;
and rolling over in his mouth a large quantity of
the article in question, coolly stretched forth his
hand into which the dollars fell with a most
agreeable
sound; but not satisfied with the transient
music of their fall, the pedlar gave each piece in
succession a ring on the stepping-stone to the
piazza
,
before he consigned it to the safe keeping of
a huge deer-skin purse, which vanished from the
sight of the spectators so dexterously, that not one
of them could have told about what part of his
person it was secreted.
This very material point in his business so
satisfactorily
completed, the pedlar rose from his seat
on the floor of the piazza, and approached where
Captain Wharton stood, supporting his sisters on
either arm, as they listened with the lively interest
of affection, to his conversation.
The agitation of the preceding incidents had
caused such an expenditure of the juices which
had become necessary to the mouth of the pedlar,
that a new supply of the weed was required
before
he could turn his attention to business of
lesser
moment. This done, he asked abruptly
Captain Wharton, do you go in to night?
No! said the captain laconically, and
looking
at his lovely burdens with great affection.
Mr. Birch, would you have me leave such
company
so soon, when I may never enjoy it again.
Brother! said Frances in a low tone,
jesting
on such a subject is cruel.
I rather guess, continued the pedlar coolly,
now the storm is over, the Skinners may be
moving; you had better shorten your visit, Captain
Wharton.
Oh! cried the British officer, a few guineas
will buy off those rascals at any time should I
meet them. NonoMr. Birch, here I stay until
morning.
Money could not liberate Major Andr, said
the pedlar drily.
Both the sisters now turned to the captain in
alarm, and the elder observed
You had better take the advice of Harvey
rest assured, brother, his opinion in such matters
ought not to be disregarded.
Yes, added the younger, if, as I suspect,
Mr. Birch assisted you to come hereyour
safety
our
happiness, dear Henry, require you to
listen to him now.
I brought myself out, and can take myself in,
said the captain positively; our bargain went no
farther than to procure my disguise, and let me
know when the coast was clear, and in the latter
particular you were mistaken, Mr. Birch.
I was, said the pedlar with some interest,
and the greater is the reason why you should
get back to nightthe pass I gave you will serve
you but once.
Cannot you forge another?
The pale cheek of the trader showed an
unusual
colour, but he continued silent, with his
eyes fixed to the ground, until the young man
added with great positivenesshere I stay this
night, come what will.
Captain Wharton, said the pedlar with great
deliberation and marked emphasis, beware a
tall Virginian, with huge whiskershe is below
you yo my knowledge; the devil can't deceive
him; I never could but once myself.
Let him beware of me. said Wharton
haughtily
;
but Mr. Birch, I exonerate you from
further
responsibility.
6
Will you give me that in writing? asked the
cautious Birch.
Oh! cheerfully, cried the captain with a
laugh; Csar! pen, ink, and paper, while I write
a discharge for my trusty attendant, Harvey Birch,
pedlar, &c. &c.
The implements for writing were produced,
and the captain, with great gaiety, wrote the
desired
acknowledgment in language of his own;
which the pedlar took, and, carefully depositing it
by the side of the images of his Catholic majesty,
made a sweeping bow to the whole family, and
departed
as he had approached. He was soon seen at
a distance stealing into the door of his own humble
dwelling.
The father and sisters of the captain were too
much rejoiced in retaining the young man to
express
,
or even entertain, the apprehensions his
situation
might reasonably excite; but on retiring to
their evening repast, a cooler reflection induced
the captain to think of changing his mind
unwilling
to trust himself out of the protection of his
father's domains, the young man despatched
Csar
to desire another interview with Harvey. The
black soon returned with the unwelcome
intelligence
that it was now too late. Katy had told
him Harvey must be miles on his road to the
northward, having left home at early candle light,
with his pack. Nothing now remained to the
captain but patience, until the morning afforded
further opportunity of deciding on the best course
for him to pursue.
This Harvey Birch, with his knowing looks
and portentous warnings, gives me more
uneasiness
than I am willing to own, said Captain
Wharton, rousing himself from a fit of musing in
which the danger of his situation made no small
part of his meditations.
How is it, that he is able to travel to and fro
in these difficult times without molestation?
inquired
Miss Peyton.
Why the rebels suffer him to escape so easily,
is more than I can answer, returned the other;
but Sir Henry would not permit a hair of his
head to be injured.
Indeed! cried Frances with interest; is he
then known to Sir Henry Clinton?
At least he ought to be, said the captain,
smiling significantly.
Do you think, my son, asked Mr. Wharton,
there is no danger of his betraying you?
WhynoI reflected on that before I trusted
myself to his power, said the Captain
thoughtfully
;
he seems to be faithful in matters of
business
.
The danger to himself, should he return to
the city, would prevent such an act of villany.
I think, said Frances, adopting the manner
of her brother, Harvey Birch is not without good
feelings; at least, he has the appearance of them
at times.
Oh! cried her sister exultingly, he has
loyalty
,
and that with me is a cardinal virtue.
I am afraid, said her brother laughing, love
of money is a stronger passion than love to his
king.
Then, said the father, you cannot be safe
while in his powerfor no love will withstand
the temptation of money when offered to avarice.
Surely, sir, cried the youth, recovering his
gaiety, there must be one love that can resist
any thingis there not Fanny?
Here is your candle, said the distressed
maiden: you keep your father up beyond his
usual hour.
CHAPTER V.
Through Solway sands, through Taross most,
Blindfold, he knew the paths to cross;
By wily turns, by desperate bounds,
Had bafiled Percy's best bloodhounds.
In Eske, or Liddel, fords were none,
But he would ride them, one by one;
Alike to him was time, or tide,
December's snow, or July's pride;
Alike to him was tide, or time,
Moonless midnight, or matin prime.
Walter Scott
.
All
the members of the Wharton family laid
their heads on their pillows that night, with a
fearful
anticipation of some interruption to their
ordinary
quiet. This uneasiness kept the sisters from
enjoying their usual repose, and they rose from
their bed on the following morning, unrefreshed,
and almost without closing their eyes.
On taking an eager and hasty survey of the
valley
from the windows of their room, nothing,
however
,
but its usual serenity was to be seenit was
glittering with the opening brilliancy of one of
those lovely mild days, which occur about the
time of the fall of the leaf; and which, by their
frequency, class the American autumn with the
most delightful seasons in other countries. We
have no spring---vegetation here seems to leap
into existence, instead of creeping, as in the same
latitudes of the old world: but how gracefully it
retires! September---October---even November
and December compose the season for enjoyment
in the open air---they have their storms, but they
are distinct, and not of long continuance, leaving
a clear atmosphere and cloudless sky.
As nothing could be seen likely to interrupt the
enjoyments and harmony of such a day, the sisters
descended to the parlor with a returning
confidence
in their brother's security, and their own
consequent happiness.
The family were early in assembling around their
breakfast table; and Miss Peyton, with a little of
that minute precision which creeps into the habits
of single life, had pleasantly insisted the absence
of her nephew should in no manner interfere
with the regular hours she had established
consequently
,
the party were already seated when
the captain made his appearance; though the
untasted
coffee sufficiently proved, that by none of
his relatives was his absence disregarded.
I think I did much better, he cried, taking a
chair between his sisters, and receiving their
offered
salutes, to secure a good bed, and such a
plentiful
breakfast, instead of trusting to the hospitality
of that renowned corps, the Cow-Boys.
If you could sleep, said Sarah, you were
more fortunate than Frances and myselfevery
murmur of the night air sounded to me like the
approach of the rebel army.
Why, said the captain laughing, I do
acknowledge
a little inquietude myselfbut how
was it with you, turning to his younger and
evidently
favourite sister, and tapping her cheek;
did you see banners in the clouds, and mistake
Miss Peyton's olian harp for rebellious music.
Nay, Henry, rejoined the maid, looking at
him affectionately, much as I love my own
country
,
the approach of her troops just now would
give me great pain.
The brother made no reply, but returning the
fondness expressed in her eye by a look of
fraternal
tenderness, he gently pressed her hand in
silence
when
Csar, who had participated largely
6*
in the anxiety of the family, and who had risen
with the dawn, and kept a vigilant watch on the
surrounding objects, exclaimed, as he stood
gazing
from one of the windows
Runmassa Harryrunif love old Csar,
runhere come the rebel horse, added the
black, with a face that approached to something
like the hues of a white man.
Run! repeated the British officer, gathering
himself up in an air of military pride; no, Mr.
Csar, running is not my tradewhile speaking,
he walked deliberately to the window, where the
family were already collected in the greatest
consternation
.
At a distance of more than a mile, about fifty
dragoons were to be seen, winding down one of
the lateral entrances to the valley. In advance
with an officer, was a man attired in the dress of
a countryman, who pointed in the direction of the
cottage. A small party now left the main body,
and moved rapidly towards the object of their
destination
.
On reaching the road which led through the
bottom of the valley, they turned their horses'
heads to the north. The Whartons continued
chained in breathless silence to the spot,
watching
their movements, when the party, having
reached the dwelling of Birch, made a rapid circle
round his grounds, and in an instant his house
was surrounded by a dozen sentinels.
Two or three of the dragoons now dismounted
and disappeared: in a few minutes, however,
they returned to the yard, followed by Katy, from
whose violent gesticulations it was evident
matters
of no trifling concern were on the carpet. A
short communication with the loquacious
housekeeper
followed the arrival of the main body of
the troop, and the advanced party remounting,
the whole moved towards the Locusts with great
speed.
As yet, none of the family had sufficient
presence
of mind to devise any means of security for
Captain Wharton; but the danger now became too
pressing to admit of delay, and various means of
secreting him were hastily proposed, but they
were all haughtily rejected by the young man, as
unworthy of his characterit was too late to
retreat
to the woods in the rear of the cottage, for
he would unavoidably be seen, and followed by a
troop of horse, as inevitably taken.
At length his sisters, with trembling hands,
replaced
his original disguise, the instruments of
which had been carefully kept at hand by Csar,
in expectation of some apprehended danger.
This arrangement was hastily and imperfectly
completed, as the dragoons entered the lawn and
orchard of the Locusts, riding with the rapidity of
the wind; and in their turn the Whartons were
surrounded.
Nothing remained now, but to meet the
impending
examination with as much indifference as
the family could assume. The leader of the horse
dismounted, and followed by a couple of his men,
approached the outer door of the building, which
was slowly and reluctantly opened for his
admission
by Csar. The heavy tread of the trooper,
as he followed the black to the door of the parlor,
rung in the ears of the females as it approached
nearer and nearer, and drove the blood from their
faces to their hearts with a chill that nearly
annihilated
all feeling.
A man whose colossal stature manifested the
possession of vast strength, entered the room, and
removing his cap, saluted the family with a
mildness
his appearance did not indicate as belonging
to his naturehis dark hair hung around his brow
in profusion, unstained with the powder which was
worn at that day, and his face was nearly hid in
the whiskers by which it was disfiguredstill the
expression of his eye, though piercing, was not bad,
and his voice, though deep and powerful, was not
unpleasant. Frances ventured to throw a timid
glance at his figure as he entered, and saw at once
the man, from whose scrutiny Harvey Birch had
warned them there was so much to be apprehended.
You have no cause for alarm, ladies, said
the officer, pausing a moment, and contemplating
the pale faces around himmy business will be
confined to a few questions, which, if freely
answered
,
will instantly remove us from your
dwelling
.
And what may they be, sir? stammered Mr.
Wharton, rising from his chair, and waiting
anxiously
for the reply.
Has there been a strange gentleman staying
with you during the storm? continued the
dragoon
,
speaking with interest, and in some degree
sharing in the evident anxiety of the father.
This gentlemanherefavored us with his
company during the rain, and has not yet
departed
;
answered the agitated parent, unable to look
his interrogator in the face.
This gentleman! repeated the other, turning
to Captain Wharton, and contemplating his figure
for a moment, until the anxiety of his countenance
gave place to a lurking smilehe approached the
youth with an air of comic gravity, and, with a low
bow, continuedI am sorry for the severe cold
you have in your head, sir.
Me! exclaimed the captain in surprise; I
have no cold in my head.
I fancied it then, from seeing you had
covered
such handsome auburn locks with that ugly old
wig, rejoined the stranger; it was my mistake,
you will please to pardon it.
Mr. Wharton groaned aloud; but the ladies,
ignorant of the extent of their visitor's knowledge,
remained in trembling yet rigid silence. The
captain
himself moved his hand involuntarily to his
head, and found the trepidation of his sisters had
left some of his natural hair exposed. The
dragoon
watched the movement with a continued
smile, when, seeming to recollect himself, he
proceeded
,
turning to the father
Then, sir, I am to understand there has not
been a Mr. Harper here within the week.
Mr. Harper! echoed the other, feeling a
load removed from his heartyes, sirI had
forgotten
;
but he is gone; and if there be any thing
wrong in his character, we are in entire ignorance
of itto me he was a total stranger.
You have but little to apprehend from his
character, answered the dragoon dryly; but he
is gonehowwhenand whither?
He departed as he arrived, said Mr.
Wharton
,
gathering renewed confidence from the
manner
of the trooper, on horseback last evening,
and he took the northern road.
The officer listened to him with intense
interest
,
his countenance gradually lighting into a
smile of pleasure; and the instant Mr. Wharton
concluded his laconic reply, he turned on his heel
and left the apartment. The Whartons, judging from
his manner, thought he was about to proceed in
quest of the object of his inquiries. On gaining
the lawn they noticed the dragoon in earnest, and
apparently pleased conversation with his two
subalterns
.
In a few moments orders were given to
some of the troop, and horsemen left the valley,
at full speed, by its various roads.
The suspense of the party within, who were all
highly interested witnesses of the scene, was
shortly
terminated; for the heavy tread of the dragoon
soon announced his second approach. He bowed
again politely as he re-entered the room, and
walking
up to Captain Wharton, said, with comic
gravity
Now, sir, my principal business done, may I
beg to examine the quality of that wig?
The British officer imitated the manner of the
other, as he deliberately uncovered his head, and
handing him the wig, observed, I hope, sir, it is
to your liking.
I cannot, without violating the truth, say it is
sir, returned the dragoon; I prefer your auburn
hair, from which you seem to have combed the
powder with great industrybut that must have
been a sad hurt you have received under that
enormous black patch.
You appear so close an observer of things, I
should like your opinion of it, sir, said Henry,
removing
the silk, and exhibiting his cheek free from
blemish.
Upon my word, sir, you improve most
rapidly
in externals, added the trooper, preserving
his muscles in inflexible gravity: if I could but
persuade you to exchange this old surtout for that
handsome blue coat by your side, I think I never
could witness a more agreeable metamorphosis,
since I was changed myself from a lieutenant to a
captain.
Young Wharton very composedly did as he was
required; and stood an extremely handsome,
well-dressed
young man. The dragoon looked at him
for a minute with the drollery that characterized
his manner, and then continued
This is a new comer in the sceneit is usual
you know for strangers to be introducedI am
Captain Lawton, of the Virginia horse.
And Isiram Captain Wharton, of his
Majesty's
60th regiment of foot, returned Henry,
bowing stiffly, and recovering his natural manner.
The countenance of Lawton changed instantly,
and his assumed quaintness vanished. He viewed
the figure of Captain Wharton, as he stood
proudly
swelling with a conscious pride that disdained
further concealment, and cried, with great
earnestness
Captain Whartonfrom my soul I pity you.
Oh! then, cried the father in agony, if you
pity him, dear sir, why molest himhe is not a
spynothing but a desire to see his friends
prompted
him to venture so far from the regular army in
disguiseleave him with usthere is no reward,
no sum, which I will not cheerfully pay.
Sir, your anxiety for your friend excuses your
language, said Lawton haughtily; but you
forget
I am a Virginian, and a gentleman.Turning
to the young man, he continuedwere you
ignorant
,
Captain Wharton, that our picquets have
been below you for several days?
I did not know it until I reached them, and it
was then too late to retreat, said Wharton
sullenly
.
I came out, as my father has mentioned, to
see my friends, understanding your parties to be
at Peeks-kill, and near the Highlands, or surely I
would not have ventured.
All this may be very true, said Lawton
musing
;
but the affair of Andr has made us on the
alert. When treason reaches to the grade of
general
officers, Captain Wharton, it behoves the
friends of liberty to be vigilant.
Henry bowed to this remark in distant silence,
and Sarah ventured to urge something in behalf
of her brother. The dragoon heard her politely,
and apparently with commiseration; but willing to
avoid useless and embarrassing petitions,
answered
mildly
I am not the commander of the party, madam;
Major Dunwoodie will decide what must be done
with your brother; and, at all events, he will
receive
nothing but kind and gentle treatment.
Dunwoodie! exclaimed Frances, with a face
in which the roses contended with the paleness of
apprehension for the mastery; thank God! then
Henry is safe.
Lawton regarded her with a mingled expression
of pity and admiration, then shaking his head,
doubtingly, continued
I hope so; and with your permission we will
leave the matter for his decision.
The colour of Frances changed from the
paleness
of fear to the glow of hopeher dread on
behalf of her brother was certainly greatly
diminished
;
yet her form shook; her breathing became
short and irregular; and her whole frame gave
tokens of extraordinary agitationher eyes rose
from the floor to the dragoon, and were again
fixed
immoveably on the carpetshe evidently
wished
to utter something, but was unequal to the
effort
.
Miss Peyton was a close observer of these
movements of her niece, and advancing with an
air of feminine dignity, inquired
Then, sir, we may expect the pleasure of
Major Dunwoodie's company shortly?
Immediately, madam, answered the dragoon,
withdrawing his admiring gaze from the person of
Frances; expresses are already on the road to
announce to him our situation, and the
intelligence
will speedily bring him to this valley;
unless
,
indeed, he continued, contracting his lips,
and looking droll, as he turned to Mr. Wharton,
some private reasons may exist to make a visit
particularly unpleasant.
I shall always be happy to see Major
Dunwoodie
,
said the father hastily, overhearing the
soliloquy of the trooper.
Oh! doubtless, sir, said the other dryly; he
is a general favoritemay I presume on it so far as
to ask leave to dismount and refresh my men, who
compose part of his squadron.
There was a manner about the trooper, that
would have made the omission of such a request
easily forgiven by Mr. Wharton, but he was fairly
entrapped by his own eagerness to conciliate, and
it was useless to withhold a consent which he
thought would probably be extortedhe,
therefore
,
made the most of the necessity of the case,
and gave such orders as would facilitate the wishes
of Captain Lawton.
The officers were politely invited to take their
morning's repast at the family breakfast table, and
having first made their arrangements without, the
invitation was frankly accepted. None of the
watchfulness, which was so necessary to their
situation
,
was neglected by the wary partizan. The
patroles were seen on the distant hills, taking their
protecting circuit around their comrades, who
were enjoying, in the midst of dangers, a security
that can only spring from the indifference of habit,
and the watchfulness of discipline.
The addition to the party at Mr. Wharton's
table was in number only threeand these were
all of them men who, under the rough exterior of
actual and arduous service, concealed the manners
of the highest class of society. Consequently, the
interruption to the domestic privacy of the family
was marked by the observance of strict decorum.
The ladies left the table to their guests, who
proceeded without much superfluous modesty to
do proper honours to the hospitality of Mr.
Wharton
.
At length, Captain Lawton suspended for a
moment
his violent attacks on the buck-wheat cakes,
to inquire of the master of the house, if there was
not a pedlar of the name of Birch who lived in the
valley at times?
7
At times only, I believe, sir, replied Mr.
Wharton quickly; he is seldom hereI may say
I never see him.
That is strange too, said the trooper,
looking
at the disconcerted host intently,
considering
he is your next neighbour; he must be quite
domestic, sirand to the ladies it must be
somewhat
inconvenientI doubt not but that muslin
in the window-seat cost twice as much as he would
have asked them for it.
Mr. Wharton turned in consternation, and saw
some of the recent purchases scattered around the
room.
The two subalterns smiled on each other
significantly
,
but the captain resumed his breakfast
with an eagerness that created a doubt, whether
he ever expected to enjoy another. The
necessity
of a supply from the dominion of Dinah soon,
however, afforded another respite, of which
Lawton
availed himself to say
I had a wish to break this Mr. Birch of his
unsocial habits, and gave him a call this morning
had I found him within, I should have placed him
where he would enjoy life in the midst of society,
for a short time at least.
And where might that be, sir, asked Mr.
Wharton, conceiving it necessary to say
something
.
The guard-room, said the trooper drily.
What is the offence of poor Birch? asked
Miss Peyton, handing the dragoon a fourth dish
of coffee.
Poor! cried the captain; if he is poor
John Bull must pay him ill.
Yes, indeed, said one of the subalterns,
king George owes him a dukedom.
And congress a halter, continued the
commanding
officer, commencing anew on a fresh
supply
of the cakes.
I am sorry, said Mr. Wharton, that any
neighbour of mine should incur the displeasure of
our rulers.
If I catch him, cried the dragoon, while
buttering
another cake, he will dangle from the
limbs of one of his namesakes.
He would make a very pretty ornament,
suspended
from one of those locusts before his own
door, added the lieutenant coolly.
Never mind, continued the captain
emphatically
,
I will have him yet before I'm a major.
As the language of these officers appeared to
flow from the strength of their feelings, the
Whartons
thought it prudent to discontinue the subject.
It was no new intelligence to any of the family,
that Harvey Birch was distrusted, and greatly
harrassed
by the American officers. His escapes
from their hands, not less than his imprisonments,
had been the conversation of the country in too
many instances, and under circumstances of too
great mystery, to be easily forgotten. In fact, no
small part of the bitterness, expressed by Captain
Lawton against the pedlar, arose from the
unaccountable
disappearance of the latter when
intrusted
to the custody of two of his most
faithful
dragoons.
A twelvemonth had not yet elapsed, since Birch
had been seen lingering near the head quarters of
the commander-in-chief, and at a time when
important
movements were expected hourly to occur.
So soon as the information of this fact was
communicated
to the officer, whose duty it was to
guard the avenues to the American camp, he
despatched
Captain Lawton in pursuit of the
suspected
pedlar.
Acquainted with all the passes of the hills, and
indefatigable in the discharge of his duty, the
trooper had, with much trouble and toil,
succeeded
in effecting his object. The party had halted
at a farm house for the purposes of refreshment,
and the prisoner been placed in a room by himself,
but under the keeping of the two men before
mentioned
all
that was known subsequently is, that a
woman was seen busily engaged in the
employments
of the household near the sentinels, and
was particularly attentive to the wants of the
captain
,
until he was deeply engaged in the
employments
of the supper table.
Afterwards neither woman nor pedlar were to
be found. The pack, indeed, was discovered,
open, and nearly empty, and a small door
communicating
with a room adjoining to the one in
which the pedlar had been secured, was also open.
Captain Lawton never could forgive the
deception
;
his antipathies to his enemies were not very
moderate, but this was adding an insult to his
penetration
that rankled deeply. He sat in
portentous
silence, brooding over this exploit of his
prisoner
,
yet mechanically pursuing the business
before
him, until after sufficient time had past to
make a very comfortable meal, a trumpet
suddenly
broke on the ears of the party, sending its
martial tones up the valley in startling, melody.
The trooper rose instantly from the table,
exclaiming
Quick, gentlemen, to your horsesthere
comes Dunwoodie; and, followed by his officers,
he precipitately left the room.
With the exception of the sentinels left to guard
Captain Wharton, the dragoons mounted, and
marched out to meet their comrades.
None of the watchfulness, necessary in a war,
where similarity of language, appearance and
customs
,
rendered prudence doubly necessary, was
omitted by this cautious leader. On getting
sufficiently
near, however, to a body of horse of more
than double his own number, to distinguish
countenances
,
Lawton plunged his rowels in his
charger
,
and in a moment was by the side of his
commander
.
The ground in front of the cottage was again
occupied by the horse; and the same precautions
observed as before, the newly arrived troops
hastened
to participate in the cheer prepared for their
comrades.
7*
CHAPTER VI.
Prepare thy soul, young Azim! thou hast brav'd
The bands of Greece, still mighty though enslav'd;
Hast fac'd her phalanx, arm'd with all its fame,
Her Macedonian pikes and globes of flame;
All this hast fronted, with firm heart and brow,
But a more perilous trial waits thee now
Woman's bright eyes, * * * *
* * * * and, let conquerors boast
Their fields of famehe who in virtue arms
A young, warm spirit against beauty's charms,
Who feels her brightness, yet defies her thrall,
Is the best, bravest, conqueror of them all.
Moore
.
The
ladies of the Wharton family had gathered
around a window, deeply interested in the scene
we have related.
Sarah viewed the approach of her countrymen
with a smile of contemptuous indifference for the
persons and appearance of men, whom she thought
arrayed in the unholy cause of rebellion. Miss
Peyton looked on the gallant show with an
exulting
pride which arose in the reflection, that the
warriors before her were the chosen troops of her
native colony, while Frances gazed with an
intensity
of interest that absorbed all other considerations.
The two parties had not yet joined, before her
quickly glancing eyes distinguished one
horseman
in particular from those around him. Even
the steed of this youthful soldier seemed to be
conscious that he sustained the weight of no
common
manhis hoofs but lightly touched the earth,
and his airy tread was the curbed motion of a
blooded charger.
The dragoon sat gracefully in his saddle, with
a firmness and ease that showed him master of
both himself and horsehis figure united the just
proportions of strength and activity, being tall,
round, and muscular. It was to this officer
Lawton
made his report, and side by side they rode
into the field opposite to the cottage.
The heart of the maiden beat with a pulsation
nearly stifling, as he paused for a moment and
took a survey of the building with an eye whose
dark and sparkling glance could be seen in the
distance between themher colour changed, and
for an instant, as she saw the youth throw himself
from his saddle, Frances was compelled to seek
relief to her trembling limbs in a chair.
The officer gave a few hasty orders to his second
in command, walked rapidly into the lawn, and
approached the cottage.Fanny rose from her
seat, and vanished from the apartment.The
dragoon
ascended the steps of the piazza, and had
barely time to touch the outer door when it
opened
to his admission.
The youth of Frances, when she left the city,
had prevented her sacrificing, in conformity to
the customs of that day, all her native beauties on
the altar of fashion. Her hair, which was of a
golden richness of colour, was left untortured to
fall in the natural ringlets of her infancy, and
shaded a face which was glowing with the united
charms of health, youth, and artlessnessher eyes
spake volumes, but her tongue was silenther
hands were interlocked before her, and aided by
her taper form, bending forward in an attitude of
expectation, gave a loveliness and interest to her
appearance that for a moment chained her lover
in silence to the spot.
Frances silently led the way into the vacant
parlour opposite to the one in which the family
were assembled, and turning to the soldier
frankly
,
placing both her hands in his own, exclaimed
Ah! Dunwoodie! how happy, on many accounts,
I am to see you; I have brought you in here to
prepare
you to meet an unexpected friend in the
opposite
room.
To whatever cause it may be owing, cried
the youth, pressing her hands to his lips, I am
happy too in being able to see you alone.
Frances
,
the probation you have decreed to my love is
cruelwar and distance may shortly separate us
forever.
We must submit to the necessity which
governs
us, said the maid, losing the glow of
excitement
in a more melancholy feeling. But it
is not love speeches I would hear now: I have
other and more important matter for your
attention
.
What can be of more importance than to
make you mine by a tie that may be indissoluble!
Frances, you are cold to memefrom whose
mind days of service and nights of alarm have never
been able to banish your image.
Dear Dunwoodie, said Frances, softening
nearly to tears, and again extending her hand to
him, as the richness of her colour gradually
returned
,
you know my sentimentsthis war once
ended, and you may take that hand for everbut
I never can consent to tie myself to you by any
closer union than already exists, so long as you
are arrayed in arms against my only brother
even now that brother is awaiting your decision
to restore him to liberty, or conduct him to a
probable death.
Your brother! cried Dunwoodie, starting
and turning pale; your brother! explain
yourself
what
dreadful meaning is concealed in your
words?
Has not Captain Lawton told you of the
arrest
of Henry, as a spy, by himself this very
morning
?
continued Frances, in a voice barely
audible
,
and fixing on her lover a look of the deepest
and most anxious interest.
He told me of arresting a captain of the 60th
in disguise, but without mentioning where or
whom, replied the major in a similar tone, and
dropping his head between his hands, he
endeavoured
to conceal his feelings from his companion.
Dunwoodie! Dunwoodie! exclaimed
Frances
,
losing all her former confidence in the most
fearful apprehensions, what means this
agitation
?
as the Major slowly raised his face, in
which was pictured the most expressive concern,
she continued, surelysurelyyou will not
betray
your friendmy brotheryour botherto
an ignominious death.
Frances! exclaimed the young man in agony,
what can I dowhat can I do?
Do! repeated the maid, gazing at him
wildly
;
would Major Dunwoodie yield his friend to
his enemiesthe brother of his betrothed wife?
Oh! speak not so unkindly to medearest
Miss Whartonmy own Frances. I would this
moment die for youfor Henrybut cannot
forget my dutycannot forfeit my honoryou
yourself would be the first to despise me if I did.
Peyton Dunwoodie! said Frances solemnly,
and with a face of ashy paleness, you have told
meyou have sworn, that you loved me.
I doI dointerrupted the soldier with
fervor
;
but the maid, motioning with her hand for
silence, continued, in a voice that trembled with
her emotions,
Do you think I can throw myself in the arms
of a man whose hands are stained with the blood
of my only brother?
Frances! exclaimed the major in agony.
you wring my very heart; then pausing for a
moment to struggle with his feelings, he
endeavoured
to force a smile, as he added, but, after
all, we may be torturing ourselves with unnecessary
fears, and Henry, when I know the circumstances,
may be nothing more than a prisoner of war; in
which case I can liberate him on parole.
There is no more delusive passion than hope;
and it seems to be the happy privilege of youth to
cull all the pleasures which can be gathered from
its indulgence. It is when we are most worthy of
confidence ourselves, that we are least apt to
distrust
,
and what we think ought to be, we are fond
to think will.
The half-formed expectations of the young
soldier
were communicated to the desponding sister
more by the eye than the voice, and she rose
quickly from her chair with a returning crimson to
her cheeks, as she cried
Oh! there can be no just grounds to doubt it:
I knewI knewDunwoodie, you would never
desert us in the hour of our greatest need. The
violence of her feelings conquered, and the
agitated
girl burst into a flood of tears.
The office of consoling those we love is one of the
dearest prerogatives of affection; and Major
Dunwoodie
,
although but little encouraged by his own
momentary suggestion of relief, could not
undeceive
the lovely woman who leaned on his
shoulder
,
as he wiped the traces of her agitated feelings
from her face, with a trembling, but reviving
confidence
in the safety of her brother and the
protection
of her lover.
Frances having sufficiently recovered her
recollection
to command herself, now eagerly led
the way into the opposite room, to communicate
to her family the pleasing intelligence which she
already conceived as certain.
Dunwoodie followed her reluctantly, and with
dreadful forebodings of the result: but a few
moments
brought him into the presence of his
relatives
,
and he summoned all his resolution to meet
the approaching trial with firmness.
The salutations of the young men were cordial
and sincere, and on the part of Henry Wharton
as collected as if nothing had occurred to disturb
his self-possession.
The abhorrence of being, in any manner,
auxiliary
to the arrest of his friend, the danger to the
life of Captain Wharton, and the heart-breaking
declarations of Frances had, however, created an
uneasiness in the bosom of Major Dunwoodie,
which all his efforts could not conceal. His
reception
by the rest of the family was kind and
sincere
,
both from old regard, and a remembrance of
former obligations, heightened by the anticipations
they could not fail to read in the expressive eyes
of the blushing maid by his side. After
exchanging
greetings with every member of the family,
Major Dunwoodie beckoned to the sentinel, whom
the wary prudence of Captain Lawton had left in
charge of the prisoner, to leave the room.
Turning
to Captain Wharton, with an air of fixed
resolution
,
he inquired mildly
Tell me, Henry, the circumstances of this
disguise
,
in which Captain Lawton reports you to
have been found, and rememberremember
Captain Whartonyour answers are entirely
voluntary.
The disguise was used by me, Major
Dunwoodie
,
replied the English officer, gravely, to
enable me to visit my friends, without incurring
the danger of becoming a prisoner of war.
But you did not wear it until you saw the
troop of Lawton approaching? inquired the
Major
quickly.
Oh! no, interrupted Frances, eagerly,
forgetting
all the circumstances in her anxiety for her
brother; Sarah and myself placed them on him
when the dragoons appearedit was our
awkwardness
that led to his discovery.
The countenance of Dunwoodie brightened, as,
turning his eyes in fond admiration on the lovely
speaker, he heard her explanation, and he
added
Probably some articles of your own, which
were at hand, and were used on the spur of the
moment.
No, said Wharton, with dignity, the clothes
were worn by me from the citythey were
procured
for the purpose to which they were
applied
,
and I intended to use them in disguising me
in my return this very day.
The appalled Frances shrunk back from
between
her brother and lover, where her ardent
feelings had carried her, as the whole truth
glanced over her mind, and sunk into a seat,
gazing wildly on the young men who stood before
her.
But the picquetsthe party at the plains
added Dunwoodie, turning pale.
I passed them too in disguise, continued
Wharton, proudly; I made use of this pass for
which I paid; and, as it bears the name of
Washington
,
I presume is forged.
Dunwoodie caught the paper from his hand
eagerly, and stood gazing on the signature for
some time in silence, during which the soldier
gradually prevailed over the man; when he
turned
to the prisoner, with a searching look, as he
asked
Captain Wharton, whence did you procure
this paper?
That is a question, I conceive, Major
Dunwoodie
has no right to ask, said the other,
distantly
.
Your pardon, sir, returned the American
officer; my feelings may have led me into an
impropriety
.
Mr. Wharton, who had been a deeply interested
auditor to the conversation, now so far conquered
his feelings as to say, Surely, Major Dunwoodie,
the paper cannot be materialsuch artifices are
used daily in war.
This name is no counterfeit, said the
dragoon
,
studying the characters, and speaking in a
low voice; is treason yet among us
undiscovered
?The
confidence of Washington has been
abused, for the fictitious name is in a different
hand from the pass. Captain Wharton, my duty
will not suffer me to grant you a parole: you must
accompany me to the Highlands.
I did not expect otherwise, Major
Dunwoodie
,
said the prisoner haughtily, moving
towards
his father, and speaking to him in a low
tone.
Dunwoodie turned slowly towards the sisters,
when the figure of Frances once more arrested his
gaze; she had risen from her seat, and stood again
with her hands clasped before him in an attitude
of intense interest: feeling himself unable to
contend
longer with his feelings, he made a hurried
excuse for a temporary absence, and left the
room. Frances followed him, and, obedient to
the direction of her eye, the soldier re-entered
the apartment in which had been their first
interview
.
Major Dunwoodie, said Frances, in a voice
barely audible, as she beckoned to him to be
seated
;
her cheek, which had been of a chilling
whiteness
,
was flushed with a suffusion that crimsoned
her whole countenance; she struggled with
herself
8
for a moment, and continued, I have already
acknowledged to you my esteemeven now, when
you most painfully distress me, I wish not to
conceal
it. Believe me, Henry is innocent of every
thing but imprudence. Our country can sustain
no wrong; again she paused, and almost gasped
for breath; her colour changed rapidly from red
to white, until the blood rushed into her face,
covering her features with the
brightest
vermilion;
and she added hastily, in an under tone, I have
promised, Dunwoodie, when peace is restored to
our country, to become your wifegive to my
brother his liberty on parole, and I will this day
go with you to the altar, follow you to the camp
and, in becoming a soldier's bride, learn to endure
a soldier's privations.
Dunwoodie seized the hand which the blushing
maid had in her ardour extended towards him, and
pressed it for a moment to his bosom; then rising
from his seat, paced the room in excessive
agitation
,
as he exclaimed
Francessay no moreI conjure you, unless
you wish to break my heart.
You then reject my offered hand? said the
maid, with an air of offended delicacy, rising
with dignity, though her pale cheek and quivering
lip plainly showed the conflicting passions within.
Reject it! cried her lover with enthusiasm;
have I not sought it with entreatieswith tears?
Has it not been the goal of all my earthly wishes?
But to take it under such conditions would be to
dishonour us both. Yet hope for better things.
Henry must be acquittedperhaps not tried. No
intercession of mine will be wanting, you must
well know; and believe me, Frances, I am not
without favour with Washington.
That very paper, that abuse of his confidence,
to which you alluded, will steel him to my brother's
sufferings. If threats or entreaties could move his
stern sense of justice, would Andr have suffered?
said the maid despairingly, as she flew from the
room to conceal the violence of her emotions.
Dunwoodie remained for a minute nearly
stupified
,
with the distress of his mistress and the pain
of his own feelings; and then followed, with a view
to vindicate himself and relieve her apprehensions.
On entering the hall that divided the two parlours,
he was met by a small ragged boy, who looked
one moment at his dress; and placing a piece of
paper in his hands in silence, immediately
vanished
through the outer door of the building. The
bewildered state of his mind, and the suddenness
of the occurrence, gave the Major barely time to
observe the messenger to be a country lad,
meanly
attired, and that he held in his hand one of
those toys which are to be bought in cities, and
which he now apparently contemplated with the
conscious pleasure of having fairly purchased, by
the performance of the service required. The
soldier turned his eyes to the subject of the
note. It was written on a piece of torn and soiled
paper, and in a hand barely legible; but, after some
little labour, he was able to make out as follows:
The rig'lars are at hand, horse and foot.
Dunwoodie started; and forgetting every thing
in the duties of a soldier, precipitately left the
house. While walking rapidly towards the troops,
he noticed on a distant hill a vidette riding
with speed; several pistols were fired in quick
succession, and the next instant the trumpets
of the corps, rung in his ears with the
enlivening
strain of to arms. By the time he had
reached the ground occupied by his squadron, the
Major saw that every man was in active motion.
Lawton was already in his saddle, eyeing the
opposite
extremity of the valley with the eagerness
of expectation, and crying to the musicians, in
tones but little lower than their own
Sound away my lads, and let these
Englishmen
know the Virginia horse are between them
and the end of their journey.
The videttes and patroles now came pouring in,
each making in succession his hasty report to the
commanding officer, who gave his orders cooly,
and with a promptitude that made obedience
certain
.
Once only, as he wheeled his horse to ride
over the ground in front, did Dunwoodie trust
himself
with a look at the cottage, and his heart beat
with an unusual rapidity as he saw a female figure
standing, with clasped hands, at a window of the
room in which he had met Frances. The distance
was too great to distinguish her features through
the intervening object; but the soldier could not
doubt that it was his mistress. The paleness of his
cheek and the languor of his eye endured but for
a moment longer. As he rode towards the
intended
battle-ground, a flush of ardour began to show
itself on his sun-burnt features; and his dragoons,
who studied the face of their leader, as the best
index to their own fate, saw again the wonted
flashing of the eyes, and cheerful animation,
which they had so often witnessed on the eve of
battle. By the additions of the videttes and
parties
that had been out, and which now had all
joined, the whole number of the horse was
increased
to near two hundred. There was also a
small body of mounted men, whose ordinary
duties
were those of guides, but who, in cases of
emergency, were embodied and did duty as foot
soldiers: these were dismounted, and proceeded,
by the order of Dunwoodie, to level the few
fences which might interfere with the intended
movements of the cavalry. The neglect of
husbandry
,
which had been occasioned by the war,
left this a comparatively easy task. Those long
lines of heavy and durable walls, which now sweep
through every part of the county, forty years ago
were unknown. The slight and tottering fences
of stone were then used more to clear the land
for the purposes of cultivation, than as
permanent
barriers in the divisions of estates, and
required
the constant attention of the husbandman,
to preserve them against the fury of the tempests
and the frosts of winter. Some few of them had
been built with more care immediately around the
dwelling of Mr. Wharton; but those which had
intersected
the vale below were now generally a
pile of ruins, over which the horses of the
Virginians
would bound with the fleetness of the wind.
Occasionally a short line yet preserved its erect
appearance, but as none of these crossed the
ground on which Dunwoodie intended to act, there
remained only the slighter fences of rails to be
thrown down. Their duty was hastily, but
effectually
,
performed; and the guides withdrew to the
post assigned to them for the approaching fight.
Major Dunwoodie had received from his scouts
all the intelligence concerning his foe, which was
necessary to enable him to make his arrangements.
The bottom of the valley was an even plain, that
fell with a slight inclination from the foot of the
hills on either side, to the level of a natural
meadow
that wound through the country on the banks
of a small stream, by whose waters it was often
inundated and fertilized. This brook was easily
forded in any part of its course; and the only
impediment
it offered to the movements of the horse,
was in a place where it changed its bed from the
western to the eastern side of the valley, and
where its banks were more steep and difficult of
access than common; here the highway crossed it
8*
by a rough wooden bridge, as it did again at the
distance of half a mile above the Locusts.
The hills on the eastern side of the valley were
abrupt, and frequently obtruded themselves in
rocky prominencies into its bosom, lessening the
width to half its usual dimensions. One of these
projections was but a short distance in the rear of
the squadron of dragoons, and Dunwoodie
directed
Captain Lawton to withdraw, with two troops,
behind its cover. The officer obeyed with a kind
of surly reluctance, that was, however, somewhat
lessened by the anticipations of the effect his
sudden
appearance would make on his enemy.
Dunwoodie
knew his man, and had selected the
Captain
to lead this service, both because he feared
his precipitation in the field, and knew, when
needed, his support would never fail to appear.
It was only in front of the enemy that Captain
Lawton was hasty; at all other times his
discernment
and self-possession were consummately
preserved
;
but he sometimes forgot them in his
eagerness
to engage. On the left of the ground on which
Dunwoodie intended to meet his foe, was a close
wood, which skirted that side of the valley for
the distance of a mile. Into this, then, the guides
retired, and took their station near its edge, in
such a manner as would enable them to maintain
a scattering, but effectual fire, on the advancing
column of the enemy.
It cannot be supposed that all these
preparations
were made unheeded by the inmates of the
cottage: on the contrary, every feeling which can
agitate the human breast, in witnessing such a
scene, was actively alive. Mr. Wharton alone
saw no hopes to himself in the termination of the
conflict. If the British should prevail, his son
would be liberated; but what would then be his
own fate! He had hitherto preserved his neutral
character in the midst of trying circumstances.
The fact of his having a son in the royal, or, as it
was called, the regular army, had very nearly
brought his estates to the hammer. Nothing had
obviated this result, but the powerful interest of
the relation, who held a high political rank in the
state, and his own vigilant prudence. In his heart,
he was a devoted loyalist; and when the blushing
Frances had communicated to him the wishes of
her lover, on their return from the American camp
the preceding spring, the consent he had given,
for her future union with a rebel, was as much
extracted
by the increasing necessity which existed
for his obtaining republican support, than by any
considerations for the happiness of his child.
Should his son now be rescued, he would, in the
public mind, be united with him as a plotter against
the freedom of the states; and should he remain a
captive, and undergo the impending trial, the
consequences
might be still more dreadful. Much as
he loved his wealth, Mr. Wharton loved his
children
better; and he sat gazing on the movements
without, with a listless vacancy in his countenance,
that denoted his imbecility of character.
Far different were the feelings of his son.
Captain
Wharton had been left in the keeping of two
dragoons; one of whom marched to and fro the
piazza
with a measured tread, and the other had been
directed to continue in the same apartment with his
prisoner. The young man had witnessed all the
movements of Dunwoodie with admiration, for the
ability he had displayed, and some fearful
anticipations
of the consequences to his friends. He
particularly
disliked the ambush of the detachment
under
Lawton, who could be distinctly seen from the
windows of the cottage, cooling his impatience, by
pacing on foot the ground in front of his men.
Henry Wharton threw several hasty and inquiring
glances around, to see if no means of liberation
would offer, but invariably found the eyes of his
sentinel fixed on him with the watchfulness of an
Argus. He longed, with the ardour of youth, to
join in the glorious fray, but was compelled to
remain
a dissatisfied spectator of a scene in which
he would so cheerfully have been an actor. Miss
Peyton and Sarah continued gazing on the
preparations
with varied emotions, in which concern for
the fate of the captain formed the most prominent
feeling, until the moment the shedding of blood
seemed approaching, when, with the timidity of
their sex, they sought the retirement of an inner
room. Not so Francesshe had returned to the
apartment where she had left Dunwoodie, and,
from one of its windows, been a deeply interested
spectator of all his movements. The wheelings
of the troops, the deadly preparations, had all been
unnoticed; the maid saw her lover only, and with
mingled emotions of admiration and dread that
nearly chilled her. At one moment the blood
rushed to her heart, as she saw the young warrior
riding gracefully, and with admirable skill, through
his ranks, evidently giving life and courage to all
whom he addressed; and the next, it curdled with
the thought, that the very gallantry she so much
valued, might soon prove the means of placing
the grave between her and the object of her
regard
.
Frances gazed until she could gaze no
longer.
In a field on the left of the cottage, and at a
short distance in the rear of the troops, were
a small group, whose occupations seemed to differ
from all around them. They were in number
only three, being two men and a mulatto boy. The
principal personage of this party was a man, whose
leanness made his really tall stature appear
excessive
he
wore spectacleswas unarmed, had
dismounted, and seemed to be dividing his
attention
between a segar, a book, and the incidents of
the field before him. To this party Frances
determined
to convey a note, directed to Dunwoodie.
She wrote hastily, with a pencil, Come to me,
Peyton, if it be but for a moment; and Csar
emerged from the cellar kitchen, taking the
precaution
to go by the rear of the building, to avoid
the sentinel on the piazza, who had very
cavalierly
ordered all the family to remain housed. The
black delivered the note to the gentleman, with a
request it might be forwarded to Major
Dunwoodie
.
It was the surgeon of the horse to whom
Csar addressed himself; and the teeth of the
African chattered, as he saw displayed upon the
ground, the several instruments which were in
preparation for the anticipated operations. The
doctor himself seemed to view the arrangement
with great satisfaction, as he deliberately raised
his eyes from his book to order the boy to convey
the note to his commanding officer, and then
dropping
them on the page continued his occupation.
Csar was slowly retiring, as the third personage,
who by his dress might be an inferior assistant of
the surgical department, coolly inquired if he
would have a leg taken off. This question
seemed
to remind the black of the existence of those
limbs, for he made such use of them as to
reach the piazza at the same instant that Major
Dunwoodie rode up at half speed. The brawny
sentinel squared himself, and poised his sword with
military precision, as he stood on his post while
his officer passed; but no sooner had the door
closed, than, turning to the negro, he said, with
great deliberation
Harkee, blacky, if you quit the house again
without my knowledge, I will shave off one of
those ebony ears with this razor.
Thus assailed in another member, Csar hastily
retreated into his kitchen, muttering something,
in which the words Skinner, and rebel rascal,
formed a principal part of his speech.
Major Dunwoodie, said Frances to her lover
as he entered, I may have done you injustice
if I have appeared harsh
The emotions of the agitated girl prevailed, and
she burst into tears.
Frances, cried the soldier with warmth,
you are never harshnever unjustbut when
you doubt my love.
Ah! Dunwoodie, added the now sobbing
maid, you are about to risk your life in battle
remember that there is one heart whose happiness
is built on your safetybrave I know you arebe
prudent
For your sake? inquired the delighted youth.
For my sake, replied Frances, in a voice
barely audible, and dropping on his bosom.
Dunwoodie folded her to his heart, and was
about to speak, as a trumpet sounded in the
southern end of the vale. Imprinting one long
kiss of affection on her unresisting lips, the soldier
tore himself from his mistress, and hastened to the
scene of strife.
Frances threw herself on a sofa, buried her head
under its cushion, and, with her shawl drawn over
her face, to exclude as much of sound as possible,
continued there until the shouts of the combatants,
the rattling of the fire arms, and the thundering
tread of the horses had ceased.
CHAPTER VI.
In peace, there's nothing so becomes a man,
As modest stillness, and humility:
But when the blast of war blows in our ears,
Then imitate the action of the tiger;
Stiffen the sinews, summon up the blood,
Disguise fair nature with hard favour'd rage:
I see you stand, like greyhounds in the slips,
Straining upon the start. The game's afoot;
Follow your spirit. And upon this charge
Cry
Shakspeare
.
The
rough and unimproved face of the
country
,
the frequency of covers, together with the
great distance from their own country, and the
facilities afforded them for rapid movements to the
different points of the war, by the undisputed
command of the ocean, had all united to deter the
English officers from employing a heavy force in
cavalry, in their efforts to subdue the revolted
colonies.
Only one regiment of regular horse was sent
from the mother country during the struggle.
But legions and independent corps were formed
in different places, as it best accorded with the
views of the royal commanders, or suited the
exigencies
of the times. These were not
unfrequently
composed of men raised in the colonies, and at
other times drafts were had from the regiments of
the line, and the soldier was made to lay aside the
musquet and bayonet, and taught to wield the
sabre and carabine. One particular body of the
subsidiary troops were included in this
arrangement
,
and the Hessian yagers were transformed
into a corps of heavy and inactive horse.
Opposed to them were the hardiest spirits of
America. Most of the cavalry regiments of the
continental army were led and officered by
gentlemen
from the south. The high and haughty
courage of the commanders had communicated
itself to the privates, who were men selected
with care and attention to the service they were
intended to perform.
While the British were confined to their empty
conquests in the possession of a few of the larger
towns, or marched through countries that were
swept of every thing like military supplies, the
light troops of their enemies had the range of the
whole of the interior before them.
The sufferings of the line of the American army
were great beyond example; but possessing the
power, and feeling themselves engaged in a cause
which justified severity, the horse were well
mounted
,
well fed, and consequently very effective.
Perhaps the world could not furnish more brave,
enterprising, and resistless corps of light cavalry
than were a few in the continental service at the
time of which we write.
Dunwoodie's men had often tried their prowess
against the enemy, and now sat panting to be led
once more against foes that they seldom charged
in vain. Their wishes were soon to be gratified;
for their commander had scarcely time to regain
his seat in the saddle, before a body of the enemy
came sweeping round the base of the hill, which
intersected the view to the south. A few minutes
enabled the Major to distinguish their character.
In one troop he saw the green coats of the
Cowboys
,
and in the other the leather helmets and
wooden saddles of the yagers. Their numbers
were about equal to the body under his immediate
orders.
On reaching the open space near to the cottage
of Harvey Birch, the enem halted and drew up
his men in line, and was evidently making
preparations
for a charge. At this moment a column
of foot appeared in the vale, and pressed forward
to the bank of the brook which we have already
mentioned.
Major Dunwoodie was not less distinguished for
coolness and judgment, than, where occasion
offered
,
by his dauntless intrepidity. He at once
saw his advantage, and determined to profit by it.
The column he led began slowly to retire from
the field, when the youthful German, who
commanded
the enemy's horse, fearful of missing an
easy conquest, gave the word to charge. Few
troops were more hardy than the Cow-boys; they
sprang eagerly forward in the pursuit with a
confidence
,
created by the retiring foe and the column
in their rear; the Hessians followed more slowly,
but in better order. The trumpets of the
Virginians
now sounded long and lively; they were
answered by a strain from the party in ambush
that went to the hearts of their enemies. The
column of Dunwoodie wheeled in perfect order,
opened, and, as the word to charge was given, the
troops of Lawton emerged from the cover, with
their leader in advance, waving his sabre over his
head, and shouting, in a voice that was heard
above the clangor of the martial music.
The charge threatened too much for the refugee
troop. They scattered in every direction, flying
from the field as fast as their horses, the chosen
beasts of Westchester, could carry them. Only
a few were hurt; but such as did meet the arms
of their avenging countrymen never survived the
blow, to tell who struck it. It was upon the poor
vassals of a German tyrant that the shock fell.
Disciplined to the most exact obedience, these
ill-fated
men met the charge bravely, but they were
9
swept before the mettled horses and nervous arms
of their antagonists like chaff before the wind.
Many of them were literally ridden down, and
Dunwoodie soon saw the field without an
opposing
foe. The proximity of the infantry prevented
pursuit, and it was behind its column that the few
Hessians who escaped unhurt sought protection.
The more cunning refugees dispersed in small
bands, taking various and devious routes back to
their old station in front of Harlaem. Many was the
sufferer, in his cattle, furniture, and person, that
was created by this route; for the dispersion of a
troop of Cow-boys was only the extension of an evil.
Such a scene could not be expected to be acted
so near them, and the inmates of the cottage take
no interest in the result. In truth, the feelings
it excited pervaded every bosom, from the kitchen
to the parlour. Terror and horror had prevented
the ladies from being spectators, but they did not
feel the less. Frances continued lying in the
posture
we have mentioned, offering up fervent and
incoherent petitions for the safety of her
countrymen
,
although in her inmost heart she had
personified
her nation by the graceful image of Major
Dunwoodie. Her aunt and sister were less
exclusive
in their devotions, but Sarah began to feel,
as the horrors of war were thus brought home to
her senses, less pleasure in her anticipated
triumphs
.
The inmates of Mr. Wharton's kitchen were
fournamely, Csar and his spouse, their
granddaughter
,
a jetty damsel of twenty, and the boy
before alluded to. The blacks were the remnants
of a race of negroes which had been entailed on
his estate from Mr. Wharton's maternal ancestors,
who had been descendants from the early Dutch
colonists. Time, depravity, and death, had
reduced
them to this small number, and the boy,
who was white, had been added by Miss Peyton
to the establishment, as an assistant, to perform
the ordinary services of a footman. Csar, after
first using the precaution to place himself under
the cover of an angle of the wall, for a screen
against any roving bullet which might be
traversing
the air, became an amused spectator of the
skirmish. The sentinel on the piazza was at the
distance of but a few feet from him, and entered
into the spirit of the chase with all the ardour of a
tried blood-houndhe noticed the approach of the
black, and his judicious position with a smile of
contempt, as he squared himself towards the
enemy
,
offering his unprotected breast to any dangers
which might come.
After considering the arrangement of Csar for
a moment with ineffable disdain, the dragoon said
with great coolness
You seem very careful of that beautiful
person
of yours, Mr. Blueskin.
I guess a bullet hurt a coloured man as quick
as a white, muttered the black surlily, casting
a glance at his rampart with much
self-satisfaction
.
I'm thinking it's all guess with you,
snowball
suppose
I make the experiment; as he
spoke, he deliberately drew a pistol from his belt
and levelled it at the black. Csar's teeth
chattered
at the appearance of the dragoon,
although
he believed nothing serious was
intended
;
and it was at this moment that the column of
Dunwoodie began to retire, and the royal cavalry
commenced their charge.
There, Mister Light-horseman, said Csar
eagerly, as he believed the Americans were
retiring
in earnest, why you rebels don't fightsee
see how King George's men make Major
Dunwoodie
rungood gentleman too, but don't like
to fight a rig'lars.
Damn your regulars, cried the other fiercely;
wait a minute, blackey, and you'll see Captain
Jack Lawton come out from behind yonder hill,
and scatter these Cow-boys like wild geese who've
lost their leader.
Csar had supposed the party under Lawton
to have sought the shelter of the hill from similar
motives to what had induced him to place the wall
between himself and the battle ground: but the
fact soon verified the trooper's prophecy, and the
black witnessed with consternation the total route
of the royal horse.
The sentinel had manifested his exultation at
the success of his comrades with loud shouts,
which soon brought his companion, who had been
left in the more immediate charge of Henry
Wharton
,
to the open window of the parlour.
See, Tom, see, cried the delighted trooper,
how Captain Lawton makes that Hessian's
leather cap fly; and now the major has killed the
officer's horsezounds, why didn't he kill the
Dutchman, and save the horse?
A few pistols were discharged at the flying
Cow-boys, and a spent bullet broke a pane of
glass within a few feet of Csarimitating the
posture of the great tempter of our race, the black
sought the protection of the inside of the building,
and immediately ascended to the parlour.
The small lawn in front of the Locusts was hid
from the view of the road by a close line of
shrubbery
,
and the horses of the dragoons had been left
linked together under its shelter to await the
movements of their masters.
At this moment two Cow-boys, who had been
cut off from a retreat to their own party, rode
furiously through the gate, with an intention of
escaping to the open wood in the rear of the
cottage.
The victorious Americans had pressed the
retreating
Germans until they had driven them
under
the protection of the fire of the infantry; and
feeling themselves in the privacy of the lawn
relieved
from any immediate danger, the predatory
warriors yielded to a temptation that few of the
corps were ever known to resistopportunity and
horse-flesh. With a hardihood and presence of
mind that could only exist from long practice in
similar scenes, they made towards their intended
prizes by an almost spontaneous movement. They
were busily engaged in separating the fastenings
of the horses, when the trooper on the piazza
discharged
his pistols, and rushed sword in hand to
the rescue.
The entrance of Csar into the parlour had
induced the wary dragoon within to turn his
attention
more closely on his prisoner; but this
new interruption drew him again to the window.
He threw his body out of the building, and with
dreadful imprecations endeavoured by his threats
and appearance, to frighten the marauders from
their prey. The moment was enticing. Three
hundred of his comrades were within a mile of
the cottage; unridden horses were running at
large in every direction, and Henry Wharton
seized the unconscious sentinel by his legs, and
threw him headlong into the lawn.Csar
vanished
from the room, and drew a bolt of the outer
door.
The fall of the soldier was not great, and
recovering
his feet, he turned his fury for a moment
on his prisoner. To scale the window in the face
of his enemy, was, however, impossible, and on
trial he found the main entrance barred.
His comrade now called loudly upon his aid,
and forgetful of every thing else, the discomfited
trooper rushed to his assistance. One horse was
9*
instantly liberated, but the other was already
fastened
to the saddle of a Cow-boy, and the four
retired
behind the building, cutting furiously at each
other with their sabres, and making the air
resound
with the violence of their imprecations.
Csar threw the outer door open, and pointing to
the horse, who was quietly biting the faded
herbage
of the lawn, exclaimed
RunnowrunMassa Harry, run.
Yes, cried the youth as he vaulted into the
saddle, now, indeed, my honest fellow, is the
time to run. He beckoned hastily to his father,
who stood at the window in speechless anxiety,
with his hands extended towards his child in the
attitude of benediction, and adding, God bless
you, Csar, salute the girls, dashed through the
gate with the rapidity of lightning.
The African watched him with anxiety as he
gained the highway, saw him incline to the right,
and riding furiously under the brow of some rocks,
which on that side rose perpendicularly, and
disappear
behind a projection, which soon hid him
from view.
The delighted Csar closed the door, pushing
bolt after bolt, and turning the key until it would
turn no more, soliloquizing the whole time on the
happy escape of his young master.
How well he rideteach him myselfsalute
a young ladyI guess a Miss Fanny would'nt let
old coloured man kiss her pretty red cheek.
When the fortune of the day was decided, and
the time arrived for the burial of the dead, two
Cow-boys and a Virginian were found in the rear
of the Locusts to be included in the number.
Happily for Henry Wharton, the searching eyes
of his captor were examining, through a pocket
glass, the column of infantry that still held its
position
on the bank of the stream, as the remnants
of the Hessian yagers were seeking its friendly
protection. His horse was of the best blood of
Virginia, and carried him with the swiftness of the
wind along the valley, and the heart of the youth
was already beating tumultuously with the
pleasure
of his deliverance, when a well known voice
reached his startled ear, crying aloud
Bravely doneCaptaindon't spare the
whip, and turn to your left before you cross the
brook.
Wharton turned his head in surprise, and saw,
sitting on the point of a jutting rock that
commanded
a bird's-eye view of the valley, his former
guide, Harvey Birch. His pack much diminished
in size lay at the feet of the pedlar, who waved
his hat to the youth exultingly as the latter flew
by him. The English captain took the advice of
this mysterious being, and finding a wood road,
which led to the highway that intersected the
valley
,
turned down its direction, was soon opposite
to his friends, and the next minute crossed the
bridge, and stopped his charger before his old
acquaintance
,
Colonel Wellmere.
Captain Wharton! exclaimed the astonished
commander of the English troops, dressed in
blue and mounted on a rebel dragoon horse! are
you from the clouds in this attire, and in such a
style?
Thank God! cried the youth, recovering
his breath, I am safe, and escaped from the
hands of my enemies; but five minutes since and
I was a prisoner and threatened with the gallows.
The gallows, Captain Wharton! surely those
traitors to their king would never dare to commit
another murder in cold blood; is it not enough
that they took the life of Andr? wherefore did
they threaten you with a similar fate?
Under the pretence of a similar offence,
said the captain, briefly explaining to the group of
listeners the manner of his capture, the grounds
for his personal apprehensions, and the method of
his escape. By the time he had concluded his
narration, the fugitive Germans had collected in
the rear of the column of infantry, and Colonel
Wellmere cried aloud
From my soul I congratulate you, my brave
friendmercy is a quality with which these
traitors
are unacquainted, and you are doubly
fortunate
in escaping from their hands, and uninjured.
Prepare yourself to grant me your assistance, and
I will soon afford you a noble revenge.
I do not think there was danger of personal
outrage to any man, Colonel Wellmere, from a
party where Major Dunwoodie commands,
returned
young Wharton, with a slight glow on his
face; his character is above the impeachment of
such an offence; neither do I think it altogether
prudent to cross this brook into the open plain,
in the face of those Virginian horse, flushed as
they must be with the success they have just
obtained
.
Do you call the route of those irregulars and
these sluggish Hessians, a deed to boast of? said
the other with a contemptuous smile; you speak
of the affair, Captain Wharton, as if your boasted
Mr. Dunwoodie, for major he is none, had
discomfited
the body guards of your king.
And I must be allowed to say, Colonel
Wellmere
,
that if the body guards of my king were in
yon field, they would meet a foe that it would be
dangerous to despise. Sir, my boasted Mr.
Dunwoodie
is the pride of Washington's army as a
cavalry
officer, cried Henry with warmth.
DunwoodieDunwoodie, repeated the
colonel
slowly; surely I have met the gentleman
before.
I have been told you once saw him, sir, for a
moment, at the town residence of my sisters,
replied
Wharton, with a lurking smile.
Ah! I do remember me of such a youth,
said the Colonel with affected irony; and does
the most potent congress of these rebellious
colonies
intrust their soldiers to the leading of such a
warrior?
Ask the commander of your Hessian horse,
whether he thinks Major Dunwoodie worthy of
the confidence, said Henry Wharton keenly,
feeling indignant at the trifling of the other, when
applied to such a man as his friend, and at a
moment
so unseasonable.
Colonel Wellmere was far from wanting that
kind of pride which makes a man bear himself
bravely in the presence of his enemies. He had
served in America a long time without ever
meeting
with any but new raised levies, or the militia
of the country; these would sometimes fight, and
that fearlessly, but they as often chose to run
away without pulling a trigger. He was too
apt to judge from externals, and thought it
impossible
for men, whose gaiters were so clean,
whose tread so regular, and who wheeled with so
much accuracy, to be beaten. In addition to all
these, they were Englishmen, and their success
was certain. Colonel Wellmere had never been
kept much in the field, or these notions, which he
had brought with him from home, and which had
been greatly increased by the vaporings of a
garrisoned
town, would have long since vanishedhe
listened to the warm reply of Captain Wharton
with a supercilious smile, and then inquired
You would not have us retire, sir, before these
boasted horsemen, without doing something that
may deprive them of part of the glory you appear
to think they have gained?
I would have you advised, Colonel Wellmere,
of the danger you are about to encounter.
Danger is but an unseemly word for a
soldier
,
continued the British commander with a
sneer.
And one as little dreaded by the 60th as any
corps who wear the royal livery, cried Henry
Wharton fiercely; give but the word to charge,
and then let our actions speak.
Now again I know my young friend, said
Wellmere soothingly; but if you have any thing
to say before we fight, that can in any manner
help us in our attack, we'll listen. You know
the force of the rebelsare there more of them
in ambush?
Yes, replied the youth, chafing still with the
other's sneers, in the skirt of this wood on our
right are a small party of foottheir horse are all
before you.
Where they will not continue long, cried
Wellmere, turning to the few officers around him;
gentlemen, we will cross the stream in column,
and display on the plain beyond, or else we shall
not be able to entice these valiant yankies within
the reach of our muskets. Captain Wharton, I
claim your assistance as an aid-de-camp.
The youth shook his head in disapprobation of
a movement which his good sense taught him was
rash, but prepared with alacrity to perform his
duty in the impending trial.
During this conversation, which was held at a
small distance in advance of the British column,
and in full view of the Americans, Dunwoodie
had been collecting his scattered troops, securing
his few prisoners, and retiring to the ground where
he had been posted at the first appearance of his
enemy. Satisfied with the success he had
already
obtained, and believing the English too
wary too give him an opportunity of harrassing
them farther, he was about to withdraw the guides,
and, leaving a strong party on the ground to watch
the movements of the regulars, to fall back a few
miles to a favorable place for taking up his
quarters
for the night. Captain Lawton was
reluctantly
listening to the reasoning of his commander,
and had brought out his favorite glass, to see if
no opening could be found for an advantageous
attack
,
when he suddenly exclaimed
How's this? a blue coat among those scarlet
gentry, again applying his glass to his eye, as
I hope to live to see old Virginia, it is my
masquerading
friend of the 60th, the handsome
Captain
Wharton escaped from two of the best men
in my troop.
He had not done speaking when the survivor of
these heroes joined, bringing with him his own
and the horses of the Cow-boys; he reported the
death of his comrade, and the escape of his
prisoner
.
As the deceased was the immediate sentinel
over the person of young Wharton, and the other
was not to be blamed for defending the horses,
which were more particularly under his care, his
captain heard him with uneasiness, but without
anger.
This intelligence made an entire change in the
views of Major Dunwoodie. He saw at once that
his own reputation was involved in the escape of
his prisoner. The orders to recal the guides was
countermanded, and he now joined his second in
command, watching as eagerly as the impetuous
Lawton for some opening to assail his foe to
advantage
.
But two hours before and Dunwoodie had felt
the chance, which made Henry Wharton his
captive, as the severest blow he had ever
sustained
.
Now he panted for an opportunity in which,
by risking his own life, he might return his friend
to bondageall other considerations were lost in
the goadings of his wounded spirit, and he might
have soon emulated Lawton in hardihood, had not
Wellmere and his troops at this moment crossed
the brook into the open plain.
There, cried the delighted captain, as he
pointed out the movement with his finger, there
comes John Bull into the mouse trap, and with his
eyes wide open.
Surely, said Dunwoodie eagerly, he will
not display his column on that flat; Wharton must
tell him of the ambush. But if he doesWe
will not leave him a dozen sound skins in his
battalion, interrupted the other, springing into
his saddle.
The truth was soon apparent; for the English
column, after advancing for a short distance on
the level land, displayed with an accuracy that
would have done them honour on a field day in
their own Hyde Park.
Prepare to mountmount; cried
Dunwoodie
;
the last word being repeated by Lawton
in a tone that rung in the ears of Csar, as he
stood at the open window of the cottage The
black had lost all his confidence in Captain
Lawton's
timidity, for he thought he yet saw him
emerging from his cover and waving his sword on
high.
As the British line advanced slowly and in
exact
order, the guides opened a galling fire. It
began
to annoy that part of the royal troops which
was nearest to them. Wellmere listened to the
advice of the veteran who was next to him in
rank, and ordered two companies to dislodge the
American foot from their hiding place. The
movement created a slight confusion, and
Dunwoodie
seized the opportunity to charge. No
ground could be more favorable for the
manuvres
of horse, and the attack of the Virginians was
irresistible. It was aimed chiefly at the flank
opposite
to the wood, in order to clear the
Americans
from the fire of their friends who were
concealed
and
it was completely successful.
Wellmere
was on the left of his line, and was
overthrown
by the impetuous fury of his assailants.
Dunwoodie was in time to save him from the
impending
blow of one of his men, and raising him
from the ground, had him placed on a horse and
delivered to the custody of his orderly. The
officer
who had suggested the attack upon the guides,
had been intrusted with its execution, but the
menace
was sufficient for these irregulars. In fact,
their duty was performed, and they retired along
the skirt of the wood with intent to regain their
horses, which had been left under a guard at the
upper end of the valley.
The left of the British line had been outflanked
by the Americans, who had doubled in their rear,
and had thus made the route in that quarter
total
.
But the second in command perceiving how
the battle went, promptly wheeled his party, and
threw in a heavy fire on the dragoons as they
passed him to the charge; with this party was
Henry Wharton who had volunteered to assist
in dispersing the guides: a ball had struck his
bridle arm, and compelled him to change hands.
As the dragoons dashed by them, rending the air
with their shouts, and with trumpets sounding a
lively strain, the charger ridden by the youth
became ungovernablehe plunged, reared, and
his rider being unable with his wounded arm to
manage the impatient animal, Henry Wharton
found himself in less than a minute, unwillingly
riding by the side of Captain Lawton. The
dragoon
10
comprehended at a glance the ludicrous
situation
of this new comrade, but had only time to
cry aloud before they plunged into the English
line
The horse knows the righteous cause better
than his rider. Captain Wharton, you are
welcome
to the ranks of freedom.
No time was lost, however, by Lawton, after
the charge was completed, in securing his prisoner
again; and, perceiving him to be hurt, he directed
him to be conveyed to the rear.
The Virginian troopers dealt out their favours
with no gentle hands on that part of the royal
foot who were thus left in a great measure at their
mercy. Dunwoodie noticing the remnant of the
Hessians, who had again ventured on the plain,
led on in pursuit, and easily overtaking their light
and half-fed horses, soon destroyed the remainder
of their detachment.
In the meanwhile, great numbers of the
English
,
taking advantage of the smoke and confusion
on the battle ground, were enabled to get in the
rear of their countrymen, who still preserved their
order in a line parallel to the wood, but who had
been obliged to hold their fire from the fear of
injuring
friends as well as foes. The fugitives were
directed to form a second line within the wood
itself, and under cover of its trees. This was not
yet done, when Captain Lawton, called to a youth,
who commanded the other troop left with that part
of the force which remained on the ground, and
proposed charging the unbroken line of the British.
The proposal was as promptly accepted as it had
been made, and the troops were arrayed for the
purpose. The eagerness of their leader
prevented
the preparations necessary to insure success,
and the horse receiving a destructive fire as they
advanced, were thrown into additional confusion.
Both Lawton and his more juvenile comrade fell
at this discharge. Fortunately for the credit of
the Virginians, Major Dunwoodie re-entered the
field at this critical instanthe saw his troops in
disorderat his feet lay weltering in his blood
George Singleton, a youth endeared to him by
numberless virtues, and Lawton was unhorsed and
stretched senseless on the plain. The eye of the
youthful warrior flashed with unwonted fires.
Riding between his squadron and the enemy, in a
voice that reached to the hearts of his dragoons,
he recalled them to their duty. His presence
and words acted like magic. The clamour of
voices ceased; the line was formed promptly and
with exactitude; the charge sounded, and led on
by their commander, the Virginians swept across
the plain with an impetuosity that nothing could
withstand, and the field was instantly cleared of the
enemy; what were not destroyed sought a shelter
in the woods. Dunwoodie slowly withdrew from
the fire of the English who were covered by the
trees, and commenced the painful duty of
collecting
his dead and wounded.
The sergeant, charged with conducting Henry
Wharton to where he might procure surgical aid,
set about performing his duty with alacrity, in
order to return as soon as possible to the scene of
strife. They had not reached the middle of the
plain, before the captain noticed a man whose
appearance
and occupation forcibly arrested his
attention
.
His head was bald and bare, but a
well-powdered
wig was to be seen half concealed in the
pocket of his breeches. His coat was off, and
his arms naked to the elbowblood had disfigured
much of his dress, and his hands and even face bore
this mark of his professionin his mouth was a
segarin his right hand some instruments of
strange formation, and in his left the remnants of
an apple, with which he occasionally relieved the
duty of his before mentioned segar. He was
standing, lost in the contemplation of a Hessian
who lay breathless before him. At a little
distance
were three or four of the guides, leaning on
their muskets, and straining their eyes in the
direction
of the combatants, and at his elbow stood
a man who, from the implements in his hand and
bloody vestments, was an assistant in his duty.
There, sir, is the doctor, said the attendant
of Henry very coolly; he will patch up your
arm in the twinkling of an eye; and beckoning to
the guides to approach, he whispered and pointed
to his prisoner; and then galloped furiously
towards
his comrades.
Wharton advanced to the side of this strange
figure, and observing himself to be unnoticed, was
about to request his assistance, when the other
broke silence in a soliloquy
Now I know this man to have been killed by
Captain Lawton, as well as if I had seen him strike
the blow. How often have I strove to teach him
the manner in which he can disable his adversary
without destroying life. It is cruel thus
unnecessarily
to cut off the human race, and furthermore,
such blows as these render professional assistance
unnecessaryit is in a measure treating the lights
of science with disrespect.
If, sir, your leisure will admit, said Henry
Wharton, I must beg your attention to this slight
hurt of mine.
Ah! cried the other starting, and examining
him from head to foot, you are from the field
belowis there much business there, sir?
Indeed, answered Henry, accepting the
offer
of the surgeon to assist in removing his coat,
'tis a stirring time, I can assure you.
Stirring! repeated the surgeon, busily
employed
with his dressings, you give me great
pleasure, sir, for so long as they can stir there
must be life, and while there is life you know,
there is hopebut here my art is of no useI
did put in the brains of one patient, but I rather
think the man must have been dead before I saw
himit is a curious case, sir; I will take you to
see itonly across the fence there, where you
may perceive so many bodies together. Ah! the
ball has glanced around the bone without
shattering
ityou are fortunate in falling into the hands
of an old practitioner, or you might have lost this
limb.
Indeed! said Henry with a slight uneasiness,
I did not apprehend the injury to be so serious.
Oh! the hurt is not bad, but you have such a
pretty arm for an operation, replied the surgeon
coolly, the pleasure of the thing might easily
tempt a novice.
The devil! cried the horror-struck captain,
can there be any pleasure in mutilating a
fellow
creature?
Sir, said the surgeon with great gravity, a
scientific amputation is a very pretty operation,
and doubtless might tempt a younger man, in the
hurry of business, to overlook all the particulars of
the case.
Further conversation was interrupted by the
appearance of the dragoons, slowly marching
towards
their former halting place, and new
appliplications
from the slightly wounded soldiers who
now came riding in, making hasty demands on the
skill of the doctor.
The guides took charge of Wharton, and with a
heavy heart, the young man retraced his steps to
his father's cottage.
The English had lost in the charges about one
third of their foot, but the remainder had been
rallied in the wood, and Dunwoodie, perceiving
10*
them to be too strongly posted to assail, had
left a strong party with Captain Lawton, with
orders
to watch their motions, and seize every
opportunity
to harrass them before they
re-embarked
.
Intelligence had reached the major of another
party being out by the way of the Hudson, and
his duty required that he should hold himself in
readiness to defeat the intentions of these also.
Captain Lawton received his orders with strong
injunctions to make no efforts on the foe unless
a favourable chance should offer. The injury
received
by this officer was in the head, being
stunned by a glancing bullet, and parting with a
laughing declaration from the major, that if he
again forgot himself, they should all think him
more materially hurt, each took his own course.
The British were a light party without baggage,
that had been sent out to destroy certain stores
understood to be collecting for the use of the
American army. They now retired through the
woods to the heights, and keeping the route along
their summits, in places unassailable by cavalry,
commenced their retreat to their boats.
CHAPTER VIII.
With fire and sword the country round
Was wasted far and wide;
And many a childing mother then,
And new born infant died;
But things like these, you know, must be
At every famous victory.
The
last sounds of the combat died on the ears
of the anxious listeners in the cottage, and was
succeeded
by the stillness of suspense. Frances had
continued by herself, striving to exclude the
uproar
,
and vainly endeavouring to summon
resolution
to meet the dreaded result. The ground
where the charge on the foot had taken place,
was but a short mile from the Locusts, and, in the
intervals of the musketry, the voices of the
soldiery
had even reached the ears of its inhabitants.
After witnessing the escape of his son, Mr.
Wharton
had joined his sister and eldest daughter in
their retreat, and the three continued fearfully
waiting news from the field. Unable longer to
remain under the painful uncertainty of her
situation, Frances soon added herself to the
uneasy
group, and Csar was directed to examine
into the state of things without, and report on
whose banners victory had alighted. The father
now briefly related to his astonished children the
circumstance and manner of their brother's escape.
They were yet in the freshness of their surprise
when the door opened, and Captain Wharton,
attended
by a couple of the guides, and followed by
the black, stood before them.
Henrymy sonmy son, cried the agitated
parent, stretching out his arms, yet unable to rise
from his seat, what is it I seeare you again a
captive, and in danger of your life.
The better fortune of these rebels has
prevailed
,
said the youth, endeavouring to force a
cheerful smile, and taking a hand of each of his
distressed sisters. I strove nobly for my liberty,
but the perverse spirit of rebellion has even
lighted
on their horses. The steed I mounted
carried
me, greatly against my will I acknowledge,
into the very centre of Dunwoodie's men.
And you were again captured, continued the
father, casting a fearful glance on the armed
attendants
who had entered the room.
That, sir, you may safely say; this Mr.
Lawton
,
who sees so far, had me in custody again
immediately
.
Why you didn't hold 'em in, Massa Harry?
cried Csar, advancing eagerly, and disregarding
the anxious looks and pallid cheeks of the female
listeners.
That, said Wharton, smiling, was a thing
easier said than done, Mr. Csar, especially as
these gentlemen (glancing his eyes at the guides)
had seen proper to deprive me of the use of my
better arm.
Wounded! exclaimed both sisters in a breath,
catching a view of the bandages.
A mere scratch, but disabling me at a most
critical moment, continued the brother kindly,
and stretching out the injured limb to manifest
the truth of his declaration. Csar threw a look
of bitter animosity on the irregular warriors who
were thought to have had an agency in the deed,
and left the room. A few more words sufficed to
explain all that Captain Wharton knew relative
to the fortune of the day. The result he thought
yet doubtful, for when he left the ground, the
Virginians were retiring from the field of battle.
They had tree'd the squirrel, said one of the
sentinels abruptly, and didn't quit the ground
without leaving a good hound for the chase, when
he comes down.
Ay, added his comrade drily, I'm thinking
Captain Lawton will count the noses of what are
left before they see their whale-boats.
Frances had stood supporting herself by the
back of a chair, during this dialogue, catching, in
breathless anxiety, every syllable as it was
uttered
her
colour changed rapidlyher limbs shook
under heruntil, with desperate resolution, she
inquired
Is any officer hurt ontheon either side?
Yes, answered the man cavalierly, these
southern youths are so full of mettle, that it's
seldom
we fight but one or two gets knocked over
one of the wounded, who came up before the
troops, told me, that Captain Singleton was killed,
and Major Dunwoodie
Frances heard no more, but fell back lifeless
in the chair behind her. The attention of her
friends soon revived her, when the captain,
turning
to the man, said, fearfully
Surely Major Dunwoodie is unhurt.
Never fear him, added the guide,
disregarding
the agitation of the family, they say a man
who is born to be hung will never be drownedif
a bullet could kill the major, he would have been
dead long ago. I was going to say, that the major
is in a sad taking because of the captain's being
killed; but had I known how much store the lady
sat by him, I would'nt have been so plain
spoken
.
Frances now rose quickly from her seat, with
cheeks glowing with confusion, and leaning on
her aunt, was about to retire, when Dunwoodie
himself appeared. The first emotion of the maid,
when she saw him, was unalloyed happiness; in
the next instant she shrunk back appalled from
the unusual expression that reigned in his
countenance
.
The sternness of battle yet sat on his
browhis eye was fixed, penetrating and severe.
The smile of affection that used to lighten his
dark features, on meeting his mistress, was
supplanted
by the lowering look of care; his whole
soul seemed to be absorbed with one
engrossing
emotion, and he proceeded at once to his
object.
Mr. Wharton, he earnestly began, in times
like these, we need not stand on idle ceremony
one of my officers, I am afraid, is hurt mortally;
and presuming on your hospitality, I have brought
him to your door.
I am happy, sir, that you have done so, said
Mr. Wharton, at once perceiving the importance
to his son, of conciliating the American troops;
the necessitous are always welcome, and doubly
so, in being the friend of Major Dunwoodie.
Sir, I thank you for myself, and in behalf of
him who is unable to render you his thanks,
returned
the other hastily; If then you please, we
will have him conducted where the surgeon may
see and report upon his case without delay. To
this there could be no objection, and Frances felt
a chill at her heart, as her lover withdrew without
casting a solitary look on herself.
There is a devotedness in female love that
admits
of no rivalry. All the tenderness of the
heartall the powers of the imagination, are
enlisted
in behalf of the tyrant passion, and where
all is given much is looked for in return.
Frances
had spent hours of anguishof torture, on
behalf
of Dunwoodie, and he now met her without a
smile, and left her without a greeting. The ardor
of feeling in the maid was unabated, but the
elasticity
of her hopes was weakened. As the
supporters
of the nearly lifeless body of Dunwoodie's
friend, passed her in their way to the apartment
prepared for his reception, she caught a view of
this seeming rival in her interest with her lover.
His pale and ghastly countenance, sunken eye,
and difficult breathing, gave her a glimpse of
death in its most fearful form. Dunwoodie was
by his side and held his hand, giving frequent and
stern injunctions to the men to proceed with care,
and, in short, manifested all the solicitude that the
most tender friendship could, on such an occasion,
inspire. The maid moved lightly before them,
and, with an averted face, held open the door for
their passage to the bed; it was only as the major
touched her garments on entering the room, that
she ventured to raise her mild blue eyes to his
face. But the glance was unreturned, and
Frances
unconsciously sighed as she sought the
solitude
of her own apartment.
Captain Wharton voluntarily gave a pledge to
his keepers not to attempt again escaping, and then
proceeded to execute those duties on behalf of
his father, which were thought necessary in a host.
On entering the passage for that purpose, he met
the operator, who had so dexterously dressed his
arm, advancing to the room of the wounded
officer
.
Ah! cried the disciple of Esculapius, I see
you are doing wellbut stophave you a pin?
No! here, I have oneyou must keep the cold
air from your hurt, or some of the youngsters will
be at work at you yet.
God forbid, muttered the captain in an
under
tone, and attentively adjusting the bandages,
when Dunwoodie appeared at the door,
impatiently
crying aloud
HastenSitgreaveshasten, or George
Singleton
will die from loss of blood.
What! Singleton! God forbidbless meis
it Georgepoor little George, exclaimed the
surgeon as he quickened his pace with evident
emotion, and hastened to the side of the bed; he
is alive though, and while there is life there is
hope. This is the first serious case I have had to
day, where the patient was not already dead.
Captain Lawton teaches his men to strike with so
little discretionpoor Georgebless me, it is a
musket bullet.
The youthful sufferer turned his eyes on the man
of science, and with a faint smile endeavoured to
stretch forth his hand. There was an appeal in
the look and action that touched the heart of the
operator, with a force that was irresistible. The
surgeon removed his spectacles to wipe an
unusual
moisture from his eyes, and proceeded
carefully
to the discharge of his dutywhile the
previous
arrangements were, however, making, he
gave vent in some measure to his feelings by
saying
When it is only a bullet I have always some
hopesthere is a chance that it hits nothing
vital
but
bless me, Captain Lawton's men cut so
at randomgenerally sever the jugular, or let out
the brains, and both are so difficult to remedy
the patient mostly dying before one can get at
themI never had success but once in replacing
a man's brains, although I tried three this very
day. It is easy to tell where Lawton's troop
charge in a battle, they cut so at random.
The group around the bed of Captain
Singleton
were too much accustomed to the manner of
their surgeon, to regard or reply to his soliloquy;
but they quietly awaited the moment when he was
to commence his examination. This now took
place, and Dunwoodie stood looking the operator
in the face with an expression that seemed to
read his soul. The patient shrunk from the
application
of the probe, and a smile stole over the
features of the surgeon, as he muttered
There has been nothing before it in that
quarter. He now applied himself in earnest to
his work, took off his spectacles, and threw aside
his wig. All this time Dunwoodie stood in
feverish
silence, holding one of the hands of the
sufferer
in both his own, watching the countenance
of Doctor Sitgreaves. At length Singleton gave
a slight groan, and the surgeon rose with alacrity,
and said aloud
Ah! there is some pleasure in following a
bullet, it may be said to meander through the
human
body, injuring nothing vital; but as for
Captain
Lawton's men
Speak, interrupted Dunwoodie in a voice
hardly articulate; is there hopecan you find the
ball?
It's no difficult matter to find that which one
has in his hand, Major Dunwoodie, replied the
surgeon coolly, and preparing his dressings; it
took what that literal fellow, Captain Lawton,
calls a circumbendibus, a route never taken by the
swords of his men, notwithstanding the multiplied
pains I have been at to teach him how to cut
scientifically
.
Now I saw a horse this day with his
head half severed from his body.
That, said Dunwoodie, as the blood rushed
to his cheeks again, and his dark eyes sparkled
with the rays of hope revived, was some of my
own handy-work; I killed that horse myself.
You! exclaimed the surgeon, dropping his
11
dressings in surprise, you! but then you knew
it was a horse.
I had such suspicions, I own, said the Major
smiling, holding a beverage to the lips of his
friend.
Such blows alighting on the human frame are
fatal, continued the doctor, pursuing his
business
,
and set at nought all the benefits which
flow from the lights of science; they are useless
in a battle, for disabling your foe is all that is
required
.
I have sat, Major Dunwoodie, many a
cold hour, while Captain Lawton has been
engaged
,
and after all my expectation, not a single
case worth recording has occurredall scratches
or death wounds; ah! the sabre is a sad weapon
in unskilful hands. Now, Major Dunwoodie,
many are the hours I have thrown away in
endeavouring
to impress this on Captain Lawton.
The impatient major pointed silently to his
friend, and the surgeon quickened his movements
as he continued
Ah! poor Georgeit is a narrow chance
buthe was interrupted by a messenger
requiring
the presence of the commanding officer in the
field. Dunwoodie pressed the hand of his friend,
and beckoned the doctor to follow him, as he
withdrew
.
What think you? he whispered on reaching
the passage, will he live?
He will; said the surgeon laconically,
turning
on his heel.
Thank God! cried the youth, hastening
below
.
Dunwoodie for a moment joined the family, who
were now collected in the ordinary parlour. His
face was no longer wanting in smiles, and his
salutations
,
though hasty, were cordial. He took
no notice of the escape and recapture of Henry
Wharton, but seemed to think the young man had
continued where he had left him before the
encounter
.
On the ground they had not met. The
English officer withdrew in haughty silence to a
window, leaving the major uninterruptedly to
make his communications.
The excitement produced by the events of the
day in the youthful feelings of the sisters, had been
succeeded by a languor that kept them both silent,
and it was with Miss Peyton that Dunwoodie held
his discourse.
Is there any hope, my cousin, that your friend
can survive his wound? said the lady, advancing
towards her kinsman with a smile of benevolent
regard.
Every thingmy dear madamevery thing,
answered the soldier cheerfully. Sitgreaves says
he will live, and he has never yet deceived me.
Your pleasure is not much greater than my
own at this intelligence. One so dear to Major
Dunwoodie cannot fail to excite an interest in the
bosom of his friends.
Say one so deservedly dear, madam,
returned
the major with warmth; he is the beneficent
spirit of the corpsequally beloved by us allso
mild, so equal, so just, so generous, with the
meekness of a lamb and the fondness of a dove
it is only in the hour of battle that Singleton is a
lion.
You speak of him as if he were your mistress,
Major Dunwoodie, observed the smiling spinster,
glancing her eye at her niece, who sat pale and
listening, in a corner of the room.
I love him as one, cried the excited youth;
but he requires care and nursingall now
depends
on the attention he receives.
Trust me, sir, said Miss Peyton with
dignity
,
he will want for nothing under this roof.
Pardon me, dear madam, cried the youth
hastily
;
you are all that is benevolent, but
Singleton
requires a care which many men would feel to
be irksome. It is at moments like these, and in
sufferings like his, that the soldier most finds
the want of female tenderness. As he spoke,
he turned his eyes on Frances with an expression
that again thrilled to the heart of the maiden
she rose from her seat with burning cheeks, and
said
All the attention that can with propriety be
given to a stranger will be cheerfully bestowed on
your friend.
Ah! cried the major, shaking his head, that
cold word propriety will kill him; he must be
fostered, cherished, soothed.
These are offices for a sister or a wife, said
the maid, with still increasing colour.
A sister! repeated the soldier, the blood
rushing to his own face tumultuously; a sister!
he has a sisterand one that might be here with
to-morrow's sun. He paused, mused in silence,
glanced his eye uneasily at Frances, and muttered
in an under toneSingleton requires it, and it
must be done.
The ladies had watched his varying countenance
in some surprise, and Miss Peyton now observed,
that
If there were a sister of Captain Singleton
near them, her presence would be gladly
requested
both by herself and nieces.
It must be, madam; it cannot well be
otherwise
,
replied Dunwoodie with a hesitation that
but ill agreed with his former declarations; she
shall be sent for express this very night. And
then, as if willing to change the subject, he
approached
Captain Wharton, and continued
mildly
Henry Wharton, to me honour is dearer than
lifebut in your hands I know it can safely be
confidedremain here unwatched, until we leave
the county, which will not be for some days to
come.
The distance in the manner of the English
officer
vanished, and taking the offered hand of the
other, he replied with warmthyour generous
confidence, Peyton, will not be abused, even
though the gibbet on which your Washington
hung Andr be ready for my own execution.
HenryHenry Wharton, said Dunwoodie
reproachfully, you little know the man who
leads our armies, or you would have spared him
that reproach; but duty calls me without. I leave
you where I could wish to stay myself, and where
you cannot be wholly unhappy.
In passing Frances, the maid received another
of those smiling looks of affection she so much
prized, and for a season she forgot the impression
made by his appearance after the battle.
Among the veterans that had been impelled by
the times to abandon the quiet of age for the
service
of their country was Colonel Singleton. He
was a native of Georgia, and had been for the
earlier
years of his life a soldier by profession. When
the struggle for liberty commenced, he offered his
services to his country, and from respect to his
character they had been accepted. His years and
health had, however, prevented his discharging the
active duties of the field, and he had been kept in
command of different posts of trust, where his
country
might receive the benefits of his vigilance and
fidelity without inconvenience to himself. For
the last year he had been entrusted with the passes
into the Highlands, and was now quartered, with
his daughter, but a short day's march above the
valley where Dunwoodie had met his enemy. His
only other child was the wounded officer we have
11*
mentioned. Thither then the major prepared to
despatch a messenger with the unhappy news of
the captain's situation, and charged with such an
invitation from the ladies as he did not doubt
would speedily bring the ardent sister to the couch
of her brother.
This duty performed, though with an
unwillingness
that only could make his former anxiety more
perplexing, Dunwoodie proceeded to the field
where his troops had again halted. The
remnant
of the English were already to be seen, over
the tops of the trees, marching on the heights
towards
their boats in compact order, and with
great watchfulness. The detachment of the
dragoons
under Lawton were a short distance on
their flank, eagerly awaiting a favourable moment
to strike a blow. In this manner both parties
were soon lost to the view.
A short distance above the Locusts was a small
village where several roads intersected each
other, and from which, consequently, access was
easy to the surrounding country. It was a
favourite
halting place of the horse, and frequently held
by the light parties of the American army during
their excursions below. Dunwoodie had been
the first to discover its advantages, and as it was
necessary for him to remain in the county until
further orders from above, it cannot be supposed
he overlooked them now. To this place, the
troops were directed to retire, carrying with
them their wounded; parties were already
employed
in the sad duty of interring the dead. In
making these arrangements, a new object of
embarrassment
presented itself to our young soldier.
In moving to and fro the field, he was struck with
the appearance of Colonel Wellmere seated by
himself, brooding over his misfortunes
uninterrupted
by any but the passing civilities of the
American officers. His anxiety on behalf of
Singleton
had hitherto banished the recollection of
his captive from the mind of Dunwoodie, and he
now approached him with apologies for his
neglect
.
The Englishman received his courtesies
with coolness, and complained of being injured
by what he affected to think was the accidental
stumbling of his horse. Dunwoodie, who had
seen one of his own men ride him down, and
doubtless with very little ceremony, slightly
smiled
,
as he offered him surgical assistance. This
could only be procured at the cottage, and
thither
they both proceeded.
Colonel Wellmere, cried young Wharton in
astonishment, as they entered, has the fortune
of war been thus cruel to you also; but you are
welcome to the house of my father, although I
could wish the introduction to have taken place
under more happy circumstances.
Mr. Wharton received this new guest with the
guarded caution that distinguished his manner,
and Dunwoodie left the room to seek the bedside
of his friend. Every thing here looked propitious,
and he acquainted the surgeon that another
patient
waited his skill in the room below. The
sound of the word was enough to set the doctor
in motion, and seizing his implements of office,
he went in quest of this new applicant for his
notice
.
At the door of the parlour he was met by
the ladies who were retiring. Miss Peyton
detained
him for a moment to inquire into the
welfare
of Captain Singleton, before she suffered him
to proceed. Frances smiled with something of
her natural archness of manner, as she
contemplated
the grotesque appearance of the
bald-headed
practitioner; but Sarah was too much agitated,
with the surprise of the unexpected interview
with the British Colonel, to notice his attire. It
has already been intimated that Colonel
Wellmere
was an old acquaintance of the family.
Sarah
had been so long absent from the city, that
she had in some measure been banished from the
remembrance of the gentleman, but the
recollections
of Sarah were more vivid. There is a period
in the life of every woman, when she may be said
to be predisposed to loveit is at the happy age
when infancy is lost in opening maturitywhen the
guileless heart beats with the joyous anticipations
of life which the truth can never realize, and when
the imagination forms images of perfection that
are copied after its own unsullied visions---it was
at this age that Sarah left the city, and she had
brought with her a picture of futurity, faintly
impressed
,
it is true, but which gained durability
from her solitude, and in which Wellmere had
been placed in the fore-ground. The surprise of
the meeting had in some measure overpowered
her, and after receiving the salutations of the
colonel
,
she had risen, in compliance with a signal
from her observant aunt, to withdraw.
Then, sir, observed Miss Peyton, after
listening
to the surgeon's account of his young patient,
we may be flattered with the expectations that
he will recover.
'Tis certain, madam, returned the doctor,
endeavouring, out of respect to the ladies, to
replace
his wig, 'tis certain with care and good
nursing.
In those he shall not be wanting, said the
spinster mildly. Every thing we have he can
command, and Major Dunwoodie has despatched
an express for his sister.
His sister, echoed the practitioner with a
look of particular meaning; if the Major has sent
for her, she will come.
Her brother's danger would induce her, one
would imagine.
No doubt, madam, continued the doctor
laconically
,
bowing low, and giving room to the
ladies
to pass. The words and the manner were
not lost on the younger sister, in whose presence
the name of Dunwoodie was never mentioned
unheeded
.
Sir, cried Dr. Sitgreaves, on entering the
parlour
,
addressing himself to the only coat of scarlet
in the room, I am advised you are in want of my
aid. God send 'tis not Captain Lawton with whom
you came in contact, in which case I may be too
late.
There must be some mistake, sir, said
Wellmere
haughtily; it was a surgeon that Major
Dunwoodie was to send me, and not an old
woman
.
'Tis Dr. Sitgreaves, said Henry Wharton
quickly, though with difficulty suppressing a laugh,
the multitude of his engagements to-day has
prevented his usual attention to his attire.
Your pardon, sir, added Wellmere, but very
ungraciously, proceeding to lay aside his coat and
exhibit, what he called, a wounded arm.
If, sir, said the surgeon drily, the degrees
of Edinburghwalking your London hospitals
amputating some hundreds of limbsoperating on
the human frame in every shape that is warranted
by the lights of science, a clear conscience, and
the commission of the Continental Congress, can
make a surgeon, then am I one.
Your pardon, sir, repeated the colonel stiffly.
Captain Wharton has accounted for my error.
For which I thank Captain Wharton, said
the surgeon, proceeding coolly to arrange his
amputating
instruments with a formality that made
the colonel's blood run cold. Where are you
hurt, sir? What, is it then this scratch in the
shoulder? In what manner might you have
received
this wound, sir?
From the sword of a rebel dragoon, said
the colonel, with emphasis.
Never, exclaimed the surgeon as positively.
Even the gentle George Singleton would not
have breathed on you so harmlessly. He took
a piece of sticking plaster from his pocket and
applied
it to the part. There, sir, that will answer
your purpose, and I am certain it is all that is
required
of me.
What do you take to be my purpose, then,
sir, said the colonel fiercely.
To report yourself wounded in your
despatches
,
replied the doctor with great steadiness;
and you may say that an old woman dressed
your hurts, for if one did not, one easily might?
Very extraordinary language, muttered the
Englishman.
Here Captain Wharton interfered, and by
explaining
the mistake of Colonel Wellmere to
proceed
from his irritated mind and pain of body, he
in part succeeded in mollifying the insulted
practitioner
,
who consented to look further into the
hurts of the other. They were chiefly bruises from
his fall, to which Sitgreaves made some hasty
applications
,
and withdrew.
The horse, having taken their required
refreshment
,
prepared to fall back to their intended
position, and it became incumbent on Dunwoodie
to arrange the disposal of his prisoners.
Sitgreaves
he determined to leave in the cottage of
Mr. Wharton in attendance on Captain Singleton.
Henry came to him with a request that Colonel
Wellmere might also be left behind under his
parole, until the troops marched higher into the
country. To this the major cheerfully assented,
and as all the rest of his prisoners were of the vulgar
herd, they were speedily collected, and, under the
care of a strong guard, ordered to the interior.
The dragoons soon after marched, and the guides,
separating in small parties, accompanied by
patroles
from the horse, spread themselves across
the country in such a manner, as to make a chain
of sentinels from the waters of the Sound to the
Hudson.
Dunwoodie himself had lingered in front of the
cottage, after he paid his parting compliments for
the time, with an unwillingness to return, that he
thought proceeded from solicitude for his
wounded
friends. The heart which has not become
callous, soon sickens with the glory that has been
purchased with a waste of human life. Peyton
Dunwoodie, left to himself, and no longer excited
by the visions which youthful ardour had kept
before him throughout the day, began to feel
there were other ties, than those which bound the
soldier within the rigid rules of honor. He did
not waver in his duty, yet he felt how strong was
the temptation. His blood had ceased to flow
with the impulse created by the battle. The
stern expression of his eye gradually gave place
to a look of softness; and his reflections on the
victory, brought with them no satisfaction that
compensated for the sacrifices by which it had
been purchased. While turning his last lingering
gaze on the Locusts, he remembered only that it
contained all that he most valued. The friend of
his youth was a prisoner, under circumstances that
endangered both life and honor. The gentle
companion of his toils, who could throw around
the rude enjoyments of a soldier, the graceful
mildness of peace, lay a bleeding victim to his
success. The image of the maid, who had held
during the day a disputed sovereignty in his
bosom
,
again rose to his view with a loveliness that
banished her rival, glory, from his mind.
The last lagging trooper of the corps had already
disappeared behind the Northern hill, and the major
unwillingly turned his horse in the same direction.
Frances, impelled by a restless inquietude, now
timidly ventured on the piazza of the cottage.
The day had been mild and clear, and the sun
was shining brightly in a cloudless sky. The
tumult, which so lately disturbed the valley, was
succeeded by the stillness of death, and the fair
scene before her looked as if it had never been
marred by the passions of men. One solitary
cloud, the collected smoke of the contest, hung
over the field; and this was gradually dispersing, as
if no vestige of its origin was worthy to hover
above the peaceful graves of its victims. All
the conflicting feelingsall the tumultuous
circumstances
of the eventful day, for a moment,
appeared to the maid like the deceptions of a
troubled vision. She turned and caught a glimpse
of the retreating figure, who had been so
conspicuous
an actor in the scene, and the illusion
vanished. Frances recognised her lover, and with
the truth, came other recollections that drove her
to her room, with a heart as sad as that which
Dunwoodie himself bore from the valley.
CHAPTER IX.
A moment gaz'd adown the dale,
A moment snuff'd the tainted gale,
A moment listen'd to the cry,
That thicken'd as the chase drew nigh,
Then as the headmost foe appear'd
With one brave bound the copse he clear'd,
And, stretching forward free and far,
Sought the wild heaths of Wam-Var.
Walter Scott
.
The
party under Captain Lawton had watched
the retiring foe to his boats with the most
unremitting
vigilance, without finding any fit opening for
a charge. The experienced successor to
Colonel
Wellmere in command, knew too well the
power of his enemy to leave the uneven surface
of the heights, until compelled to descend to the
level of the water. Before he attempted this
hazardous movement, he threw his men into a
compact square, with its outer edges bristling with
bayonets. In this position, the impatient trooper
well understood, that brave men could never be
assailed by cavalry with success, and he was
reluctantly
obliged to hover near them without
seeing
any opportunity of stopping their slow but
steady march to the beach. A small schooner
had been their convoy from the city, and lay
with her guns bearing on the place of
embarkation
.
Against this combination of force and
discipline
,
Lawton had sufficient prudence to see
it would be folly to contend, and the English
were suffered to embark without further
molestation
.
The dragoons lingered on the shore until
12
the last moment, and then reluctantly commenced
their own retreat back to the main body of the corps.
The gathering mists of the evening had
begun
to darken the valley, as the detachment of
Lawton made its re-appearance at the southern
extremity. The march of the troops was slow,
and their line extended for the benefit of ease in
their progress. In the front rode the captain,
side by side with his senior subaltern, apparently
engaged together in close conference, while the
rear was brought up by a young cornet, humming
an air, and thinking of the sweets of a straw bed
after the fatigues of a hard day's duty.
Then it struck you too, said the captain;
the instant I placed my eyes on her, I
remembered
the faceit is one not easily forgotten
by my faith, Tom, the girl does no discredit to
the major's taste.
She would do honour to the corps, replied
the lieutenant with great warmth; those blue
eyes might easily win a man to gentler
employments
than this trade of ours. In sober truth, I
can easily imagine that such a maid might tempt
even me to quit the broadsword and saddle for a
darning-needle and pillion.
Mutiny, sir, mutiny, cried the other
laughing
;
what you, Tom Mason, dare to rival the
gay, admired, and withal, rich, Major Dunwoodie
in his love! You, a lieutenant of cavalry, with
but one horse, and he none of the best! whose
captain is as tough as a peperage log, and has as
many lives as a cat.
Faith, said the subaltern smiling in his turn,
the log may yet be split, and Grimalkin lose his
lives, if you often charge as madly as you did this
morning. What think you of many raps from such
a beetle as laid you on your back to day?
Ah! don't mention it, my good Tom, the
thought makes my head ache, replied the other,
shrugging up his shoulders; it is what I call
forestalling
night.
The night of death.
No, sir, the night that follows day. I saw
myriads of stars, things which should hide their
faces in the presence of the lordly sun. I do think
nothing but this thick cap saved me to you a little
longer, maugre the cat's lives.
I have much reason to be obliged to the cap,
said Mason drily, that or the skull must have
had a comfortable portion of thickness, I admit.
Come, come, Tom, you are a licensed joker,
so I'll not feign anger with you, returned the
captain good humouredly; but Singleton's
lieutenant
,
I am fearful, will fare better than yourself
for this day's service.
I believe both of us will be spared the pain of
receiving promotion purchased by the death of a
comrade and friend, observed Mason kindly;
it was reported that Sitgreaves said he would
live.
From my soul I hope so, exclaimed Lawton
fervently; for a beardless face, that boy carries
the stoutest heart I have ever met with. It
surprises
me, however, that, as we both fell at the same
instant, the men behaved so well.
For the compliment, I might thank you, cried
the lieutenant with a laugh; but my modesty
forbidsI did my best to stop them, but without
success.
Stop them, roared the captain, would you
stop men in the middle of a charge?
I thought they were going the wrong way,
answered the subaltern drily.
Ah! said the other more mildly, our fall
drove them to the right about.
It was either your fall, or apprehensions of
their own, returned the waggish subaltern
gravely
,
until the major rallied us, we were in
admirable
disorder.
Dunwoodie! exclaimed the astonished
Lawton
,
why the major was on the crupper of the
Dutchman.
Ay! but he managed to get off the crupper of
the Dutchman, continued Mason coolly. He
came in at half speed with the other two troops,
and riding between us and the enemy, with that
imperative way he has when roused, brought us in
line in the twinkling of an eye. Then it was,
added the lieutenant, with animation, that we
sent John Bull to the bushes. Oh! it was a sweet
chargeheads and tails, until we were upon
them.
The devil! cried the captain with vexation,
what a sight I missed.
You slept through it all, said Mason
laconically
.
Yes, returned the other with a sigh, it was
all lost to me and poor George Singleton. But,
Tom, what will George's sister say to this fair
haired maiden, in younder white building?
Hang herself in her garters, said the
subaltern
.
I owe a proper respect to my superiors,
but two such angels are more than falls to the
share of one man, unless he be a Turk or a
Hindoo
.
Yes, yes, said the captain quickly, the
major is ever preaching morality to the youngsters,
but he is a sly fellow in the main. Do you
observe
how fond he is of the cross roads above this
valley? Now, if I were to halt the troops twice in
the same place, you would all swear there was a
petticoat in the wind.
You are well known to the corps, returned
the sententious subaltern.
Well, Tom, your slanderous propensity is
incurable
,
but stretching forward his body in the
direction he was gazing, as if to aid him in
distinguishing
objects through the darkness, what
animal is moving through the field on our right.
'Tis a man, said Mason, looking intently at
the suspicious object.
By his hump 'tis a dromedary, added the
captain, still eyeing it keenlywheeling his horse
suddenly from the highway, he exclaimed,
Harvey
Birch, take him dead or alive.
Mason and a few of the leading dragoons only
understood the sudden cry, but it was heard
throughout the line. A dozen of the men, with
the lieutenant at their head, followed the
impetuous
Lawton, and their speed threatened the
pursued
with a speedy termination to the race.
Birch had prudently kept his position on the
rock, where he had been seen by the passing
glance of Henry Wharton, until evening had
begun
to shroud the surrounding objects in darkness.
From his height he had seen all the events of the
day as they had occurred. He had watched, with
a beating heart, the departure of the troops under
Dunwoodie, and with difficulty had curbed his
impatience
until the obscurity of night should render
his moving free from danger. He had not,
however
,
completed a fourth of his way to his own
residence
,
when his quick ear distinguished the
tread of the approaching horse. Trusting to the
increasing darkness, he, notwithstanding,
determined
to persevere. By crouching and moving
quickly along the surface of the ground, he hoped
yet to escape unnoticed. Captain Lawton had
been too much engrossed with the foregoing
conversation
to suffer his eyes to indulge in their
usual wandering; and the pedlar, perceiving by
the voices that the enemy he most feared had
12*
passed him, yielded to his impatience and stood
erect in order to make greater progress. The
moment his body rose above the shadow of the
ground, it was seen, and the chace commenced.
For a single instant Birch remained helpless,
with his blood curdling in his veins at the
imminence
of his danger, and his legs refusing
their natural and so necessary office. But it was
for a moment only. Casting his pack where he
stood, and instinctively tightening the belt he
wore, the pedlar betook himself to flight. He
knew that by bringing himself in a line with his
pursuers and the wood, his form would be lost to
the sight. This he soon effected, and he was
straining every nerve to gain the wood itself,
when several horsemen rode by him but a short
distance on his left, and cut him off from this place
of refuge. The pedlar had thrown himself on the
ground as they came near him, and was in this
manner passed unseen. But delay now became
too dangerous for him to remain in that position.
He accordingly rose, and still keeping in the
shadow
of the wood, along the skirts of which he
heard voices crying to each other to be
watchful
,
he ran with incredible speed in a parallel line,
but an opposite direction to the march of the
dragoons
.
The confusion of the chace had been heard
by the whole of the men, though none had
distinctly
understood the order of the hasty Lawton
but those that followed. The remainder were
lost in doubt as to what was required of them;
and the aforesaid cornet was making eager
inquiries
of the trooper near him, when a man,
at a short distance in his rear, crossed the road at
a single bound. At the same instant, the
stentorian
voice of Captain Lawton rang through the
valley, shouting in a manner that told the truth at
once to his men.
Harvey Birch, take him, dead or alive.
Fifty pistols lighted the scene instantly, and the
bullets whistled in every direction around the
head of the devoted pedlar. A feeling of despair
seized his heart as he exclaimed bitterly
Hunted like a beast of the forest. He felt
life and its accompaniments to be a burden, and
was about to yield himself to his enemies.
Nature
,
however, prevailed; he feared, that if taken,
his life would not be honoured with the forms of a
trial, but that most probably the morning sun would
witness his ignominious execution; for he had
already been condemned to, and only escaped that
fate by stratagem. These considerations, with
the approaching footsteps of his pursuers, roused
him to new exertions; and he again fled before
them. A fragment of a wall, that had withstood
the ravages made by war in the adjoining fences
of wood, fortunately crossed his path. He hardly
had time to throw his exausted limbs over this
barrier before twenty of his enemies reached its
opposite side. Their horses refused to take the
leap in the dark, and amid the confusion of the
rearing chargers and the execrations of their
riders, Birch was enabled to gain a sight of the
base of the hill, on whose summit was a place of
perfect security against the approach of any foe.
The heart of the pedlar now beat high with the
confidence of his revived hopes, when the voice
of Captain Lawton again rung in his ears,
shouting
to his men to give him room. The order was
promptly obeyed, and the fearless trooper came
at the wall at the top of his horse's speed,
plunged
the rowels in his charger, and flew over the
obstacle like lightning, and in safety. The
triumphant
hurrahs of the men, and the thundering
tread of the horse, now too plainly assured the
pedlar of the emergency of his danger. He was
nearly exhausted, and his fate no longer seemed
doubtful.
Stop, or die, said the trooper in the
suppressed
tones of inveterate determination.
Harvey stole a fearful glance over his shoulder,
and saw within a bound of him the man he most
dreaded. By the light of the stars he saw the
uplifted arm and threatening sabre. Fear,
exhaustion
,
and despair, seized on his heart, and the
intended victim suddenly fell at the feet of the
dragoon. The horse of Lawton struck the
prostrate
pedlar, and both steed and rider came
together
violently to the earth.
As quick as thought Birch was on his feet again,
and with the sword of the discomfited dragoon in
his hand. Vengeance seems but too natural to
human passions. There are but few who have
not felt the seductive pleasure of making our
injuries
recoil on their supposed authors; and yet
there are some who know how much sweeter it is
to return good for evil. All the wrongs of the
pedlar shone on his brain with a dazzling
brightness
.
For a moment the demon within him
prevailed
,
and Birch brandished the powerful weapon
in the air, in the next it fell harmless on the
reviving
but helpless trooper; and the pedlar
vanished
up the side of the friendly rock.
Help Captain Lawton there, cried Mason, as
he rode up followed by a dozen of his men, and
some of you dismount with me and search these
rocks; the villain lies here concealed.
Hold, roared the discomfited captain, raising
himself with difficulty on his feet, If one of you
dismount he dies; Tom, my good fellow, you will
help me to straddle Roanoke again.
The astonished subaltern complied in silence,
while the wondering dragoons remained as fixed
in their saddles as if they composed part of the
animals they rode.
You are much hurt I fear, said Mason with
something of condolence in his manner, as they
re-entered the highway, and biting off the end of
a segar for the want of a better quality of
tobacco
.
Something so, I do believe, replied the
captain
catching his breath and speaking with
difficulty
,
I wish our bone-setter was at hand, to
examine
into the state of my ribs.
Sitgreaves is left in attendance on Captain
Singleton, at the house of Mr. Wharton, said
Mason in reply.
Then there I halt for the night, Tom,
returned
the other quickly, these rude times must
abridge ceremony; besides you may remember the
old gentleman professed a great regard for the
corps. Oh! I can never think of passing so good
a friend without calling.
And I will lead the troop to the four
corners
,
said the lieutenant, if we all halt there,
we shall breed a famine in the land.
A condition I never desire to be placed in,
added Lawton. The idea of that graceful
spinster's
buck-wheat cakes is highly comfortable in
the perspective.
Oh! you won't die if you can think of
eating
,
cried Mason with a laugh.
I should surely die if I could not, observed
the captain gravely.
Captain Lawton, said the orderly of his
troop, riding to the side of his commanding
officer
,
we are now passing the house of the
pedlar
spy, is it your pleasure that we burn it?
No! roared the captain in a voice that
startled
the disappointed sergeant; are you an
incendiary
would
you burn the house in cold blood
let but a spark approach it, and the hand that
carries
it will never light another.
Zounds! exclaimed the sleepy cornet in the
rear as he was nodding on his horse, there is life
in the captain, notwithstanding his tumble.
Lawton and Mason rode on in silence, the
latter
ruminating on the wonderful benefit of being
thrown from a horse, when they arrived opposite
to the gate which was before the residence of
Mr. Wharton. The troop continued its march,
but the captain and his lieutenant dismounted,
and followed by the servant of the former,
proceeded
slowly to the door of the cottage.
Colonel Wellmere had already sought a retreat
for his mortified feelings in his own room; Mr.
Wharton and his son were closeted by themselves;
and the ladies were administering the refreshments
of the tea-table to the surgeon of the dragoons,
who had seen one of his patients in his bed, and
the other happily enjoying the comforts of a sweet
sleep. A few natural inquiries from Miss Peyton
had opened the soul of the doctor, who knew every
individual of her extensive family connexion in
Virginia, and who even thought it impossible that
he had not seen the lady herself. The amiable
spinster smiled as she inwardly felt it improbable
that she should ever have met her new
acquaintance
before, and not remember his singularities.
It, however, greatly relieved the embarrassment
of their situation, and something like a discourse
was maintained between them; the nieces were
only listeners, nor could the aunt be said to be
much more.
As I was observing, Miss Peyton, it was
nothing
but the noxious vapours of the low lands
that made the plantation of your brother an
unfit
residence for man; but quadrupeds were
Bless me, what's that, said Miss Peyton,
turning pale at the report of the pistols fired at
Birch.
It sounds prodigiously like the concussion on
the atmosphere made by the explosion of
fire-arms
,
said the precise surgeon very coolly, and
sipping his tea with great indifference, I should
imagine it to be the troop of Captain Lawton
returning
,
did I not know the captain never uses
the pistol, and that he dreadfully abuses the
sabre
.
Merciful providence! exclaimed the agitated
maiden, he would not injure one with it
certainly
.
Injure! repeated the other quickly, it is
certain death, madam; the most random blows
imaginableall that I can say to him will have no
effect.
But Captain Lawton is the officer we saw this
morning, and is surely your friend, said Frances
hastily, observing her aunt to be dreadfully
alarmed
.
I find no fault with his want of friendship,
returned the doctor, the man is well enough if
he would learn to cut scientifically, and give me
some chance with the wounded; all trades,
madam
,
ought to be allowed to livebut what
becomes
of a surgeon, if his patients are dead before
he sees them?
The doctor continued haranguing on the
probability
and improbability of its being the
returning
troop, until a loud knock at the front door
gave new alarm to the ladies. Instinctively
laying
his hand on a small saw that had been his
companion
for the whole day in the vain expectation
of an amputation, the surgeon coolly assuring the
ladies that he would avert any danger, proceeded
in person to answer to the summons.
Captain Lawton! exclaimed the surgeon, as
he beheld the trooper leaning on the arm of his
subaltern, and with difficulty crossing the
threshold
.
Ah! my dear bone-setter, is it you?
returned
the other good-humouredly, you are here
very fortunately to inspect my carcass, but do lay
aside that rascally saw.
A few words from Mason explained to the
surgeon
the nature and manner of his Captain's hurts,
and Miss Peyton cheerfully accorded the required
accommodations. While the room intended for the
trooper was getting in a state of preparation, and
the doctor was giving certain portentous orders,
the captain was invited to rest himself in
parlour
.
On the table was a dish of more
substantial
food than ordinarily adorned the afternoon's
repast, and it soon caught the attention of the
dragoons
.
Miss Peyton recollecting that they had
probably made their only meal that day at her own
table, kindly invited them to close it with another.
The offer required no pressing, and in a few
minutes
the two were comfortably seated, and
engaged
in an employment that was only interrupted
by an occasional wry face from the captain as he
moved his body in evident pain. These
interruptions
,
however, interfered but little with the
principal
business in hand; and the captain had got
happily through with this important duty before the
surgeon returned to announce all things ready for
his accomodation in the room above stairs.
What, eating! cried the astonished
physician
,
Captain Lawton, do you wish to die?
I have no particular wish that way, said the
trooper rising, and bowing a polite good night to
the ladies, and, therefore, have been providing
the materials necessary to preserve life within
me.
The surgeon muttered his dissatisfaction as he
followed Mason and his captain from the
apartment
.
Every house in America had at that day what
was emphatically called its best room, and this
had been allotted by the unseen influence of
Sarah
to Colonel Wellmere. The down
counterpane
,
which a clear frosty night would render
extremely
grateful over bruised limbs, decked the
English officer's bed. A massive silver tankard,
richly embossed with the Wharton arms, held the
beverage he was to drink during the night; while
beautiful vessels of china performed the same
office for the two American captains. Sarah was
certainly unconscious of the silent preference she
had been giving to the English officer, and it is
equally certain, that but for his hurts, bed,
tankard
,
and every thing but the beverage would have
been matters of indifference to Captain Lawton
half of whose nights were spent in his clothes,
and not a few of them in the saddle. After
taking
possession, however, of what was a small but
very comfortable room, Dr. Sitgreaves proceeded
to inquire into the state of his injuries. He had
begun to pass his hand over the body of his
patient
,
when the latter cried impatiently
Sitgreaves, do lay that rascally saw aside, the
sight of it makes my blood cold.
Captain Lawton, rejoined the surgeon, I
think, for a man who has so often exposed life and
limb, you are unaccountably afraid of what is a
very useful instrument.
Heaven keep me from its use, said the
trooper
with a shrug.
Surely you would not despise the lights of
science, nor refuse surgical aid because this saw
might be necessary? asked the incorrigible
operator
.
13
I would.
You would!
Yes, you never shall joint me like a quarter
of beef while I have life to defend myself, cried
the resolute dragoon; but I grow sleepy, are any
of my ribs broke?
No.
Any of my bones?
No.
Tom, I'll thank you for that pitcher. As he
ended his draught, he very deliberately turned
his back on his companions, and good naturedly
criedGood night, MasonGood night,
Galen
.
Captain Lawton entertained a profound respect
for the surgical abilities of his comrade, but was
very sceptical on the subject of administering
internally
for the ailings of the human frame. With
a full stomach, a stout heart, and a clear
conscience
,
he often maintained, that a man might
bid defiance to the world and its vicissitudes.
Nature provided him with the second, and, to say
the truth, he strove manfully himself to keep up
the other two requisites in his creed of worldly
prosperity. It was a favourite maxim with him,
that the last thing death assailed was the eyes,
and next to the last, the jaws. This he
interpreted
into a clear expression of the intention of
nature, that every man might regulate, by his own
volition, whatever was to be admitted into the
sanctuary of his mouth; consequently, if the
guest proved unpalatable, he had no one to blame
but himself. The surgeon, who was well
acquainted
with these views of his patient, beheld
him, as he cavalierly turned his back on Mason
and himself, with a commiserating contempt,
replaced
in their leathern repository, the phials he
had exhibited, with a species of care that was
allied to veneration, gave the saw, as he
concluded
,
a whirl of triumph, and departed,
without
condescending to notice the compliment of
the trooper, to give some of his care to the guest
in the best bed-room. Mason finding, by the
breathing of the captain, that his own good night
would be unheard, hastened to pay his respects
to the ladiesmounted, and followed the troop
at the top of his horse's speed.
CHAPTER X.
On some fond breast the parting soul relies,
Some pious drops the closing eye requires,
E'en from the tomb the voice of nature cries,
E'en in our ashea, live their wonted fires.
Gray
.
The
possessions of Mr. Wharton extended to
some distance on each side of the house in which
he dwelt, and most of his land was unoccupied.
A few scattering dwellings were to be seen in
different
parts of his domains, but they were fast
falling
to decay, and untenanted. The proximity of
the country to the contending armies had nearly
banished the pursuits of agriculture from the land.
It was useless for the husbandman to devote his
time, and the labour of his hand, to obtain
overflowing
garuers, that the first foraging party would
empty. None tilled the earth with any other
view than to provide the scanty means of
subsistence
,
except those who were placed so near to
one of the adverse parties as to be safe from the
inroads of the light troops of the other. To these
the war offered a golden harvest, more especially
to such as enjoyed the benefits of an access to the
Royal Army. Mr. Wharton did not require the
use of his lands for the purposes of subsistence,
and willingly adopted the guarded practice of the
day, and limited his attention to such articles as
were soon to be consumed within his own walls,
or could be easily secreted from the prying looks
of the foragers. In consequence, the ground on
which the action was fought, had not a single
inhabited
building, besides the one belonging to the
father of Harvey BirchThis stood between the
places where the cavalry had met and the charge
had been made on the party of Wellmere.
To Katy Haynes, it had been a day fruitful in
incidents
to furnish an inexhaustible theme to her
after
life. The prudent housekeeper had kept her
political feelings in a state of rigid neutrality; her
own friends had espoused the cause of the
country
,
but the maiden never lost sight of the moment
when she herself was to be espoused to Harvey
Birch. She did not wish to fetter the bonds of
Hymen
with any other clogs than those with which
nature
had already so amply provided them. Katy
could always see enough to embitter the marriage
bed, without calling in the aid of political
contention
;
and yet, at times, the prying spinster had
her doubts, of which side she should be, to escape
this dreaded evil. There was so much of
practised
deception in the conduct of the pedlar, that
the housekeeper frequently arrested her own
words when most wishing to manifest her
sympathies
.
His lengthened absences from home, had
commenced immediately after the hostile armies
had made their appearance in the county;
previously
to that event, his returns had been regular
and frequent.
The battle of the Plains had taught the
cautious
Washington the advantages possessed by his
enemy, in organization, arms, and discipline.
These were difficulties to be mastered by his own
vigilance and care. Drawing off his troops to the
heights, in the northern part of the county, he bid
defiance to the attacks of the Royal Army, and
Sir William Howe fell back to the enjoyments of
his barren conquests, a deserted city and the
adjacent
islands. Never afterwards did the
opposing
armies make the trial for success within the
limits of West-Chester; yet hardly a day passed,
13*
that the partisans did not make their inroads, or a
sun rise, that the inhabitants were spared the
relation
of the excesses, that the preceding darkness
had served to conceal. Most of the movements
of the pedlar through the county, were made at
the hours which others allotted to repose. The
evening sun would frequently leave him at one
extremity of the district, and the morning find
him at the other. His pack was his never-failing
companion, and there were those who closely
studied him in his moments of traffic, who thought
his only purpose was the accumulation of gold.
He would be often seen near the Highlands with
a body bending under the weight it carriedand
again near the Harlaem river, travelling, with
lighter steps, with his face towards the setting
sun. But these glances at him were uncertain
and fleeting. The intermediate time no eye could
penetrate. For months he disappeared, and no
traces of his course were ever known.
Strong parties held the heights of Harlaem, and
the northern end of Manhattan Island was bristled
with the bayonets of the English sentinels, yet the
pedlar glided among them unnoticed and
uninjured
.
His approach to the American lines were
also frequent; but generally so conducted as to
baffle pursuit. Many a sentinel, placed in the
gorges of the mountains, spoke of a strange figure
that had been seen gliding by them in the mists of
the evening. The stories reached the ears of the
officers, and, as we have related, in two instances
the trader fell into the hands of the Americans.
The first time he escaped from Lawton, shortly
after his arrest; but the second he was condemned
to die. On the morning of his intended
execution
the cage was opened, but the bird had flown.
This extraordinary escape had been made from
the custody of a favorite officer of Washington,
and sentinels who had been thought worthy to
guard the person of the commander-in-chief.
Bribery and treason could not approach the
characters
of men so well esteemed, and the opinion
gained ground among the common soldiery, that
the pedlar had dealings with the dark one. Katy,
however, always repelled this opinion with
indignation
;
for within the recesses of her own bosom,
the housekeeper, in ruminating on events,
concluded
that the evil spirit did not pay in gold
Nor, continues the wary spinster in her
cogitations
,
does Washingtonpaper and promises were
all that the leader of the American troops could
dispense to his servants, until after the receipt of
supplies from France; and even then, although the
scrutinizing eyes of Katy never let any
opportunity
of examining into the deer-skin purse, pass
unimproved, she was never able to detect the
image of Louis, intruding into the presence of
the well known countenance of George III.
The house of Harvey had been watched at
different
times by the Americans, with a view to his
arrest, but never with success; the reputed spy
possessed
a secret means of intelligence that
invariably
defeated their schemes. Once, when a strong
body of the Continental Army held the four corners
for a whole summer, orders had been received from
Washington himself, never to leave the door of
Harvey Birch unwatched; the command was
rigidly obeyed, and during this long period the
pedlar was unseenthe detachment was
withdrawn
,
and the next night Birch re-entered his
dwelling. The father of Harvey had been greatly
molested in consequence of the suspicious
character
of the son. But, notwithstanding the most
minute scrutiny into the conduct of the old man,
no fact could be substantiated against him to his
injury, and his property was too small to keep
alive the zeal of professed patriotsits
confiscation
and purchase would not reward them for their
trouble. Age and sorrow were now about to
spare him from further molestation, for the lamp
of life had begun to be drained of its oil. The
separation of the father and son had been painful,
but in obedience to what both thought a duty.
The old man had kept his situation a secret from
the neighbourhood, in order that he might have
the company of his child in his last moments.
The confusion of the past day, and his increasing
dread that Harvey might be too late, helped to
hasten the event he would fain arrest for yet a
little while. As night set in, his illness increased
to such a degree that the dismayed housekeeper
had sent a truant boy, who had been shut up
with them for the day rather than trust himself
in the presence of the combatants, to the Locusts,
in quest of a living soul to cheer her desolate
situation. Csar was the only one who could be
spared, and, loaded with eatables and cordials by
the kind-hearted Miss Peyton, the black had been
despatched on this duty. The dying man was
past the use of such articles, and his chief
anxiety
seemed to centre in a meeting with his absent
child.
The noise of the chase had been heard by the
group in the house, but its cause not
understood
;
and as both the black and Katy were
apprised
of the detachment of American horse being
below them, with its discontinuance all
apprehension
from this disturbance ceased. They
heard the dragoons as they moved slowly by the
building, but in compliance with the prudent
injunction
of the black, the housekeeper forbore to
indulge her curiosity by taking a view of the
pageant
.
The old man had closed his eyes, and his
attendants supposed him to be asleep. The
house contained two large rooms, and as many
small ones. One of the former served for kitchen
and parlorin the other lay the father of Birch:
of the latter, one was the sanctuary of the vestal,
and the other contained the provisions for
subsistence
.
A huge chimney of stone rose in the
centre of the building, serving, of itself, for a
partition
between the larger rooms, and fire-places of
corresponding dimensions were in each apartment.
A bright fire was burning in that of the common
room, and within the very jambs of its monstrous
jaws sat Csar and Katy at the time of which we
speak. The African was impressing his caution
on the maiden to suppress an idle curiosity that
might prove dangerous.
Best neber tempt a Satan, said Csar,
rolling
up his eyes significantly, till the whites
glistened
by the glare of the fireI like to lose an ear
only for carrying a little bit of a letterBut I wish
Harvey get back.
It is very disregardful in him to be away at
such times, said Katy imposingly. Suppose
now his father wanted to make his last will in the
testament, who is there to do such a thing for
him. Harvey is a very wasteful and a very
disregardful
man.
Perhaps he make him before, said the black
inquiringly.
It would not be a wonderment if he had,
returned
the housekeeper eagerly; he is whole days
looking into the Bible.
Then he read a good book, said the black
solemnly. Miss Fanny read him to Dinah berry
often.
Yes, continued the inquisitive spinster; but
he would not be forever studying it, if it didn't
hold something more as common.
She rose from her seat, and stealing softly to a
chest of drawers in the room where lay the sick,
took from it a large Bible, heavily bound, and
secured
with strong clasps of brass, with which she
returned to the expecting African. The volume
was opened, and she proceeded instantly to the
inquiry. Katy was far from an expert scholar,
and to Csar the characters were absolute
strangers
.
For some time the housekeeper was
occupied
with finding out the word Matthew, which
she at last saw in large Roman letters crowning
one of the pages, and instantly announced her
discovery
to the attentive Csar.
Berry well, now look him all through: said
the black, peeping over the damsel's shoulder, as
he held a long, lank, candle of yellow tallow in his
hand, in such a manners as to throw its feeble light
on the volume.
Yes, but I must begin with the book,
replied
the other, turning the leaves carefully back,
until, moving two at once, she lighted upon a page
covered with the labours of a pen. Here,
said the housekeeper with impatience, and
shaking
with the eagerness of expectation, here is
the very words themselves; now I would give the
world to know who he has left them big silver
shoe buckles to.
Read him, said Csar laconically.
And the black walnut drawers, for Harvey
could never want them.
Why no want 'em as well as his father?'
asked the black drily.
And the six silver table spoons; for Harvey
always uses the iron.
I guess he say, continued the African,
pointing
significantly to the writing, and listening
eagerly, as the other thus opened the store of
the elder Birch's wealth.
Thus repeatedly advised, and impelled by her
own curiosity, Katy commenced her task; anxious
to come to the part which most interested herself,
she dipped at once into the centre of the subject.
Chester Birch, born September 1st, 1755;
read the spinster with great deliberation.
Well, cried the impatient Csar, what he
give him?
Abigail Birch, born July 12th, 1757;
continued
the housekeeper in the same tone.
I guess he give her the spoons, observed the
black hastily.
June 1st, 1760. On this awful day the
judgment
of an offended God lighted on my house
a heavy groan from the adjoining room made the
spinster instinctively close the book, and Csar,
for a moment, shook with fearneither possessed
sufficient resolution to go and see what was the
condition of the sufferer, but his heavy breathings
continued as usualKaty dared not, however,
reopen
the Bible, and carefully securing its clasps,
it was laid on the table in silence. Csar took
his chair again, and, after looking timidly round
the room, remarked
I thought he 'bout to go.
No, said Katy solemnly, he will live till
the tide is out, or the first cock crows in the
morning
.
Poor man! continued the black, nestling
still farther into the chimney corner; I hope he
lay quiet after he die.
'Twould be no astonishment to me if he
didn't, returned Katy, glancing her eyes around
the room, and speaking in an under voice, for
they say an unquiet life makes an uneasy grave.
Johnny Birch a berry good man, said the
black quite positively.
Ah! Csar, said the housekeeper in the
same voice, he is good only who does good
can you tell me, Csar, why honestly gotten gold
should be hidden in the bowels of the earth?
If he know where he be, why don't he dig
him up? asked the black promptly.
There may be reasons not comprehendible to
you, said Katy, moving her chair so that her
clothes covered the charmed stone, underneath
which lay the secret treasures of the pedlar
unable to refrain speaking of what she would have
been very unwilling to reveal; but a rough
outside
often holds a smooth inside. Csar stared
around the building unable to fathom the hidden
meaning of the damsel, when his roving eye
suddenly
became fixed, and his teeth chattered with
affright. The change in the countenance of the
black was instantly perceived by Katy, and
turning
her face, she saw the pedlar himself standing
within the door of the room.
Is he alive? asked Birch tremulously, and
seemingly afraid to receive an answer to his own
question.
Surely, said the maiden, rising hastily, and
officiously offering her chair to the pedlar, he
must live till day or the tide is down.
Disregarding all but her assurance, the pedlar
stole gently to the room of his dying parent. The
tie which bound this father and son together was
one of no ordinary kind. In the wide world
they were all to each other. Had Katy but have
read a few lines farther in the record, she would
have seen the sad tale of their misfortunes. At one
blow competence and kindred had been swept
from before them, and from that day to the
present
hour, persecution and distress had followed
their wandering steps. Approaching the bed side,
Harvey leaned his body forward, and said, in a
voice nearly choked by his feelings
Father, do you know me?
The parent slowly opened his eyes, and a smile
of satisfaction passed over his pallid features,
leaving
behind it the impression of death in still greater
force from the contrast. The pedlar gave a
restorative
he had brought with him to the parched
lips of the sick man, and for a few minutes new
vigor seemed to be imparted to his frame. He
spoke, but slowly and with difficulty. Curiosity
kept Katy silent; awe had the same effect on
Csar
;
and Harvey seemed hardly to breathe, as he
listened to the language of the departing spirit.
My son, said the father in a hollow voice,
God is as merciful as he is justif I threw the
cup of salvation from my lips when a youth, he
graciously offers it to me in mine age. He
chastiseth
to purify, and I go to join the spirits of our
lost family. In a little while, my child, you will
be alone. I know you too well not to foresee
you will be a lone pilgrim through life. The
bruised reed may endure, but it will never rise.
You have that within you, Harvey, that will guide
you aright; persevere as you have begun, for the
duties of life are never to be neglectedand
A noise in the adjoining room interrupted the
dying
man, and the impatient pedlar hastened to
learn the cause, followed by Katy and the black.
The first glance of his eye on the figure in the
door-way told the trader but too well both his
errand
,
and the fate that probably awaited himself.
The intruder was a man still young in years, but
his lineaments bespoke a mind long agitated by
evil passions. His dress was of the meanest
materials
,
and so ragged and unseemly, as to give
him the appearance of studied poverty. His hair
was prematurely whitened, and his sunken,
lowering
eye avoided the bold, forward look of innocence.
There was a restlessness in his movements, and
agitation in his manner, that proceeded from the
14
workings of the foul spirit within him, and which
was not less offensive to others than distressing to
himself. This man was a well known leader of
one of those gangs of marauders who infested the
county with a semblance of patriotism, and, were
guilty of every grade of offence, from simple
theft up to murder. Behind him stood several
other figures clad in a similar manner, but whose
countenances expressed nothing more than the
callous indifference of brutal insensibility. They
were all well armed with muskets and bayonets,
and provided with the usual implements of foot
soldiers. Harvey knew resistance to be vain, and
quietly submitted to their directions. In the
twinkling of an eye both he and Csar were
stripped
of their decent garments, and made to
exchange
clothes with two of the filthiest of the band.
They were then placed in separate corners of the
room, and under the muzzles of the muskets,
required
faithfully to answer such interrogatories as
were put to them.
Where is your pack? was the first question
to the pedlar.
Hear me, said Birch, trembling with
agitation
;
in the next room is my father now in the
agonies of death; let me go to him, receive his
blessing, and close his eyes, and you shall have
allaye, all.
Answer me as I put the questions, or this
musket shall send you to keep the old driveller
companywhere is your pack?
I will tell you nothing unless you let me go
to my father, said the pedlar resolutely.
His persecutor raised his arm with a malicious
sneer, and was about to execute his threat, when
one of his companions checked him, and cried
What would you do? you surely forget the
reward. Tell us where are your goods, and you
shall go to your father.
Birch complied instantly, and a man was
despatched
in quest of the booty: he soon returned,
throwing the bundle on the floor, swearing it was
as light as feathers.
Ay, cried the leader, there must be gold
somewhere for what it did contain; give us your
gold, Mr. Birch; we know you have it; you will
not take continental, not you.
You break your faith, said Harvey sullenly.
Give us your gold, exclaimed the other
furiously
,
pricking the pedlar with his bayonet until
the blood followed his pushes in streams. At this
instant a slight movement was heard in the
adjoining
room, and Harvey cried imploringly
Let melet me go to my father, and you
shall have all.
I swear you shall go then, said the skinner.
Here, take the trash, cried Birch, as he
threw aside the purse, which he had contrived to
conceal, notwithstanding the change in his
garments
.
The robber raised it from the floor with a
hellish
laugh, as he said coolly
Ay, but it shall be to your father in heaven.
Monster! exclaimed Birch, have you no
feeling, no faith, no honesty?
Why, to hear him, one would think there was
not a rope around his neck already, said the
other malignantly. There is no necessity of
your being uneasy, Mr. Birch; if the old man gets
a few hours the start of you in the journey, you
will be sure to follow him before noon to-morrow.'
This unfeeling communication had no effect on
the pedlar, who listened with gasping breath to
every sound from the room of his parent, until he
heard his own name spoken in the hollow,
sepulchral
tones of death. Birch could endure no more,
but shrieking out
Father, hush, father, I comeI come: he
darted by his keeper, and was the next moment
pinned to the wall by the bayonet of another;
fortunately his quick motion had caused him to
escape a thrust aimed at his life, and it was by his
clothes only that he was confined.
No, Mr. Birch, said the skinner, we know
you too well for a slippery rascal to trust you out
of sightyour goldyour gold.
You have it, said the pedlar, writhing with
the agony of his situation.
Ay, we have the purse; but you have more
purses. King George is a prompt paymaster, and
you have done him many a piece of good service.
Where is your hoard? without it you will never
see your father.
Remove the stone underneath the woman,
cried the pedlar eagerlyremove the stone.
He raveshe raves, said Katy, instinctively
moving her position to another stone than the one
on which she had been standing; in a moment it
was torn from its bed, and nothing but earth was
seen under it.
He raves; you have driven him from his right
mind, continued the trembling spinster; would
any man in his senses think of keeping gold under
a hearth-stone?
Peace, babbling fool, cried Harveylift
the corner stone, and you will find what will make
you rich, and me a beggar.
And then you will be despiseable, said the
housekeeper bitterly. A pedlar without goods
and without moneyis sure to be despiseable.
There will be enough left to pay for his
halter
,
cried the skinner, as he opened upon a store
of English guineas. These were quickly
transferred
to a bag, notwithstanding the declarations
of the spinster, that her dues were unsatisfied,
and that of right ten of the guineas should be her
property.
Delighted with a prize that greatly exceeded
their expectations, the band prepared to
depart
,
intending to take the pedlar with them in
order to give him up to some of the American
troops above, and claim the reward offered for his
apprehension. Every thing was ready, and they
were about to lift Birch in their arms, as he
refused
to move an inch; when a figure entered the
room, that appalled the grouparound his body
was thrown the sheet of the bed from which he
had risen, and his fixed eye and haggard face gave
him the appearance of a being from another world.
Even Katy and Csar thought it was the spirit of
the elder Birch, and they both fled the house,
followed by the alarmed skinners.
The excitement which had given the sick man
strength soon vanished, and the pedlar, lifting him
in his arms, re-conveyed him to his bed. The
reaction
of the system which followed hastened to
close the scene.
The glazed eye of the father was fixed upon
the son; his lips moved, but his voice was unheard.
Harvey bent down, and, with his parting breath,
received the dying benediction of his parent. A
life of privation, of care, and of wrongs,
embittered
most of the future hours of the pedlar. But
under no sufferingsin no misfortunethe subject
of poverty and biting obloquythe remembrance of
that blessing never left him. It constantly
gleamed
over the images of the past, shedding a holy
radiance around his saddest hours of despondency.
It cheered the prospect of the future with the
prayers of a pious spirit for his well-being; and
14*
it brought assurance to his soul of having
discharged
faithfully and truly the sacred offices of
filial love.
The retreat of Csar and the spinster had been
too precipitate to admit of much calculation; yet
had the former instinctively separated himself from
the skinners. After fleeing a short distance, they
paused from fatigue, and the maiden commenced
in a solemn voice
Oh! Csar, 'twas dreadful to walk before he
had been laid in his grave; but it must have been
the money that disturbed him; they say Captain
Kidd walks where he buried gold in the old war.
I nebber tink Johnny Birch had such big eye,
said the African, his teeth yet chattering with the
fright.
I'm sure 'twould be a botherment to a living
soul to lose so much money, and all for nothing,
continued Katy, disregarding the other's remark;
Harvey will be nothing but a despiseable,
poverty-stricken
wretch. I wonder who he thinks would
marry him now.
Maybe a spooke take away Harvey too,
observed
Csar, moving still nearer to the side of
the maiden. But a new idea had seized the
imagination of the spinster: she thought it not
improbable
that the prize had been forsaken in the
confusion of the retreat; and after deliberating
and reasoning for some time with Csar, they both
determined to venture back, and ascertain this
important
fact, and, if possible, learn what had been
the fate of the pedlar. Much time was spent in
cautiously approaching the dreaded spot; and as
the spinster had sagaciously placed herself in the
line of the retreat of the skinners, every stone
was examined in the progress, to see if it was not
the abandoned gold. But, although the
suddenness
of the alarm, and the cry of Csar, had
impelled
the freebooters to so hasty a retreat, they
grasped the hoard with an instinctive hold that
death itself would not have loosened. Perceiving
every thing to be quiet within, Katy at length
mustered resolution enough to enter the dwelling,
where she found the pedlar with a heavy heart
performing
the last sad offices for the dead. A few
words sufficed to explain to Katy the nature of
her mistake; but Csar continued till his dying
day to astonish the sable inmates of the kitchen,
with learned dissertations on
spookes,
and how
direful was the appearance of Johnny Birch.
The danger to himself compelled the pedlar to
abridge even the short period that American
custom
leaves the deceased with us; and aided by the
black and Katy, his painful task was soon ended.
Csar volunteered to walk a couple of miles with
orders to a carpenter, and the body being habited
in its ordinary attire was left with a sheet laid over
it with great decency, to await the return of the
messenger.
The skinners had fled precipitately to the wood,
which was but a short distance from the house of
Birch, and once safely sheltered within its shades,
they halted, and mustered their panic-stricken
forces.
What in the name of fury seized on your
coward hearts? cried the dissatisfied leader,
drawing
his breath heavily.
The same question might be asked yourself,
returned one of the band sullenly.
From your fright, I thought a party of De
Lancey's men were upon us. Oh! you are brave
gentlemen at a race, continued the leader
bitterly
.
We follow our captain.
Then follow me back, and let us secure the
scoundrel and receive the reward.
Yes; and by the time we reach the house, that
black rascal will have the mad Virginian upon us;
by my soul I would rather meet fifty Cow-boys,
than that single man.
Fool, cried the enraged leader, don't you
know Dunwoodie's horse are at the corners, full
two miles from here?
I care not where the dragoons are, but I will
swear that I saw Captain Lawton enter the house
of old Wharton, while I lay watching an
opportunity
of getting the British colonel's horse from
the stable.
And if he does come, won't a bullet silence a
dragoon from the south as well as from old
England
?
Ay, but I don't choose a hornet's nest around
my ears; you raise the skin of one of that corps,
and you will never see another peaceable night's
foraging again.
Well, muttered the leader, as they retired
deeper into the wood, this sottish pedlar will stay
to see the old devil buried, and though we mustn't
touch him at the funeral, he'll wait to look after
the moveables, and to-morrow night shall wind up
his concerns.
With this threat they withdrew to one of their
usual places of resort, until darkness should again
give them an opportunity of marauding on the
community without danger of detection.
CHAPTER XI.
O woe! O woeful, woeful, woeful day!
Most Inmentable day! most woeful day,
That ever, ever, I did yet behold!
O day! O day! O day! O hateful day!
Never was seen so black a day as this:
O woeful day! O woeful day!
Shakspeare
.
The
family at the Locusts had slept or watched
through all the disturbances at the cottage of
Birch, in perfect ignorance of their occurrence.
The attacks of the Skinners were always made
with so much privacy as to exclude the sufferer, not
only from succour, but frequently through a dread
of future depredations, from the commiseration
of their neighbours also. The cares of their
additional
duties had drawn the ladies from their
pillows
at an hour somewhat earlier than usual, and
Captain Lawton, notwithstanding the sufferings of
his body, had risen in compliance with a rule that
he never departed from, of sleeping but six hours
at a time. This was one of the few points in
which the care of the human frame was involved,
where the trooper and the surgeon of horse were
ever known to agree. The doctor had watched,
during the night, by the side of the bed of Captain
Singleton, without once closing his eyes.
Occasionally
he would pay a visit to the wounded
Englishman
,
who, being more hurt in the spirit than
in the flesh, tolerated the interruptions to his
repose
with a very ill grace; and once, for an
instant
,
he ventured to steal softly to the bed of his
obstinate comrade, and was near succeeding in
obtaining a feel of his pulse, when a terrible oath,
sworn by the trooper in a dream, startled the
prudent
surgeon, and warned him of a trite saying in
the corps, that Captain Lawton always slept
with one eye open. This group had assembled
in one of the parlors as the sun made its
appearance
over the eastern hill, and dispersed the
columns of fog which had enveloped the low land.
Miss Peyton was looking from a window in the
direction of the tenement of the pedlar, and was
expressing a kind anxiety after the welfare of the
sick it was supposed to contain, when the person
of Katy suddenly emerged from the dense
covering
of an earthly cloud, whose mists were
scattering
before the cheering rays of the sun, and was
seen making hasty steps towards the Locusts.
There was that in the air of the housekeeper,
which bespoke distress of an unusual nature, and
the kind-hearted mistress of the Locusts opened
the door of the room, with the benevolent
intention
of soothing a grief that seemed so
overwhelming
.
A nearer view of the disturbed features of the
visitor, confirmed Miss Peyton in her belief, and
with the shock that gentle feelings ever
experience
at a sudden and endless separation from even
the meanest of their associatesshe said hastily
What, Katy, is he gone?
No, ma'm, replied the disturbed damsel with
great bitterness, he is not yet gone, but he may
go as soon as he pleases now, for the mischief is
all doneI do verily believe, Miss Peyton, they
haven't so much as left him money enough to buy
him another suit of clothes to cover his
nakedness
,
and what he has on are none of the best, I
can tell you.
How! exclaimed the astonished spinster,
could any one have the heart to plunder a man
in such distress?
Hearts! repeated Katy catching her breath;
men like them have no bowels at allplunder
and distress indeed.Why, ma'm, there were in
the iron pot, in plain sight, fifty-four guineas of
gold, besides what lay underneath, which I couldn't
count without handlingand I didn't like to touch
it, for they say, that another's gold is apt to stick
so judging from that in sight, there wasn't less
than two hundred guineasbesides what was in
the deer-skin purse. But Harvey is little better
now than a beggar, and don't you think a beggar
very despiseable, Miss Peyton?
Poverty is to be pitied and not despised,
said the lady in reply, still unable to comprehend
the extent of the misfortune that had befallen her
neighbours during the night. But how is the
old man; and does this loss you speak of affect
him much?
The countenance of Katy changed instantly,
from the natural expression of concern to the set
form of melancholy, as she answered
He is happily removed from the cares of the
worldthe chinking of the money made him get
out of his bed, and the poor soul found the shock
too great for him. He died about two hours and
ten minutes before the cock crowed, as near as
we can sayshe was interrupted by the
physician
,
who, approaching, inquired, with much
interest
,
the nature of his disorder. Glancing her eye
over the figure of this new acquaintance, Katy,
after instinctively adjusting her dress, replied
'Twas the troubles of the times, and the loss
of property, that brought him downhe wasted
from day to day, and all my care and anxiety were
lostfor now Harvey is no better than a beggar,
and who is there to repay me for what I have
done?
God will reward you for all the good you have
done, said Miss Peyton mildly.
Yes, interrupted the spinster hastily, and
with an air of reverence that was instantly
succeeded
by an expression that denoted more of
worldly care; but then I left my wages for three
years past in the hands of Harvey, and how am I
to get them. My brothers told me again and
again to ask for my money, but I always thought
accounts between relations were easily settled.
Were you related then to Birch? asked Miss
Peyton, observing her to pause.
Why, returned the maiden, hesitating a
little
,
I thought we were as good as so. I wonder
if I have no claim on the house and garden, though
they say now it is Harvey's it will surely be
confisticated
,
turning to Lawton, who had been sitting
in one posture, with his piercing eyes lowering at
her through his thick brows, in silence; perhaps
this gentleman knowshe seems to take an
interest
in my story
Madam, said the trooper, bowing very low,
both you and the tale are extremely
interesting
.
Katy smiled involuntarily; but my
humble
knowledge is limited to the setting of a
squadron
in the field, and using it when there. I beg
leave to refer you to Dr. Archibald Sitgreaves, a
gentleman of universal attainments, and
unbounded
philanthropy.
The surgeon drew up in proud disdain, and
employed
himself in whistling a low air as he
looked
over some phials on a table; but the
housekeeper
,
turning to him with an inclination of her
head, continued
I suppose, sir, a woman has no dower in her
husband's property, unless they be actually
married
?
It was a maxim with Dr. Sitgreaves, that no
species of knowledge was to be despised, and
consequently
he was an empiric in every thing but his
profession. At first, indignation at the irony of
his comrade kept him silent; but suddenly
changing
his purpose, he answered the maiden, with a
smile
I judge not. If death has anticipated your
nuptials, I am fearful you have no remedy against
his stern decrees.
To Katy this sounded well, although she
understood
nothing of its meaning, but death, and
nuptials. To this part of his speech, then, she
directed her reply.
I did think he only waited the death of the old
gentleman before he married, said the
housekeeper
,
looking on the carpet; but, now he is
nothing more than despiseable, or what's the same
thing, a pedlar without house, pack, or money.
It might be hard for a man to get a wife at all in
such a predicarydon't you think it would, Miss
Peyton?
I seldom trouble myself with such things.
said the lady gravely, busying herself in
preparations
for the morning's repast.
During this dialogue Captain Lawton had been
studying the countenance and manner of the
housekeeper, with a most ludicrous gravity; and
fearful the conversation would cease, he
inquired
with an appearance of great interest
Then you think it was age and debility that
removed the old gentleman at last?
And these troublesome times, returned the
spinster promptly; trouble is a heavy pull down
to a sick bed; but I suppose his time had come,
and when that happens, it matters but little what
doctor's stuff we take.
Let me set you right in that particular,
interrupted
the surgeon gravely; we must all die
15
it is true, but it is permitted us to use the lights of
science in arresting dangers as they occur, until
We can die secundum artem, said the
trooper
,
drily.
To this observation the physician did not deign
to make any reply, but deeming it necessary, in
order to support his dignity, that the conversation
should continue, he added
Perhaps, in this instance, judicious treatment
might have prolonged the life of the patientwho
administered to the case?
No one yet, said the housekeeper, with
quickness
;
I expect he made his last will in the
testament
.
The surgeon disregarded the smile of the ladies,
and pursued his inquiries, by saying
It is doubtless wise to be ever prepared for
death. But under whose care was the sick man
during his indisposition?
Under mine, answered Katy, with an air of a
little importance; and care thrown away I may
well call it; for Harvey is quite too despiseable to
think any more nor that.
There was a mutual ignorance of each other's
meaning, between the surgeon of horse and the
loquacious maiden, but it made very little
interruption
in their communicationsboth took a good
deal for granted, and Sitgreaves pursued his
questions
by asking
And how did you treat him?
Why kindly, you may be certain, said Katy
with spirit, and rather tartly.
The doctor means medically, madam, said
Captain Lawton, with a face that would have
honoured
the funeral of the deceased.
I doctor'd him mostly with yarbs, said the
housekeeper smiling her consciousness of error.
With simples, returned the surgeon; they
are safer in the hands of the unlettered than more
powerful remediesbut why had you no regular
attendant?
I'm sure Harvey has suffered enough already
from having so much concerns with the rig'lars,
without having one to wait on his father, replied
the housekeeper; he has lost his all, and made
himself a vagabond through the landand I have
reason to rue the day I ever crossed the threshold
of his house.
Dr. Sitgreaves does not mean a rig'lar soldier,
but a regular physician, madam, said the trooper,
without moving a muscle.
Oh! cried the maiden, again correcting
herself
,
with a smile, for the best of all reasons
there was none to be hadso I took care of him
myself. If there had been a doctor at hand I am
sure we would gladly have had him; for my part,
I am clear for doctoring, though Harvey says I
am killing myself with medicines, but I am sure
it will make but little difference to him whether I
live or die.
Therein you show your sense, said the
surgeon
,
approaching to where the spinster sat
holding
the palms of her hands and the soles of her
feet to the genial heat of a fine fire, making the
most of comfort amid all her troubles; you
appear
to be a sensible, discreet woman, and some
who have had opportunities of acquiring more
correct views, might envy you your respect for
knowledge and the lights of science.
Although the housekeeper did not altogether
comprehend its meaning, she knew it was a
compliment
,
and as such was highly pleased with
the surgeon's observation; with increased
animation
,
therefore, she cried, it was always
said of me, that I wanted nothing but
opportunity
to make quite a physician myselfso
long as before I came to live with Harvey's father,
they called me the bitch doctor.
More true than civil, I dare say, returned
the surgeon, losing sight of the woman's character
in his admiration of her respect for the healing
art. In the absence of more enlightened
counsellors
,
the experience of a discreet matron is
frequently of great efficacy in checking the
progress
of disease in the human system; under such
circumstances, madam, it is dreadful to have to
contend with ignorance and obstinacy.
Bad enough, as I well know from experience,
cried Katy in triumph; Harvey is as obstinate
about such things as a dumb beast; one would
think the care I took of his bed-ridden father,
might learn him better than to despise good
nursing
.
But some day he may know what it is to
want a careful woman in his house, though now I am
sure he is too despiseable himself to have a house.
Indeed, I can easily comprehend the
mortification
you must have felt in having one so
self-willed
to deal with, returned the surgeon,
glancing
his eye reproachfully at his comrade; but you
should rise superior to such opinions, and pity the
ignorance by which they are engendered.
The housekeeper hesitated a moment, at a loss
to comprehend all that the surgeon expressed, yet
she felt it was both complimentary and kind;
therefore, suppressing her natural flow of language
a little, she replied
I tell Harvey his conduct is often despiseable,
and last night he made my words good; but the
opinions of such unbelievers is not very
consequential
;
yet it is dreadful to think how he behaves
at times: now, when he threw away the needle
What! said the surgeon, interrupting her,
does he affect to despise the needle? But it is
my lot to meet with men daily who are equally
perverse, and who show a still more culpable
disrespect
for the information that flows from the
lights of science.
The doctor turned his face towards Captain
Lawton while speaking, but the elevation of the
head, prevented his eye from resting on the grave
countenance maintained by the trooper. Katy
listened with the most profound attention, and
added
Then Harvey is a disbeliever in the tides.
Not believe in the tides, repeated the healer
of bodies in astonishment; does the man distrust
his sensesbut perhaps it is the influence of the
moon that he doubts?
That he does, exclaimed Katy, shaking with
eager delight at meeting with a man of learning,
who could support her in her favorite opinions.
If you was to hear him talk, you would think
he didn't believe there was such a thing as a moon
at all.
It is the misfortune of ignorance and
incredulity
,
madam, that they increase themselves,
said the doctor, gravely. The mind once
rejecting
useful information, insensibly leans to
superstition
and conclusions on the order of nature,
that are not less prejudicial to the cause of truth
than they are at variance with the first principles
of human knowledge.
The spinster was too much awe-struck to
venture
an undigested reply to this speech, and the
surgeon, after pausing a moment in a kind of
philosophical
disdain, continued
That any man in his senses can doubt of the
flux of the tides is more than I could have thought
possible; yet obstinacy is a dangerous inmate to
harbor, and may lead us into any error, however
gross.
You think then they have an effect on the
flux, said the housekeeper, inquiringly.
15*
Miss Peyton rose with a slight smile, and
beckoned
her nieces to give her their assistance in the
adjoining pantry, while for a moment the dark
visage of the attentive Lawton was lighted by an
animation that vanished by an effort as powerful,
and as sudden, as the one that drew it into being.
After reflecting whether he rightly understood
the meaning of the other, the surgeon, making due
allowance for the love of learning, acting upon a
want of education, replied
The moon, you meanmany philosophers
have doubted how far it affects the tides; but I
think it is wilfully rejecting the lights of science
not to believe it causes both the flux and reflux.
As reflux was a disorder the spinster was not
acquainted with, she thought it prudent to be
silent
for a time; yet burning with curiosity to
know the meaning of certain portentous lights
that the other so often alluded to, she ventured to
ask
If them lights he spoke of were what was
called northern lights in these parts?
In charity to her ignorance, the surgeon would
have entered into an elaborate explanation of his
meaning, had he not been interrupted by the
mirth of Lawton. The trooper had listened so
far with great composure; but now he laughed
until his aching bones reminded him of his fall,
and the tears rolled over his cheeks in larger
drops than had ever been seen there before. At
length the offended physician seized an
opportutunity
to say
To you, Captain Lawton, it may be a source
of triumph, that an uneducated woman should
make a mistake in a subject on which men of
science have long been at variance; but yet you
find this respectable matron does not reject the
lightsthe lightsdoes not reject the use of
proper
instruments in repairing injuries sustained by
the human frame. You may possibly remember
sir, her allusion to the use of the needle.
Ay, cried the delighted trooper, to mend
the pedlar's breeches.
Katy drew up in evident displeasure at this
allusion
to such familiarity between herself and the
nether garments of the trader, but prompt to
vindicate
her character for more lofty acquirements,
said
'Twas not a common use that I put that
needle tobut one of much greater virtue.
Explain yourself, madam, said the surgeon
impatiently, that this gentleman may see how
little reason he has for exultation.
Thus solicited, Katy paused to collect sufficient
eloquence with which to garnish her narrative.
The substance of which was, that a child who
had been placed by the guardians of the poor in
the keeping of Harvey, had, in the absence of its
master, injured itself badly in the foot by a large
needle. The offending instrument had been
carefully greased, wrapped in woollen, and placed
in a certain charmed nook of the chimney; while
the foot, from a fear of weakening the incantation,
was left in a state of nature. The arrival of the
pedlar had altered the whole of this admirable
arrangement
,
and the consequences were expressed
by Katy, as she concluded her narrative, by
saying
'Twas no wonder the boy died of a lock-jaw.
Dr. Sitgreaves looked out of the window in
admiration
of the brilliant morningstrove all he
could to avoid the basilisk eyes of his comrade,
but in vain. He was impelled by a feeling that
he could not conquer, to look Captain Lawton in
the face. The trooper had arranged every
muscle
of his countenance in perfect accordance with
due sympathy for the fate of the poor child; but
the exultation of his eyes cut the astounded man
of science to the quick: he muttered something
concerning the condition of his patients, and
retreated
with precipitation.
Miss Peyton entered into the situation of things
at the house of the pedlar, with all the interest of
her excellent feelings: she listened patiently while
Katy recounted more particularly the
circumstances
of the past night as they occurred. The
spinster did not forget to dwell on the magnitude
of the pecuniary loss sustained by Harvey, and in
no manner spared her invectives at his betraying a
secret which might so easily have been kept.
For, Miss Peyton, continued the
house-keeper
,
after a pause of a moment to take breath,
I would have given up life before I would have
given up that secret. At the most, they could
only have killed him, and now a body may say
that they have slain for this world, both soul and
body; or what's the same thing, they have made
him a despiseable vagabond. I wonder who he
thinks would be his wife, or who would keep his
house. For my part, my good name is too
precious
to be living with a lone man; though, for the
matter of that, he is never there. I am resolved
to tell him this day, that stay there a single
woman
I will not an hour after the funeraland
marry him I don't think I willunless he becomes
steadier, and more of a homebody.
The mild mistress of the Locusts suffered the
exuberance of the housekeeper's animation to
expend
itself, and then, by one or two judicious
questions, that denoted a more intimate knowledge
of the windings of the human heart in matters of
Cupid, than might fairly be supposed to belong to
a spinster, she extracted enough from Katy to
discover
the improbability of Harvey's ever
presuming
to offer himself, with his broken fortunes, to
the acceptance of Miss Katharine Haynes. She,
therefore, mentioned her own want of assistance
in the present state of her household, and
expressed
a wish that Katy would change her residence
to the Locusts, in case the pedlar had not farther
use for her services. After a few preliminary
conditions on the part of the wary housekeeper,
she concluded the arrangement; and making a few
more piteous lamentations on the weight of her
own losses, the stupidity of Harvey, and united
with some curiosity to know the future fate of the
pedlar, Katy withdrew to make certain
preparations
for the approaching funeral, which was to
take place that day.
During the interview between the maidens,
Lawton
,
through delicacy, had withdrawn. Anxiety
took him to the room of Captain Singleton.
The character of this youth, it has already been
shown, endeared him in a peculiar manner to
every officer in the corps. The singularly mild
deportment of the young dragoon had, on so many
occasions, been proved not to proceed from want
of manly resolution, that his almost feminine
softness
of manner and appearance, had failed to bring
him into disrepute even among a band of partizan
warriors.
To the major he was as dear as a brother, and
his easy submission to the directions of his
surgeon
had made him a marked favourite with Dr.
Sitgreaves. The rough usage this corps often
received
in their daring attacks, had brought each
of its officers in succession under the temporary
keeping of its surgeon. To Captain Singleton
the man of science had decreed the palm on such
occasions, and Captain Lawton he had fairly
black-balled. He frequently declared, with
unconquerable
simplicity and earnestness of manner,
to his assembled comrades, that it gave him more
pleasure to see the former brought in wounded
than any officer in the squadron, and that the
latter
afforded him the leasta compliment and
condemnation
that was received by the first of the
parties with a quiet smile of good nature, and by
the last with a grave bow of thanks. On the
present
occasion, the mortified surgeon and exulting
trooper met in the room of Captain Singleton,
as a place where they could act on common
ground. Some time was occupied in joint
attentions
to the comfort of the wounded officer, and
the doctor retired to an apartment prepared for
his own accommodation; here, within a few
minutes
,
he was surprized by the entrance of Lawton.
The triumph of the trooper had been so complete,
that he felt he could afford to be generous, and
commencing by voluntarily throwing aside his
coat, the captain cried carelessly
Come, Sitgreaves, administer a little of the
aid of the lights of science to my body, if you
please.
The surgeon was beginning to feel this was a
subject that was intolerable, but venturing his
first glance towards his comrade, he saw with
surprize
the preparations he had made, and an air of
sincerity about him that was unusual to his
manner
when making such a request. Changing his
intended burst of resentment to a tone of civil
inquiry
,
he said
Does Captain Lawton want any thing at my
hands?
Look for yourself, my dear Sit. said the
trooper mildly; here seem to be most of the
colours of the rainbow on this shoulder of mine.
Indeed you have reason for saying so, said
the other, handling the part with great tenderness
and consummate skill; but happily nothing is
broken. It is wonderful how well you escaped.
Oh! I have been a tumbler from my youth,
and I am past minding a few falls from a horse;
but, Sitgreaves, he added with affection, and
pointing to a scar on his body, do you remember
this bit of work?
Perfectly well, Jack, replied the doctor with
a smile, it was bravely obtained, and neatly
extracted
;
but don't you think I had better apply
an oil to these bruises?
Certainly, said Lawton, with unexpected
condescension.
Now, my dear boy, cried the doctor
exultingly
,
as he busied himself in applying the remedy
to the hurts, do you not think it would have
been better to have done all this last night?
Quite probably, returned the other
complacently
.
Yes, Jack, but if you had let me perform
the operation of phlebotomy when I first saw
you, it would have been of infinite service.
No phlebotomy, said the other positively.
It is now too late, replied the dejected
surgeon
;
but a dose of oil would carry off the
humours
famously.
To this the captain made no reply, but gritted
his teeth in a way that showed the fortress of his
mouth was not to be assailed without a resolute
resistance, and the experienced physician changed
the subject by saying
It is a pity, John, that you did not catch the
rascal, after the danger and trouble you
incurred
.
The captain of dragoons made no reply; and,
while placing some bandages on the wounded
shoulder, the surgeon continued
If I have any wish at all to destroy human life,
it is to have the pleasure of seeing that traitor
hung.
I thought your business was to cure, and not
to slay, said the trooper drily.
Ay! but he has caused us such heavy losses
by his information, that I sometimes feel a very
unchristian temper towards that spy.
You should not encourage such feelings of
animosity to any of your fellow creatures,
returned
Lawton, in a tone that caused the
operator
to drop a pin he was arranging in the
bandages
,
from his hand. He looked the patient in the
face to remove all doubts of his identity, and
finding
,
however, it was his old comrade, Captain
John Lawton, who had spoken, he rallied his
astonished
faculties, and proceeded by saying
Your doctrine is just, and in general I
subscribe
to it. But, John, my dear fellow, is the
bandage easy?
Quite.
Yes, I agree with you as a whole; but as
matter is infinitely divisible, so no case exists
without an exception. Lawton, don't youdo
youfeel easy?
Very.
It is not only cruel to the sufferer, but
sometimes
unjust to others, to take human life where a
less punishment would answer the purpose. Now,
Jack, if you were onlymove your arm a little
if you were onlyI hope you feel easier, my
dear friend?
Much.
If, my dear John, you would teach your men
to cut with more discretion, it would answer you
the same purposeand give me great pleasure.
The doctor drew a heavy sigh, as he was
enabled
to get rid of what was nearest to his heart;
and the dragoon coolly replaced his coat,
saying
with great deliberation, as he retired
I know no troop that cut more judiciously
they generally shave from the crown to the jaw.
The disappointed operator collected his
instruments
,
and with a heavy heart, proceeded to pay
a visit to the room of Colonel Wellmere.
16
CHAPTER XII.
This fairy form contains a soul as mighty
As that which lives within a giant's frame;
These slender limbs, that tremble like the aspen
At summer evening's sigh, uphold a spirit,
Which rous'd, can tower to the height of heaven,
And light those shining windows of the face
With much of heaven's own radiance.
Due
.
The
number and character of her guests had
greatly added to the cares of Miss Jeannette
Peyton
.
The morning had found them all restored,
in some measure, to their former ease of body,
with the exception of the youthful captain of
dragoons
,
who had been so deeply regretted by
Dunwoodie
.
The wound of this officer was severe,
though the surgeon persevered in saying that it
was without danger. His comrade, we have
shown, had deserted his couch; and Henry
Wharton
awoke from a sleep that had been undisturbed
by any thing but a dream of suffering amputation
under the hands of a surgical novice. As it
proved, however, to be nothing but a dream, the
youth found himself much refreshed by his
slumbers
,
and Dr. Sitgreaves removed all further
apprehensions
,
by confidently pronouncing him a
well man within a fortnight.
During all this time Colonel Wellmere had not
made his appearance; he breakfasted in his own
room, and, notwithstanding certain significant
smiles of the man of science, declared himself too
much injured to rise from his bed. Leaving him.
therefore, endeavouring to conceal his chagrin in
the solitude of his chamber, the surgeon proceeded
to the more grateful task of sitting an hour by the
bedside of George Singleton. A slight flush was on
the face of the patient as the doctor entered the
room, and he advanced promptly and laid his
fingers
on the pulse of the youth, beckoning him to
be silent, while he filled the vacuum in the
discourse
,
by saying
Growing symptoms of a febrile pulseno
no, my dear George, you must remain quiet and
dumb; though your eyes look better, and your
skin has even a moisture.
Nay, my dear Sitgreaves, said the youth,
taking his hand, you see there is no fever about
melook, is there any of Jack Lawton's
hoarfrost
on my tongue?
No, indeed, said the surgeon, clapping a
spoon in the mouth of the other, forcing it open,
and looking down his throat as if he was disposed
to visit his interior in person; your tongue is
well, and your pulse begins to lower again. Ah!
the bleeding did you good. Phlebotomy is a
sovereign
specific for southern constitutions. But
that mad-cap Lawton obstinately refused to be
blooded for a fall he had from his horse last
night. Why, George, your case is becoming
singular
,
continued the doctor, instinctively
throwing
aside his wig; your pulse even and soft, your
skin moist, but your eye fiery, and cheek flushed.
Oh! I must examine more closely into these
symptoms.
Softly, my good friend, softly, said the
youth, falling back on his pillow, and losing some
of that colour which alarmed his companion; I
believe in extracting the ball you did for me all
that is required. I am free from pain, and only
weak, I do assure you.
Captain Singleton, said the surgeon with
heat, it is presumptuous in you to pretend to tell
your medical attendant when you are free from
pain; if it be not to enable us to decide in such
matters, of what avails the lights of science? for
shame, George, for shame; even that perverse
fellow, John Lawton, could not behave with more
obstinacy.
His patient smiled as he gently repulsed his
physician in an attempt to undo the bandages,
and with a returning glow to his cheeks,
inquired
Do, Archibald, a term of endearment that
seldom failed to soften the operator's heart, tell
me what spirit from heaven has been gliding
around my apartment, while I lay pretending to
sleep, but a few minutes before you entered.
If any one interferes with my patients, cried
the doctor hastily, I will teach them, spirit or
no spirit, what it is to meddle with another man's
concerns.
Tutmy dear fellow, replied the wounded
man with a faint smile, there was no
interference
made, nor any intended; see, exhibiting
the bandages, every thing is as you left it
but it glided about the room with the grace of a
fairy, and the tenderness of an angel.
The surgeon, having satisfied himself that every
thing was as he had left it, very deliberately
resumed
his seat and replaced his wig, as he
inquired
,
with a brevity that would have honoured
Lieutenant
Mason
Had it petticoats, George?
I saw nothing but its heavenly eyesits bloom
its majestic stepits grace; replied the young
man, with rather more ardor than his surgeon
thought consistent with his debilitated condition,
and he laid his hand on his mouth, to stop him;
saying himself
It must have been Miss Jeannette Peytona
lady of fine accomplishments, withwithhem
with something of the kind of step you speak of
a very complacent eye; and as to the bloom, I
dare say offices of charity can summon as fine a
colour to her cheeks, as glows in the faces of her
more youthful nieces.
Nieces! said the invalid; has she nieces
then? Oh, the angel I saw may be a daughter, a
sister, or a niece, but never an aunt.
Hush, George, hush, your talking has brought
your pulse up again; you must observe quiet,
and prepare for a meeting with your own sister,
who will be here within an hour.
What, Isabella! and who sent for her?
The major, said the surgeon drily.
Kind, considerate Dunwoodie, murmured
the exhausted youth, sinking again on his pillow;
where the commands of his attendant compelled
him to continue in silence.
Even Captain Lawton had been received with
many and courteous inquiries after the state of his
health, from all the members of the family when
he made his morning entrance; but an invisible
spirit presided over the comforts of the English
colonel. Sarah had shrunk with retiring delicacy
from entering the room; yet she knew the
position
of every glass, and had, with her own hands,
supplied the contents of every bowl, that stood on
his well furnished table.
At the time of which we write we were a
divided
people, and Sarah thought it was no more
than her right to cherish the institutions of that
country to which she yet clung as the land of her
forefathers: but there were other, and more
cogent
reasons for the silent preference she was
16*
giving to the Englishman. His image had first
filled the void in her youthful fancy, and it was an
image that was distinguished by many of those
attractions that can enchain a female heart. It is
true, he wanted the graceful and lofty stature of
Peyton Dunwoodie, his commanding brow, his
speaking eye, and his clear and comprehensive
diction; but his skin was fair, his cheeks coloured,
and his teeth no less white than those which shone
in the fascinating smile of the young Virginian.
Sarah had moved round the house during the
morning, casting frequent and longing glances at
the door of Wellmere's apartment, anxious to
learn the condition of his wounds, and yet ashamed
to inquire: conscious interest kept her tongue tied,
until her sister, with the frankness of innocence,
had put the desired question to Dr. Sitgreaves.
Colonel Wellmere, said the operator
gravely
,
is in what I call a state of free-will, madam.
He is ill, or he is well, as he pleases; his case,
young lady, exceeds my art to heal; and I take it,
Sir Henry Clinton is the best adviser he can
apply
to: though Major Dunwoodie has made the
communication with his leech rather difficult.
Frances smiled archly, but averted her face to
do so, while Sarah moved haughtily, and with the
stately grace of an offended Juno, from the
apartment
.
Her own room, however, afforded her but
little to relieve her thoughts, and in passing through
the long gallery that communicated with each of
the chambers of the building, she noticed the door
of Singleton's room to be open. The wounded
youth seemed sleeping, and was alone. Sarah
ventured lightly into the apartment, and busied
herself for a few minutes in arranging the tables,
and nourishment provided for the patient, hardly
conscious of what she was doing, and possibly
dreaming that it was done for another. The
natural
bloom of her cheek was heightened by the
insinuation of the surgeon, and the lustre of her
eye was by no means diminished from the same
cause. The sound of the approaching footsteps
of Sitgreaves had hastened her retreat through
another door, and down a private stair-way to the
side of her sister. Together they sought the fresh
air on the piazza to the cottage, and they pursued
their walk arm in arm, holding the following
dialogue
There is something disagreeable about this
surgeon, Dunwoodie has honoured us with, said
Sarah, that causes me to wish him away, most
heartily.
Frances fixed her laughing eyes on her sister,
who, meeting their playful glance as they turned
in their walk, blushed yet deeper than before as
she added hastily; but I forget he is one of this
renowned corps of Virginians, and as such must be
spoken reverently of.
As respectfully as you please, my dear sister,
returned Frances mildly; there is but little
danger
of your exceeding the truth.
Not in your opinion, said the elder with a
little warmth; but I think Mr. Dunwoodie has
taken a liberty that exceeds the rights of
consanguinity
;
he has made our father's house an
hospital
.
We ought to be grateful, replied the younger
in a low voice, that none of the patients it
contains
are dearer to us.
Your brother is one, said Sarah laconically.
True, true, interrupted Frances hastily, and
blushing to the eyes; but he leaves his room,
and thinks his wound lightly purchased by the
pleasure of being with his friendsif, she added
with a tremulous lip, this dreadful suspicion that
is affixed to his visit were removed, I could feel
his wound as nothing.
You now have the fruits of rebellion brought
home to you, said Sarah, moving across the
piazza
with something more than her ordinary
stateliness
;
a brother wounded and a prisoner, and
perhaps a victim; your father distressed, his
privacy
interrupted, and not improbably his estates
torn from him on account of his loyalty to his
king.
Frances continued her walk in silence. While
facing the northern entrance to the vale, her eye
was uniformly fastened on the point where the
road was suddenly lost by the intervention of a
hill; and at each turn, as she lost sight of the
spot, she lingered until an impatient movement of
her sister quickened her pace to an even motion
with that of the other. At length, a single horse
chaise was seen making its way carefully among
the stones which lay scattered over the country
road that wound through the valley, and
approached
the cottage. Frances lost her brilliancy of
colour as the vehicle gradually drew nigher, and
when she was enabled to see a female form in it
by the side of a liveried black who held the reins,
her limbs shook with an agitation that compelled
her to lean on Sarah for support. In a few
minutes
the travellers approached the gate, and it
was thrown open by a dragoon who had followed
the carriage, and who had been the messenger
despatched by Dunwoodie to the father of
Captain
Singleton. Miss Peyton advanced to receive
their guest, and the sisters united in giving her the
kindest welcome; still Frances could with
difficulty
withdraw her truant eyes from reading the
countenance of the visitor. She was young, of a
light and fragile form, yet of exquisite proportions;
but it was in her eye that her greatest charm
existed
;
it was large, full, black, piercing, and at
times a little wild. Her hair was luxuriant, and
without the powder it was then the fashion to
wear, but shone in its own, glossy, raven,
blackness
.
A few of its locks had fallen on her cheek,
giving its chilling whiteness by the contrast yet a
more deadly character. Dr. Sitgreaves supported
her from the chaise, and when she gained the
floor of the piazza, she turned her expressive eye
on the face of the practitioner in silence; but it
spoke all that she wished to say
Your brother is out of danger, and wishes to
see you, Miss Singleton, said the surgeon in
reply
to her look.
For an instant the lady clasped her hands with
energy, rolled her dark eyes to heaven, while a
slight flush, like the last reflected tinge of the
setting
sun, beamed on her features, and she gave
vent to her feelings in a flood of tears. Frances
had stood contemplating the action and face of
Isabella with a kind of uneasy admiration, but she
now sprang to her side with the ardor of a sister,
and kindly drawing her arm in her own, led the
way to a retired room. The movement was so
ingenuous, so considerate, and so delicate, that
even Miss Peyton withheld her interference,
following
the youthful pair with only her eyes and a
smile of complacency. The feeling was
communicated
to all the spectators, and they dispersed
in pursuit of their usual avocations. Isabella
yielded to the gentle influence of Frances without
resistance, and having gained the room where the
latter conducted her, wept in silence on the
shoulder
of the observant and soothing maiden, until
Frances thought her tears exceeded the emotion
natural to the occasion. The sobs of Miss
Singleton
for a time were violent and uncontroulable,
until with an evident exertion she yielded to a
kind observation of her companion, and succeeded
in suppressing her tears: raising her face to the
eyes of Frances, she rose, while a smile of
beautiful
radiance passed over her features, made a
hasty apology for the excess of her emotion, and
desired to be conducted to the room of her brother.
The meeting between the brother and sister
was warm, but, by an effort on the part of the lady,
more composed than her previous agitation had
given reason to expect. Isabella found her
brother
looking better, and in less danger than her
sensitive imagination had led her to suppose, and
her spirits rose in proportion; from despondency
she passed to something like gayety; her
beautiful
eyes sparkled with renovated brilliancy, and
her face was lighted with smiles so fascinating,
that Frances, who, in compliance with her earnest
intreaties, had accompanied her to the sick
chamber
,
sat gazing on a countenance that possessed
such wonderful variability, as if impelled by a
charm that was beyond her control. The youth
had thrown an earnest look at Frances as soon
as his sister had raised herself from his arms, and
perhaps it was the first glance at the lovely
lineaments
of the maiden, where the gazer turned his
eyes from the view in disappointment; pausing a
moment, during which the wandering eyes of
Singleton
were bent on the open door of the room,
he said, as he took the hand of his sister
affectionately
And where is Dunwoodie, Isabella? he is
never weary of kind actions. After a day of such
service as that of yesterday, he has spent the night
in bringing me a nurse, whose presence alone is
able to raise me from my couch.
The expression of the lady's countenance
changed instantly; her eye roved round the
apartment
with a character of wildness in it that
repelled
the anxious maiden, who studied her
movements
with intensity of interest, as forcibly as the
moment before it had attracted her; while the
sister answered with a trembling emotion
Dunwoodie! is he then not here? with me
he has not been: I thought to have met him by the
side of my brother's bed.
He has duties that require his presence
elsewhere
;
yes, these English are said to be out by
the way of the Hudson, and give the light troops
but little rest, said the brother musing; surely
nothing else could have kept him so long from a
wounded friend; but, Isabella, the meeting has
been too much for you; you tremble like an
aspen
.
Isabella made no reply, but stretched forth her
hand towards the table which held the
nourishment
of the captain, and the attentive Frances
comprehended her wishes in a moment; a glass
of water in some measure revived the sister, who,
smiling faintly, was enabled to say
Doubtless it is his duty. 'Twas said above, a
royal party was moving on the river; though I
passed the troops but a short two miles from this
spot. The latter part of the sentence was
hardly
audible, and spoken more in the manner of a
soliloquy than as if intended for the ears of her
companions.
On the march, Isabella? eagerly inquired
her brother.
No, dismounted, and seemingly at rest, was
the reply, in the same abstracted manner as
before
.
The wondering brother turned his gaze on the
countenance of his sister, who sat with her full,
black eye bent on the carpet in unconscious
absence
,
but found no explanation. His look was
changed to the face of Frances, who, startling with
the earnestness of his expression, arose, and
hastily
inquired if he would have any assistance.
If, madam, you can pardon the rudeness,
said the wounded officer, making a feeble effort
to raise his body, I would request to have
Captain
Lawton's company for a moment.
Frances hastened instantly to communicate his
wish to that gentleman, and impelled by an anxious
interest she could not control, returned again to
her seat by the side of Miss Singleton.
Lawton, said the youth impatiently as the
trooper entered, hear you from the major?
The eye of the sister was now bent on the
face of the trooper, who made his salutations to
the lady with the ease of a gentleman, blended
with the frankness of a soldier, and answered
His man has been here twice to inquire how
we fared in the Lazaretto.
And why not himself? said the other
quickly
.
Ah! that is a question the major can answer
best himself, returned the dragoon drily; but
you know the red coats are abroad, and
Dunwoodie
commands in the county; these English
must be looked to.
True, said Singleton slowly, as if struck
with the other's reasons; but how is it that you
are idle when there is work to do?
My sword arm is not in the best condition,
and Roanoke has a dreadfully shambling gait this
morning, said the trooper with a shrug;
besides
there is another reason I could mention, if
it were not that Miss Wharton would never
forgive
me.
Speak, I beg, sir, without dread of my
displeasure
,
said Frances, withdrawing her eyes from
the countenance of Miss Singleton, and returning
the good-humoured smile of the trooper with the
natural archness of her own lovely face.
The odours of your kitchen, then, cried
Lawton
bluntly, forbid my quitting the domains,
until
I qualify myself to speak with more certainty
concerning the fatness of the land.
Oh! aunt Jeannette is exerting herself to do
credit to my father's hospitality, said the
laughing
maid, and I am a truant from her labours, as
I shall be a stranger to her favour unless I proffer
my assistance.
After making a proper apology to the stranger,
Frances withdrew to seek her aunt, musing
deeply
on the character and extreme sensibility of the
new acquaintance chance had brought to the
cottage
.
The wounded officer followed her with his eyes,
as her lovely figure moved with infantile grace
through the door of his apartment, and as she
vanished
from his view, observed
Such an aunt and niece are seldom to be met
with, Jack; this seems a fairy, but the aunt is
angelic
.
Ah! George, you are doing well, I see, said
the trooper; your enthusiasm holds its own.
I should be ungrateful as well as insensible
did I not bear testimony to the loveliness of Miss
Peyton.
A good motherly lady, said the dragoon
drily; but as to love, you know that is a matter
of taste. I think a few years younger, with
deference
to the sex, bowing to Miss Singleton,
would accord better with my fancy.
She must be under twenty, said the other
quickly.
Oh, doubtless, about nineteen, said Lawton
with extreme gravity; yet she looks a trifle
older.
17
You have mistaken an elder sister for the
aunt, said Isabella, laying her fair hand on
the mouth of the invalid, but you must be
silent
;
your feelings are beginning to affect your
frame.
The entrance of Doctor Sitgreaves, who, in
some alarm, noticed the increase of feverish
symptoms
in his patient, enforced this mandate; and
the trooper withdrew to pay a visit of condolence
to Roanoke, who had been an equal sufferer with
himself in their last night's somerset. To his
great joy, his man pronounced the steed to be
equally convalescent with the master; and
Lawton
found, that by dint of rubbing the animal's
limbs several hours without ceasing, he was
enabled
to place his feet in what he called
systematic
motion. Orders were accordingly given to
be in readiness to prepare to rejoin the troop at
the four corners, so soon as the captain had shared
in the bounty of the approaching banquet.
In the mean time, Henry Wharton had entered
the apartment of Wellmere, and by his
sympathetic
feelings on account of a defeat in which
they had been alike unfortunate, succeeded
greatly
in restoring the colonel to his own good graces;
he was consequently enabled to rise and prepare
to meet a rival of whom he had spoken so lightly,
and as the result had proved, with so little
reason
.
Wharton knew this misfortune, as it was
termed by both, was owing to the other's
rashness
;
but he forbore to speak of any thing
except
the unfortunate accident which had deprived
the English of their leader, and their consequent
defeat.
In short, Wharton, said the colonel putting
one leg out of bed, it may be called a
combination
of untoward events; your own ungovernable
horse prevented my orders from being carried
to the major, in season to flank the rebels.
Very true, replied the captain, kicking a
slipper towards the bed; had we succeeded in
getting a few good fires upon them in flank, we
should have sent these brave Virginians to the
right about.
Ay! and that in double quick time, cried
the colonel with very considerable animation,
making the other leg follow its companion; then
it was necessary to route the guides, you know,
and the movement gave them the best possible
opportunity to charge.
Yes, said the other, sending the second
slipper
after the first, and that Dunwoodie never
overlooks an advantage.
I think if we had the thing to do over again,
continued the colonel, raising himself on his feet,
we might alter the case very materially, though
the chief thing the rebels have now to boast of is
my capture; they were repulsed you saw, in their
attempt to drive us from the wood.
At least they would have been, had they made
an attack, said the captain, throwing his clothes
within reach of the colonel.
Ay! why that, you know, is the same thing,
returned Wellmere, dressing himself; to
assume
such an attitude as to intimidate your
enemy
is the chief art of war.
Doubtless, said the captain, entering
himself
a little into the proud feelings of a soldier;
then you may remember in one charge they
were completely routed.
Truetrue, cried the colonel with
animation
;
had I been there to have improved that
advantage we might have turned the table
completely
on the yankies; in saying which he
completed his toilette, and was prepared to make
his appearance, fully restored to his own good
opinion, and fairly persuaded that his capture
was owing to casualties absolutely without the
control of man.
The knowledge that Colonel Wellmere was to
be a partaker in the feast in no degree diminished
the preparations which were already making
for that important event; and Sarah, after
receiving
the compliments of the gentleman, and
making, with blushing cheeks, many kind inquiries
after the state of his wounds, proceeded in person
to lend her aid in embellishing what would now
be of additional interest.
CHAPTER XIII.
I will stand to and feed,
Although my last: no matter, since I feel
The best is past:Brother, my Lord the Duke
Stand to, and do as we
Tempest
.
The savour of preparation, which had been
noticed
by Captain Lawton, began to increase
vastly
within the walls of the CottageCertain sweet
smelling odours, that rose from the subterraneous
territories of Csar, gave to the trooper the
most pleasing assurance, that his olfactory nerves,
which on such occasions were as acute as his eyes
on others, had faithfully performed their duty;
and for the benefit of enjoying the passing sweets
as they arose, the dragoon so placed himself
at a window of the building, that not a vapour,
charged with the spices of the east, could exhale
on its passage to the clouds, without first giving
its incense, by way of tribute, to his nose.
Lawton, however, by no means indulged himself
in this comfortable arrangement without first
making such preparations, to do meet honour to
the feast, as his scanty wardrobe would allow.
The uniform of his corps was always a passport
to the proudest tables, and this, though somewhat
tarnished by faithful service and unceremonious
usage, was properly brushed and decked out for
the occasion. His head, which nature had
marked
with the blackness of a crow, now shone with
the spotless whiteness of the dove; and his hand,
17*
that so well became, by its bony and gigantic frame,
the sabre it wielded so indiscreetly, peered from
beneath a ruffle with something like maiden
delicacy
.
The improvements of the dragoon went
no farther, excepting that his boots shone with
more than holiday splendor, and his spurs
glittered
in the rays of the sun like worthy offspring of
the hills of Potosi.
Csar moved through the apartments with a
face charged with an importance, vastly
exceeding
that which had accompanied him in his
melancholy
task of the morning. The black had early
returned from the message on which he had been
despatched by the pedlar, and obedient to the
commands of his mistress, promptly appeared to
give his services, where his allegiance was due
so serious, indeed, was his duty now becoming
that it was only by odd moments he was enabled
to impart to his sable brother, who had been sent
in attendance on Miss Singleton to the Locusts,
any portion of the wonderful incidents of the
momentous
night he had so lately passed through.
By ingeniously using, however, such moments as
might be fairly thought his own, Csar
communicated
so many of the heads of his tale, as served
to open the eyes of his visitor to a width that
justly entitled them to the significant appellative
of saucer. Indeed, to such a state of
amazement
had the gusto for the marvellous conducted
the sable worthies, that Miss Peyton found it
necessary
to interpose her authority, in order to
postpone the residue of the history to a more
befitting
opportunity.
Ah! Miss Jin'nett, said Csar shaking his
head, and looking all that he expressed, 'twas
awful to see Johnny Birch walk on a feet, when
he lie dead.
This concluded the conversation for the present,
though the black promised himself, and actually
put in execution his intention of having many a
good gossip on the solemn subject hereafter.
The ghost thus happily laid, the department of
Miss Peyton throve with additional success, and
by the time the afternoon's sun had travelled a
two hours journey from the meridian, the formal
procession from the kitchen to the parlour
commenced
under the auspices of Csar, who led the
van, supporting a turkey on the palms of his
withered
hands with the dexterity of a balance
master
.
Next followed the servant of Captain Lawton,
bearing, as he marched stiffly and walking wide,
as if allowing room for his steed, a ham of true
Virginian flavour;being a present from the
spinster's
wealthy brother in Accomac. The
supporter
of this savory dish kept his eye on his trust
with military precision, and by the time he
reached
his destination it might be difficult to say which
contained the most juice, his mouth or the
Accomac
bacon.
Third in the line was to be seen the valet of
Colonel Wellmere, who carried in either hand
chickens fricassied, and oyster pattys.
After him marched the attendant of Dr.
Sitgreaves
,
who had instinctively seized an
enormous
tureen, as most resembling matters he
understood
;
and followed on in place, until the
steams of the soup so completely bedimmed the
spectacles he wore as a badge of office, that on
arriving at the scene of action, he was compelled
to deposite his freight on the floor until, by
removing
the glasses, he could see his way through
the piles of reserved china and plate-warmers
in safety.
Next followed another trooper, whose duty it
was to attend on Captain Singleton; and as if
apportioning
his appetite to the feeble state of his
master, he had contented himself with conveying
a pair of ducks, roasted until their tempting
fragrance
began to make him repent his demolishing
so lately, a breakfast that had been provided for his
master's sister, with another prepared for himself.
The white boy who belonged to the house
brought up the rear, groaning under the load of
sundry dishes of vegetables that the cook, by way
of climax, had unwittingly heaped on him.
But this was far from all of the preparations for
that day's feast. Csar no sooner deposited his
bird, which but the week before had been flying
amongst the highlands of Duchess, little dreaming
of so soon heading such a goodly assemblage, than
he turned mechanically on his heel, and took up his
line of march again for the kitchen. In this
evolution
the black was imitated by his companions in
succession, and another procession to the parlour
followed in the same order. By this admirable
arrangement, whole flocks of pigeons, certain
bevys
of quails, shoals of flat-fish, bass, and sundry
wood-cock, found their way into the presence of
the company above stairs.
A third attack brought suitable quantities of
potatoes, onions, beets, cold-slaw, rice, and all
the other minuti of a goodly dinner; and for a
time this completed the preparations.
The board now fairly groaned with American
profusion, and Csar, glancing his eye over the
show with a most approving conscience, after
moving every dish that had not been placed on the
table with his own hands, proceeded to acquaint
the mistress of the revels, that his task was happily
accomplished.
Some half hour before the martial array we
have just recorded took place, all the ladies had
disappeared, much in the same unaccountable
manner that swallows flee the approach of winter.
But the spring-time of their return had arrived,
and the whole party were collected in an
apartment
that, in consequence of its containing no
side-table, and being furnished with a
chintz-covered
settee, was termed a withdrawing room.
The kind-hearted spinster had deemed the
occasion
worthy, not only of extraordinary
preparations
in the culinary department, but had seen
proper
to deck her own person in garments suited to
the guests it was now her happiness to entertain.
On her head Miss Peyton wore a cap of
exquisite
lawn, which was ornamented in front with a
broad border of lace, that spread from the face in
such a manner as to admit of a display of artificial
flowers, clustered in a tasteful group on the
summit
of her fine forehead.
The colour of her hair was lost in the profusion
of powder with which it was covered; but a slight
curling of the extremities in some degree relieved
the formality of its starched arrangement, and gave
a look of feminine softness to the features.
Her dress was a rich, heavy silk of violet
colour
,
cut low around the bust, with a stomacher of
the same materials, that fitted close to the figure,
and exhibited the form, from the shoulders to the
waist, in its true proportions: below, the dress
was full, and sufficiently showed, that parsimony
in attire was not a foible of the day. A small
hoop displayed the beauty of the fabric to
advantage
,
and aided in giving majesty to the figure.
The tall stature of the spinster was heightened
by shoes of the same material with the dress,
whose heels added more than an inch to the
liberality
of nature.
The sleeves were short and close to the limb,
until they fell off at the elbows in large ruffles,
that hung in rich profusion from the arm when
extended
;
and duplicates and triplicates of lawn,
trimmed with Dresden lace, lent their aid in giving
delicacy to a hand and arm that yet retained their
whiteness and symmetry. A treble row of large
pearl closely encircled her throat, and a
handkerchief
of lace partially concealed that part of
the person that the silk had left exposed, but which
the experience of forty years had warned Miss
Peyton should now be veiled.
Thus attired, and standing erect with the lofty
grace that distinguished the manners of that day,
the spinster would have looked into atoms a bevy
of modern belles.
The taste of Sarah had kept even pace with
the decorations of her aunt; and a dress,
differing
in no respect from the one just described, but
in material and tints, exhibited her imposing form
to equal advantage. The satin of her robe was
of a pale blush colour. Twenty years did not,
however, require the skreen that was prudent in
forty, and nothing but an envious border of
exquisite
lace hid, in some measure, what the satin left
exposed to the view. The upper part of the bust
and fine fall of the shoulders were blazing in all
their native beauty, and like the aunt, the throat
was ornamented by a treble row of pearl, to
correspond
with which were rings of the same jewel
in the ears. The head was without a cap, and
the hair drawn up from the countenance so as to
give to the eye all the loveliness of a forehead
as polished as marble and as white as snow. A
few straggling curls fell gracefully in the neck,
and a bouquet of artificial flowers was also placed,
like a coronet, over her commanding brow.
Miss Singleton had yielded her brother to the
advice of Dr. Sitgreaves, who had succeeded in
getting his patient in a deep sleep after quieting
certain feverish symptoms that followed the
agitation
of the interview related. The sister was
persuaded by the observant mistress of the
mansion
to make one of the party, and sat by the side
of Sarah; differing but little in appearance from
that lady, except in refusing the use of powder on
her raven locks, and that her unusually high
forehead
and large and brilliant eye gave an
expression
of thoughtfulness to her features, that
was possibly heightened by the paleness of her
cheek.
Last and least, but not the most unlovely in this
display of female charms, was the youngest
daughter
of Mr. Wharton. Frances, we have already
mentioned, left the city before she had attained to
the age of fashionable womanhood. A few
adventurous
spirits were already beginning to make
inroads in the barriers which custom had so long
drawn around the comforts of the fair sex; and
the maid had so far ventured in imitation, as to
trust her beauty to the height which nature had
given her. This was but little, but that little was
a master-piece. Frances several times had
determined
,
in the course of the morning, to bestow
more than usual pains in the decoration of her
person. Each time in succession, as she formed
this resolution, she spent a few minutes in looking
earnestly towards the north, and then she as
invariably
changed it.
At the appointed hour, the maid appeared in the
drawing room, clothed in a vestment of pale blue
silk, of a cut and fashion much like that worn by her
sister. Her hair was left to the wild curls of nature,
its exuberance being confined to the crown of her
head by a long, low comb made of light tortoise
shell; a colour barely distinguishable in the golden
hue of her tresses. Her dress was without a plait
or a wrinkle, and fitted the form with an
exactitude
that might lead one to imagine the arch girl
more than suspected the beauties it displayed. A
tucker of rich Dresden lace softened the contour
of the figure. Her head was without ornament;
but around her throat was a necklace of gold
clasped in front with a rich cornelian.
Dr. Sitgreaves was a mineralogist among his
other qualities, and during the day he ventured a
remark on the beauty of the stone; and for a long
time the simple operator was at a loss to
conjecture
what there was in the observation to call the
blood so tumultuously to the face of the maiden.
His surprise might haply have continued to the
hour of his death, had not Lawton kindly
intimated
that it was indignation at his overlooking
the object on which the bauble reposed. The gloves
of kid which concealed the hands and part of the
arm, leaving enough of the latter in sight,
however
,
to proclaim its fair proportions, indicated
that there was no one present to tempt the
flattering
,
and perhaps unconscious display, of
womanly
power.
Once, and once only, as they moved towards
the repast prepared with so much judgment and
skill by Csar, did Lawton see a foot thrust itself
from beneath the folds of her robe, and exhibit
its little beauties encased in a slipper of blue silk,
clasped close to the shape by a buckle of
brilliants
.
The trooper caught himself sighing as he
thought, though it was good for nothing in the
stirrup
,
how enchantingly it would grace a minuet.
As the black appeared on the threshold of the
room making a low reverence, which has been
interpreted
for some centuries into dinner waits,
Mr. Wharton, clad in a dress of drab, and
loaded
with enormous buttons, advanced formally to
Miss Singleton, and bending his powdered head to
near the level of the hand he extended, received
her's in return.
Dr. Sitgreaves offered the same homage to Miss
Peyton, and met with equal favor; the lady first
pausing, with stately grace, to draw on her gloves.
Colonel Wellmere was honoured with a smile
from Sarah while performing a similar duty; and
Frances gave the ends of her taper fingers to
Captain
Lawton with a manner, that said so much to
the corps, and so little to the man.
Much time, and some trouble was expended
before
the whole party were, to the great joy of
Csar
,
comfortably arranged around the table with
proper attention to all points of etiquette and
precedence. The black well knew the viands
were getting cold, and felt his honour concerned
in the event.
For the first ten minutes all but the captain
of dragoons found themselves in a situation
much to their liking; but he felt himself a little
soured at the multiplicity of the questions and
offers
of the host, which were meant to be conducive
to his enjoyments, but which in truth had an
exactly
contrary effect. The captain could not eat
and answer in a breath, and the demands for the
latter somewhat interfered with the execution of
the former.
Next came the drinking with the ladies; but as
the wine was excellent, and the glasses of very
ample size, the trooper bore this interruption with
consummate good nature. Nay, so fearful was he
of giving offence, and omitting any of the nicer
points of punctilio, that having commenced this
courtesy with the lady who sat next him, he
persevered
until not one of his fair companions could,
with justice, reproach him with partiality in this
particular.
His long abstemiousness from any thing like
generous wine might plead the excuse of Captain
Lawton, especially when exposed to so strong a
18
temptation as was now before him. Mr.
Wharton
had been one of a set of politicians in
New-York
,
whose principal exploits, before the war,
had been to assemble, and pass sage opinions on
the signs of the times, under the inspiration of
certain liquors which were made from a grape
that grew on the south side of the island of
Madeira
,
and found its way into the colonies of North
America by the way of the West Indies,
sojourning
awhile in the Western Archipelago, by way
of trying the virtues of the climate. A large
supply
of this cordial had been drawn from his
store-house
in the city, and some of it now sparkled in
a bottle before the captain, blushing luxuriantly
in the rays of the sun, which were passing
obliquely through it.
If the meat and vegetables had made their
entrance
with perfect order and propriety, their
exeunt was effected with far less. The point was
to clear the board something after the fabled tale
of the harpies, and by dint of scrabbling, tossing,
breaking, and spilling, the overflowing remnants
of the repast vanished from the room. And now
another series of processions commenced, by
virtue
of which a goodly display of pasty with its
usual accompaniments, garnished the table.
Mr. Wharton poured out a glass of wine for the
lady who sat on his right hand, and pushing the
bottle to a guest, said, with a low bow
We are to be honoured with a toast from Miss
Singleton.
Although there was nothing more in this
movement
than occurred every day on such
occasions
,
yet the lady trembled, coloured, and grew
pale again, seemingly endeavouring to rally her
thoughts, until by her agitation she had excited
the interest of the whole party; when, by an
effort, and in a manner as if she had strived in
vain to think of another, Isabella said faintly
Major Dunwoodie.
The health was drank cheerfully by all but
Colonel Wellmere, who wet his lips, and drew
figures on the table with some of the liquor he
had spilt; and Frances thought deeply on the
manner of doing, what in itself would have
excited
no suspicions.
At length Colonel Wellmere broke silence by
saying aloud to Captain Lawton
I suppose, sir, this Mr. Dunwoodie will
receive
promotion in the rebel army, for the
advantage
my misfortune gave him over my command.
The trooper had supplied the wants of nature
to his perfect satisfaction; and perhaps, with the
exception of Washington and his immediate
commander
,
there was no mortal whose displeasure
he regarded a tittle: he was free to converse or
to fight; to him it mattered nought. First
helping
himself, therefore, to a little of his favorite
bottle, he replied with admirable coolness
Colonel Wellmere, your pardonMajor
Dunwoodie
owes his allegiance to the confederated
states of North America, and where he owes it he
pays it, and is no rebel; promoted I hope he may
be, both because he deserves it, and I am next in
rank in the corps; and I know not what you call
a misfortune, unless you deem meeting the
Virginia
horse as such.
We will not differ about terms, sir said the
colonel haughtily; I spoke as duty to my
sovereign
prompted; but do you not call the loss of a
commander a misfortune to a party?
It certainly may be so, said the trooper with
great emphasis.
Miss Peyton, will you favor us with a toast?
cried the master of the house, anxious to stop a
dialogue in which he might be called on for an
opinion.
The spinster bowed her head with infinite
dignity
as she named General Montrose; and her
nephew smiled as he noticed the long absent
bloom stealing lightly over her fine features.
There is no term more doubtful than that
word misfortune, said the surgeon, regardless of
the nice manuvres of the host: some deem
one thing a misfortune, others its opposite:
misfortune
begets misfortune: life is a misfortune;
for it may be the means of enduring misfortune;
and death is a misfortune, as it abridges the
enjoyments
of life.
It is a misfortune that our mess has no such
wine as this, interrupted the trooper abruptly,
and laying in a stock to supply the deficiency.
We will pledge you a sentiment in it, sir, as
it seems to suit your taste, said Mr. Wharton, still
uncertain what would be the termination of all
these misfortunes.
Filling to the brim, Lawton said, looking hard
at the English colonela clear field and no
favor
.
I drink your toast, Captain Lawton, said
the surgeon gravely; inasmuch as courtesy
requires
no less at my hands; but I wish never to
see your troop nearer to an enemy than long
pistol-shot
.
Let me tell you, Mr. Archibald Sitgreaves,
said the dragoon hastily, that's a damned
unneighbourly
wish.
The ladies bridled, and Miss Peyton made a
motion to withdraw, which was instantly obeyed
by her fair bevy of juniors.
The suddenness of the movement somewhat
appalled the trooper, and he stammered out an
apology to Frances, who stood next him, which
the laughing maid received very good-naturedly
out of regard to the coat he wore, although she
knew it would afford matter of triumph to her
sister
for a month to come.
'Tis unneighbourly to wish a man at such a
distance from his friends, said the captain
good-humouredly
,
in a manner that spoke his
willingness
to atone; it was, however, too late, and the
ladies retired with much dignity amidst the bows
and compliments of all but the chop-fallen
dragoon
.
The discomfiture produced an utter
stagnation
in the thoughts of the trooper; and Mr.
Wharton, making a profusion of apologies to his
guests, arose and left the room, followed by his
son, and together both quitted the house. The
retreat of the ladies was the signal for the
appearance
of the surgeon's segar box, which, having
comfortably established it in a corner of his mouth
in a certain knowing way, caused not the slighest
interruption to the following discourse
If any thing can sweeten captivity and wounds,
it must be the happiness of suffering in the society
of the ladies who have left us, said the colonel
gallantly, feeling something of the kind due to the
hospitality he experienced, and, perhaps, also,
moved by a softer sentiment.
The doctor cast a glance of silent observation
on the black scarf around the neck of the
Englishman
,
and knocking the ashes from his segar with
his little finger, in the manner of an adept,
replied
Sympathy and kindness have, doubtless, their
genial influence on the human system. The
connexion
is intimate between the moral and
physical
feelings; but still, to accomplish a cure, and
restore nature to the healthy tone it has lost from
disease or accident, requires more than can flow
from unguided sympathies. In such cases, the
18*
lightsthe surgeon accidentally caught the eye
of the trooper, which was fast regaining its
complacency
taking
two or three hasty puffs in huge
disdain, he essayed to finish the sentenceyes,
in such cases, the knowledge that flows from the
the lights.
You were saying, sir, said Colonel
Wellmere
,
sipping his wine.
Yes, sir, said the operator, turning his back
abruptly on Lawton; I was saying that a bread
poultice would not set a broken arm.
More is the pity, cried the trooper,
venturing
again to trust the sound of his own voice.
Now, Colonel Wellmere, to you, as a man of
education, said the surgeon with great
earnestness
,
I can with safety appeal. The Colonel
bowed complacently. You must have noticed
the dreadful havoc made in your ranks by the
men who were led by this gentleman; the
colonel
looked grave again; how when blows
lighted
on their frames, life was invariably extinguished
beyond all hope of scientific reparationhow
certain
yawning wounds were inflicted, that must prove
fatal to the art of the most experienced
practitioner
;
now, sir, to you I triumphantly appeal, to
know whether your detachment would not have
been as effectually defeated, if the men had all
lost a right arm for instance, as if they had all lost
their heads.
The triumph of your appeal is somewhat
hasty, sir, said Wellmere, nettled at the
unfortunate
conjunction of terms in the doctor's
question
.
Is the cause of liberty advanced a step by
such injudicious harshness in the field?
continued
the surgeon, disregarding the other's
equivocation
,
and bent on the favorite principle of his
life.
I am yet to learn that the cause of liberty is
in any manner advanced by the services of any
gentleman in the rebel army, said the colonel
promptly.
Not liberty, said the appalled operator in
astonishment; Good God, for what then are we
contending?
Slavery, sir; yes, even slavery, cried the
Englishman with confidence in his infallibility
you are putting the tyranny of a mob on the
throne of a kind and lenient princewhere is the
consistency of your boasted liberty?
Consistency, repeated the surgeon, looking
around him a little wildly at hearing such
sweeping
charges against a cause he had so long thought
to be holy.
Ay, sir, your consistency. Your congress of
sages have published a manifesto, wherein they
set forth the equality of political rights.
'Tis true, sir, and it is done most ably.
I say nothing of its ability; but if true, why
not set your slaves at liberty? cried Wellmere,
in a tone that plainly showed he had transferred
the triumph to his own standard.
Every American feels humbled at the necessity
of vindicating his country from the inconsistency
and injustice of this practice; his emotions are
much like those of a man who is compelled to
exonerate
himself from a disgraceful charge,
although
he may know the accusation to be false.
At the bottom, Sitgreaves had much good sense,
and thus called on, he took up the cudgels of
argument
in downright earnest.
We deem it a liberty to have a voice in the
councils by which we are governed. We think it
a hardship to be ruled by a people who live at a
distance of three thousand miles from us, and who
cannot, and who do not, feel a single political
interest
in common with ourselves. I say nothing
of oppression; the child was of age, and was
entitled
to the privileges of majority. In such cases,
there is but one tribunal to which to appeal for a
nation's rightsit is power, and we now make the
appeal.
Such doctrines may suit your present
purposes
,
said Wellmere with a sneer of contempt;
but I apprehend it is opposed to all the opinions
and practices of civilized nations.
It is in conformity with the practices of all
nations, said the surgeon, returning the nod, and
drinking to Lawton, who enjoyed the good sense
of his comrade as much as he disliked what he
called medical talk. Who would be ruled
when he can rulethe only rational ground to
take is, that every community has a right to govern
itself, so that in no manner it violates the laws of
God.
And is holding your fellow creatures in
bondage
,
in conformity to those laws? asked the
colonel
impressively.
The surgeon took another glass, and hemming
once, returned to the combat.
Sir, said he, slavery is of very ancient
origin
,
and seems to have been confined to no
particular
religion or form of government; every
nation of civilized Europe does, or has held their
fellow creatures in this kind of duresse.
You will except Great Britain, sir, cried the
colonel proudly.
No, sir, continued the surgeon confidently,
feeling that he was carrying the war out of his
own country; I cannot except Great Britain.
It was her children, her ships, and her laws, that
first introduced the practice into these states; and
on her institutions the judgment must fall. It is
true, we continue the practice; but we must come
gradually to the remedy, or create an evil greater
than that which we endure at present: doubtless,
as we advance, the manumission of our slaves will
accompany us, until happily these fair regions will
exist, without a single image of the creator that is
held in a state, which disqualifies him to judge of
that creator's goodness.
It will be remembered that Doctor Sitgreaves
spoke forty years ago, and Wellmere was unable
to contradict his prophetic assertion.
Finding the subject exceeding his
comprehension
,
the Englishman retired to the apartment where
the ladies had assembled, and seated by the side
of Sarah and her aunt, found a more pleasing
employment
in relating the events of fashionable life
in the metropolis, and recalling the thousand little
anecdotes of their former association. Miss
Peyton
was a pleased listener, as she dispensed the
bounties of the tea-table with precise grace, and
Sarah frequently bowed her blushing countenance
to the needle work in her lap, as her face glowed
at the flattering remarks of her companion.
The dialogue we have related established a
perfect truce again between the surgeon and his
comrade, and the former having paid a visit to
Singleton, they took their leave of the ladies, and
mounted; the former to visit the wounded at the
encampment, and the latter to rejoin his troop.
But their movement was arrested at the gate by
an appearance, which we will relate in the
succeeding
chapter.
CHAPTER XIV.
I see no more those white locks thinly spread,
Round the bald polish of that honoured head:
No more that meek, that suppliant look in prayer,
Nor that pure faith that gave it forceare there:
But he is blest, and I lament no more,
A wise good man contented to be poor.
Crabbe
.
We
have already said, that the customs of
America leave the remains of the dead but a short
time in the sight of the mourners; and the
necessity
of providing for his own safety compelled the
pedlar to abridge even this brief space. In the
confusion and agitation produced by the events
we have recorded, the death of the elder Birch
had occurred unnoticed; but a sufficient number
of the immediate neighbours were hastily
collected
,
and the ordinary rites of sepulture were
paid to the deceased; it was the approach of this
humble procession that arrested the movements of
the trooper and his comrade. Four of the men
supported the body on a rude bier; and four
others walked in advance, ready to relieve their
friends occasionally from their burden. The
pedlar
walked next the coffin, and by his side moved
Katy Haynes with a most determined aspect of
woe, and next to the mourners came Mr.
Wharton
and the English captain. Two or three old
men and women, with a few straggling boys,
brought up the rear. Captain Lawton sat in his
saddle in rigid silence until the bearers came
opposite
to his position, and then, for the first time.
Harvey raised his eyes from the ground, and saw
the enemy that he dreaded so near him. The
first impulse of the pedlar was certainly flight;
but recovering his recollection, he fixed his eye
on the coffin of his parent, and passed the dragoon
with a firm step, but swelling heart. The trooper
slowly lifted his cap from his head, and continued
uncovered until Mr. Wharton and his son had
moved by him, when, accompanied by the
surgeon
,
he rode leisurely in the rear, maintaining
an inflexible silence. Csar emerged from the
cellar kitchen of the cottage, and with a face of
settled solemnity, added himself to the number of
the followers of the funeral, though with a humble
mien, and at a most respectful distance from the
horseman; the first feeling was owing to the
colour
of his skin; and the latter circumstance, to
certain emotions of dread that prevailed in the
bosom of the black, whenever Captain Lawton
prevented his organs of vision, from resting on
more agreeable objects. Csar had placed
around his arm, a little above the elbow, a
napkin
of unsullied whiteness, it being the only time
since his departure from the city, that the black
had an opportunity of exhibiting himself in the
garniture of servile mourning. He was a great
lover of propriety, and had been a little
stimulated
to this display by a desire to show his sable
friend from Georgia all the decencies of a
New-York
funeral; and the ebullition of his zeal went
off very well, producing no other result, than a
mild lecture from Miss Peyton at his return, on the
fitness of things. The attendance of the black
was thought well enough in itself; but the napkin
was deemed a superfluous exhibition of ceremony,
at the funeral of a man, who had performed all
the menial offices in his own person. The
graveyard
was an enclosure on the grounds of Mr.
Wharton, which had been fenced with stone, and
set apart for the purpose by that gentleman some
years before. It was not, however, intended as a
burial place for any of his own family. Until the
fire, which raged as the British troops took
possession
of New-York, had laid Trinity in ashes, a
goodly gilded tablet graced its walls, that spoke
the virtues of his deceased parents, and beneath a
flag of marble in one of the aisles of the church,
their bones were left to moulder with becoming
dignity. Captain Lawton made a movement, as
if he was disposed to follow the procession when it
left the highway, to enter the field which
contained
the graves of the humble dead, but he was
recalled to his recollection by a hint from his
companion, that he was taking the wrong road.
Of all the various methods which have been
adopted by man for the disposal of his earthly
remains
,
which do you prefer, Captain Lawton?
said the surgeon with great deliberation, as they
separated from their line of march: now in
some countries the body is exposed to be devoured
by wild beasts; in others, it is suspended in the
air to exhale its substance in the manner of
decomposition
;
in some countries it is consumed on
the funeral pile, and then, again, it is inhumed in
the bowels of the earth; every people have their
own particular fashion, and to which do you give
the preference?
All are very agreeable, said the trooper,
disregarding
the harangue of the other, and following
the group they had left with his eyes; which do
you most admire?
The last as practised by ourselves, said the
operator promptly; for the other three are
destructive
to the opportunities for dissection; but
in the last, the coffin can lie in peaceful decency,
while the remains are made to subserve the
useful
purposes of science. Ah! Captain Lawton,
I enjoy comparatively but few opportunities of
such a nature, to what I expected to meet on
entering
the army.
To what may these pleasures amount in a
year, numerically? said the captain drily, and
withdrawing his gaze from the grave-yard.
Within a dozen, upon my honour, said the
surgeon piteously; my best picking is when the
corps is detached; for when we are with the
main army, there are so many boys to be satisfied,
that I seldom get a good subject. Those
youngsters
are dreadfully wasteful, and as greedy as
vultures
.
A dozen! echoed the trooper in surprise,
why I furnish you more than that number with
my own hands.
Ah! Jack, returned the doctor, approaching
the subject with great tenderness of manner, it
is seldom I can do any thing with your patients,
you disfigure them wofully; believe me, John,
when I tell you as a friendmerely as a friend,
that your system is all wrong; for you
unnecessarily
destroy life, and then you injure the body so
that it is unfit for the only use that can be made
of a dead man.
The trooper maintained a silence which he
thought would be the most probable means of
preserving peace between them; and the surgeon,
turning his head from taking a last look at the
burial, as they rode round the foot of the hill that
shut the valley from their sight, continued with a
kind of suppressed sigh
A body might get a natural death from that
grave-yard to night, if there was but time and
opportunity
;
19
the patient must be the father of the
lady we saw this morning.
The bitch-doctor; she with the sky-blue
complexion
,
said the trooper, with a shrewd smile,
that began to cause uneasiness to his companion;
but the lady was not the gentleman's daughter,
only his medico-petticoat attendant; and the
Harvey
,
whose name was made to rhyme with every
word in her song, is the renowned pedlar-spy.
What! cried the astonished surgeon; he
who unhorsed you.
No man ever unhorsed me, Doctor Sitgreaves,
said the dragoon with abundant gravity; I fell
by a mischance of Roanoke; we kissed the earth
together.
A warm embrace from the love spots it left
on your cuticle, returned the surgeon with some
of the other's archness; but 'tis a thousand
pities that you cannot find where the tattling
rascal
lies hid.
He followed his father's body, said the
trooper composedly.
What! and you let him pass, cried the
surgeon
with extraordinary animation, checking his
horse instantly; let us return immediately and
take him, to-morrow you have him hung, Jack,
and damn him, I'll dissect him.
Softly, softly, my dear Archibald, said the
trooper soothingly; would you arrest a man
while paying the last offices to a dead father;
leave him to me, and I pledge myself he shall have
justice.
The doctor muttered his dissatisfation at any
postponement of his vengeance, but was
compelled
to acquiesce from a regard to his reputation
for propriety, and they continued their ride to
the quarters of the corps, engaged in various
discussions
concerning the welfare of the human
body.
Birch supported the grave and collected
manner, that was thought becoming in a male
mourner on such occasions, and to Katy was left
the part of exhibiting the tenderness of the softer
sex. There are some people, whose feelings are
of such a nature, that they cannot weep unless
it be in proper company, and the spinster was
a good deal addicted to all congregational
virtues
;
after turning her head round the small
assemblage
,
the housekeeper found the eyes of the
few females who were present fixed on her in
solemn
expectation, and the effect was
instantaneous
;
the maiden really wept, and gained no
inconsiderable
sympathy and reputation for a
tender
heart from the spectators. The muscles of
the pedlar's face were seen to move, and as the
first clod of earth fell on the tenement of his
father
,
sending up that dull, hollow, sound, that
speaks so eloquently the mortality of man, his
whole frame was for an instant convulsed; he
bent his body down as if in pain, his fingers worked
as his hands hung lifeless by his side, and there
was an expression in his countenance that seemed
to announce a writhing of the soul; but it was not
unresisted, and it was transient: he stood erect,
drew a long breath, and looked around him with
an elevated face, that even seemed to smile with
a consciousness of having obtained the mastery.
The grave was soon filled; a rough stone, placed
at either extremity, marked its position, and the
turf, with a faded vegetation that was adapted to
the fortunes of the deceased, covered the little
hillock with the last office of seemliness. The
task ended, the neighbours, who had each
officiously
tendered his services in performing this duty,
paused, and lifting their hats, stood looking
toward the mourner, who now felt himself to
be really alone in the world: removing his hat
also, the pedlar hesitated a moment to gather
energy, and spoke
My friends and neighbours, I thank you for
assisting me to bury my dead out of my sight.
A solemn pause succeeded the brief and
customary
conclusion, and the group dispersed in
silence
,
some few walking with the mourners back
to their own habitation, but respectfully leaving
them at its entrance. The pedlar and Katy were
followed into the building by one man, however,
who was well known to the surrounding country
by the significant term of speculator. Katy saw
him enter with a heart that palpitated with
dreadful
forebodings, but Harvey civilly handed him a
chair, and evidently was prepared for the visit.
The pedlar went to the door, and taking a
cautious
glance round the valley, quickly returned
and commenced the following dialogue
The sun has just left the top of the eastern
hill; my time presses me; here is the deed for the
house and lot, every thing done according to law.
The stranger took the paper, and conned its
contents with a deliberation that proceeded partly
from his caution, and partly from the unlucky
circumstance
of his education having been sadly
neglected
when a youth. The time occupied in
this tedious examination was employed by Harvey
in gathering together certain articles, which he
intended to include in the stores that were to
leave the habitation with himself. Katy had
already
inquired of the pedlar, whether the deceased
had left a will, and saw the Bible placed in the
bottom of a new pack, which she had made for
his accommodation, with a most stoical
indifference
;
but as the six silver spoons were laid
carefully
by its side, a sudden twinge of her conscience
objected to such a palpable waste of property,
and she broke silence by saying somewhat
abruptly
When you marry, Harvey, you may miss
them spoons.
I never shall marry, said the pedlar
laconically
.
Well if you don't, there's no occasion to be
short. I'm sure no one asked you. I should like
to know, though, of what use so many spoons can
be to a single man: for my part, I think it's a duty
for every man who is so well provided, to have a
wife and family to maintain.
At the time when Katy expressed this
sentiment
,
the fortune of women in her class of life
consisted of a cow, a bed, the labours of their own
hands in the shape of divers pillow cases, blankets,
and sheets, with, where fortune was unusually
kind, a half dozen of silver spoons. The spinster
herself had obtained all the other necessaries to
completing her store, by her own industry and
prudence, and it can easily be imagined saw the
articles, she had long counted her own, vanish in
the enormous pack with a very natural
dissatisfaction
,
that was in no degree diminished by the
declaration that had preceded the act. Harvey,
however, disregarded her opinions and feelings,
and continued his employment of filling the pack,
which soon grew to a size something like the
ordinary
burden of the pedlar.
I'm rather timoursome about this conveyance,
said the purchaser, having at length concluded his
task.
Why so? said Harvey quickly.
I'm afeard it won't stand good in law; I know
that two of the neighbours leave home to-morrow
morning, to have the place entered for
confistication
,
and if I should go now and give forty pounds
19*
and lose it all, 'twould be a dead pull back to
me.
They can only take my right, said the
pedlar
,
coolly; pay me two hundred dollars, and the
house is your's; you are a well known whig, and
you at least they won't trouble; as Harvey spoke,
there was a strange mixture of bitterness with the
care he expressed concerning the sale of his
property
.
Say one hundred, and it is a bargain,
returned
the man, with something that he meant for
a good-natured smile.
A bargain! echoed the pedlar in surprise,
I thought the bargain already made.
Nothing is a bargain, said the purchaser with
a gratulating chuckle, until papers are delivered,
and the money paid in hand.
You have the paper, returned the pedlar
quickly.
Aye, and will keep it, if you will excuse the
money, replied the speculator with a sneer;
come, say one hundred and fifty, and I won't be
hard; herehere is just the money.
The pedlar looked from the window, and saw
with dismay that the evening was fast advancing,
and knew well that he endangered his life by
remaining
in the dwelling after dark; yet he could
not tolerate the idea of being defrauded in this
manner, in a bargain that had already been fairly
made; he hesitated
Well, said the purchaser, rising; mayhap
you can find another man to trade with between
this and morning; but if you don't, your title won't
be worth much afterward.
Take it, Harvey, said Katy, who felt it
impossible
to resist a tender like the one before her,
all in English guineas: her voice roused the
pedlar
,
and a new idea seemed to strike him.
I agree to the price, he said, and turning to
the spinster, placed part of the money in her
hand, as he continuedhad I other means to
pay you, I would have lost all, rather than have
suffered myself to have been defrauded of part.
You may lose all yet, muttered the stranger
with a sneer, as he rose and left the building.
Yes, said Katy, following him with her eyes;
he knows your failing, Harvey; he thinks with
me, now the old gentleman is gone, you will want
a careful body to take care of your concerns.
The pedlar was busied in arranging things for
his departure, and took no notice of this
insinuation
,
while the spinster returned again to the
attack
.
She had lived so many years in expectation
of a different result from that which now seemed
likely to occur, that the idea of separation began
to give her more uneasiness, than she had thought
herself capable of feeling, about a man so
destitute
and friendless as the pedlar.
Have you another house to go to? inquired
Katy, with unusual pathos in her manner.
Providence will provide me with a home,
said Harvey, with a perceptible tremor in his
voice.
Yes, said the housekeeper quickly; but
maybe 'twill not be to your liking.
The poor must not be difficult, returned the
pedlar gravely.
I'm sure I'm every thing but a difficult body,
cried the spinster very hastily; but I love to
see things becoming, and in their places; yet I
wouldn't be hard to persuade to leave this place
myself. I can't say I altogether like the ways of
the people.
The valley is lovely, said the pedlar with
fervor, and the people like all the race of man;
but to me it matters nothing; all places are now
alike, and all faces equally strange, as he spoke,
he dropt the article he was packing from his hand,
and seated himself on a chest with a look of
vacant
misery.
Not so, not so, said Katy, instinctively
shoving
her chair nearer to the place where the pedlar
sat; not so, Harvey, you must know me at least;
my face cannot be strange to you certainly.
Birch turned his eyes slowly on her
countenance
,
which exhibited more of feeling, and less
of self, than he had ever seen there before; he
took her hand kindly, and his own features lost
some of their painful expression as he said
Yes, good woman, you, at least, are not a
stranger to me; you may do me partial justice;
when others revile me, possibly your feelings may
lead you to say something in my defence.
That I willthat I would! said Katy eagerly,
I will defend you, Harvey, to the last droplet
me hear them that dare revile you! you say true,
Harvey, I am partial and just to youwhat if you
do like the king, I have often heard say he was at
the bottom a good man; but there's no religion in
the old country; for every body allows the
ministers
are desperate bad.
The pedlar paced the floor in evident distress
of mind; his eye had a look of wildness that Katy
had never witnessed before, and his step was
measured with a dignity that appalled the maiden.
While he lived, cried Harvey, unable to
smother his feelings, there was one who read my
heart, and oh! what a consolation to return from
my secret marches of danger, and the insult and
wrongs that I suffered, to receive his blessing and
his praise; but he is gone, he continued
stopping
and gazing wildly towards the corner that
used to hold the figure of his parent, and who is
there to do me justice?
Why Harvey, Harvey, Katy ventured to say
imploringly, when the pedlar added, as a smile
stole over his haggard features
Yes, there is one who willwho must know
me before I die. Oh! it is dreadful to die and
leave such a name behind me.
Don't talk of dying, Harvey, said the
spinster
,
glancing her eye around the room, and
pushing
the wood in the fire to obtain a light from the
blaze.
But the ebullition of feeling in the pedlar was
over; it had been excited by the events of the
past day, and a vivid perception of his sufferings;
it was not long that passion maintained an
ascendancy
over the reason of the trader, and
perceiving
that the night had already thrown an
obscurity
around the objects without doors, he
hastily
threw his pack over his shoulders, and taking
Katy kindly by the hand, made his parting speech
It is painful to part with even you, good
woman
,
but the hour has come, and I must go: what
is left in the house is freely yours; to me it could
be of no use, and it may serve to make you more
comfortablefarewellwe meet hereafter.
Yes, in the regions of darkness, cried a voice
that caused the pedlar to sink on the chest he had
risen from, in despair.
What! another pack, Mr. Birch, and so well
stuffed so soon.
Have you not yet done evil enough? cried
the pedlar, regaining his firmness, and springing
on his feet with energy; is it not enough to
harrass
the last moments of a dying manto
impoverish
mewhat more would you have?
Your blood, said the skinner with cool
malignity
.
And for money, cried Harvey bitterly; like
the ancient Judas, you would grow rich with the
price of blood.
Ay! and a fair price it is my gentleman: fifty
guineasnearly the weight of that scare-crow
carcass of your's in gold.
Here, said Katy promptly, here are fifteen
guineas, and these drawers, and this bed are all
mineif you will give Harvey but one hour's start
from the door, they shall be your's.
One hour, said the skinner, showing his teeth,
and looking with a longing eye at the money.
Yes, but one hourhere, take the money.
Hold! cried Harvey, put no faith in the
miscreants.
She may do what she pleases with her faith,
said the skinner with malignant pleasure; but I
have the money in good keeping; as for you, Mr.
Birch, we will bear your insolence, for the fifty
guineas that are to pay for your gallows.
Go on, said the pedlar proudly; take me to
Major Dunwoodie; he, at least, may be kind,
although
he may be just.
I can do better than by marching so far in
such disgraceful company, replied the other very
coolly; this Mr. Dunwoodie has let one or two
tories go at large; but the troop of Captain
Lawton
is quartered some half mile nearer, and his
receipt will get me the reward as soon as his
major's
:
how relish you the idea of supping with
Captain Lawton this evening, Mr. Birch?
Give me my money, or set Harvey free,
cried the spinster in alarm.
Your bribe was not enough, good woman,
unless there is money in this bed, thrusting his
bayonet through the ticking, and ripping it for
some distance, he took a malicious satisfaction in
scattering its contents around the room.
If, cried the housekeeper, losing sight of her
personal danger in care for her newly acquired
property, there is law in the land, I will be
righted.
The law of the neutral ground is the law of
the strongest, said the skinner with a malignant
laugh; but your tongue is not as long as my
bayonet; you had, therefore, best not set them at
loggerheads, or you might be the loser.
A figure stood in the shadow of the door as if
afraid to be seen in the group of skinners, but a
blaze of light raised by some articles thrown in
the fire by his persecutors, showed the pedlar the
face of the purchaser of his little domain:
occasionally
there was some whispering between this
man and the skinner nearest him, that induced
Harvey to suspect he had been the dupe of a
contrivance
,
in which that wretch had participated:
it was, however, too late to repme, and he
followed
the party from the house with a firm and
collected tread, as if marching to a triumph and
not to a gallows. In passing through the yard the
leader of the band fell over a billet of wood, and
received a momentary hurt from the fall;
exasperated
at the accident, the fellow sprung on his
feet, and exclaimed
The curse of heaven light on the log; the
night is too dark for us to move in; throw that
brand of fire in you pile of tow, to lighten up the
scene.
Hold! roared the horror-struck speculator,
you'll fire the house.
And see the farther, said the other, hurling
the fire in the midst of the combustibles; in an
instant
the building was in flames; come on, let
us move towards the heights while we have light
to pick our road.
Villain! cried the exasperated purchaser,
is this your friendship, this my reward for
kidnapping
the pedlar?
'Twould be wise to move more from the
light, if you mean to entertain us with abuse, or we
may see too well to let a bullet miss you, cried
the leader of the gang; the next instant he was
as good as his threat, but happily missed the
terrified
speculator, and equally appalled spinster,
who saw herself again reduced from comparative
wealth to poverty, by the blow. Prudence dictated
to the pair a speedy retreat, and the next morning,
the only remains of the dwelling of the pedlar was
the huge chimney we have already mentioned.
CHAPTER XV.
Trifles, light as air,
Are to the jealous, confirmations strong
As proofs from holy writ.
Moor of Venice
.
The
weather, which had been mild and clear
since the storm, now changed with the
suddenness
of the American climate. Towards evening
the cold blasts poured down from the mountains,
and flurries of snow plainly indicated that the
month of November had arriveda season whose
temperature varies from the heats of summer to
the cold of winter. Frances had stood at the
window of her own apartment, watching the slow
progress of the funeral procession, with a
melancholy
that was too deep to be excited by the
spectacle
.
There was something in the sad office
which engaged the attention of her father and
brother, that was in unison with the feelings of
the maid. As she gazed around, she saw the
trees bending to the force of the whirlwinds, that
swept through the valley with an impetuosity that
shook even the buildings of lesser importance;
and the forest, that had so lately glittered in the
sun with its variegated hues, was fast losing its
loveliness, as the leaves were torn from the
branches, and were driving irregularly before the
eddies of the blast. A few of the southern
dragoons
,
who were patroling the passes which led to
the encampment of the corps, could be
distinguished
at a distance on the heights, bending to
their pommels, as they faced the keen air which had
so lately traversed the great fresh water lakes.
20
and drawing their watch coats around them in
tighter folds.
The maid witnessed the disappearance of the
wooden tenement of the deceased, as it was
slowly
lowered from the light of day, and the sight
still added to the chilling dreariness of the view.
Captain Singleton was sleeping under the careful
watchfulness of his own man, while his sister had
been persuaded to take possession of her room,
for the purpose of obtaining the repose, of which
her last night's journeying had robbed her. The
apartment of Miss Singleton communicated with
the room occupied by the sisters, through a
private
door, as well as through the ordinary passage
of the house; this door was partly open, and
Frances moved towards it with the benevolent
intention of ascertaining the situation of her
guest, when the surprised girl saw her, whom
she had thought to be sleeping, not only awake,
but employed in a manner that banished all
probability
of present repose. The black tresses,
that during the dinner had been drawn in close
folds over the crown of the head, were now
loosened
,
and fell in profusion over her shoulders and
bosom, imparting a slight degree of wildness to
her expressive countenance. The chilling white
of her complexion was strongly contrasted with
the brilliant glances of eyes of the deepest black,
that were fixed in rooted attention on a picture
she held in her hand. Frances hardly breathed,
as she was enabled, by a movement of Isabella, to
see that it was the figure of a man in the well
known dress of the southern horse; but she
gasped
for breath, and instinctively laid her hand
on her heart to quell its throbbings, as she
thought she recognised the lineaments that were
so deeply seated in her own imagination.
Frances
felt she was improperly prying into the
sacred privacy of another, but her emotious were
too powerful to permit her to speak, and she
drew back to a chair, whence she still retained
a view of the stranger, from whose countenance
she felt it to be impossible to withdraw her eyes.
Isabella was too much engrossed by her own
feelings
to discover the trembling figure of the maid
who witnessed her actions, and she pressed the
inanimate image to her lips, with an enthusiasm
that denoted the most intense passion. The
expression
of the countenance of the fair stranger
was so changeable, and the transitions were so
rapid, that Frances had scarcely time to
distinguish
the character of the emotion, before it was
succeeded by another equally powerful, and
equally attractive. Admiration and sorrow were,
however, the preponderating passions; the latter
was indicated by large drops that fell from her
eyes on the picture, and which followed each
other over her cheek at such intervals, as seemed
to pronounce the grief too heavy to admit of
the ordinary bursts of sorrow. Every
movement
of Isabella was marked by an enthusiasm
that was peculiar to her nature, and every
passion
in its turn triumphed in her breast with an
undisputed sway. The fury of the wind, as it
whistled around the angles of the building, was
in consonance with those feelings, and she rose
and moved to a window of her apartment. Her
figure was now hid from the view of Frances, who
was about to rise and approach her guest, when
tones of a thrilling melody chained her in
breathless
silence to the spot. The notes were wild,
and the voice not powerful, but the execution
exceeded
any thing the maid had ever heard, and
she stood, endeavouring to stifle the sounds of her
own gentle breathing, until the song following
was concluded:
Cold blow the blasts o'er the tops of the mountain,
And bare is the oak on the hill,
Slowly the vapours exhale from the fountain,
And bright gleams the ice-bordered rill;
All nature is seeking its annual rest,
But the slumbers of peace have deserted my breast.
Long has the storm pour'd its weight on my nation,
And long have her brave stood the shock;
Long has our chieftain ennobled his station,
A bulwark on liberty's rock
Unlicens'd ambition relaxes its toil,
Yet blighted affection represses my smile.
Abroad the wild fury of winter is low'ring,
And leafless, and drear is the tree,
But the vertical sun of the south appears pouring
Its fierce, killing heats upon me
Without all the season's chill symptoms begin,
But the fire of passion is raging within.
Frances abandoned her whole soul to the
suppressed
melody of the music, though the
language
of the song expressed a meaning, which
united with certain events of that and the
preceding
day, left a sensation of uneasiness in the
bosom of the warm-hearted girl, to which she had
hitherto been a stranger. Isabella moved from
the window as her last tones melted on the ear
of her admiring listener, and, for the first time,
her eye rested on the face of the pallid maiden.
A glow of fire lighted the countenances of both at
the same instant, and the blue eye of Frances met
the brilliant black one of her guest for a single
moment, and both fell in abashed confusion on
the carpet; they advanced, however, until they
met, and had taken each other's hand, before either
ventured again to look her companion in the
face.
This sudden change in the weather, and
perhaps
the situation of my brother, have united to
make me melancholy, Miss Wharton, said
Isabella
in a low tone, and in a voice that trembled
as she spoke.
Tis thought you have little to apprehend
for your brother, said Frances, in the same
embarrassed
manner; had you seen him when he
was brought in by Major Dunwoodie
Frances paused with a feeling of conscious
shame, for which she could not account herself,
and in raising her eyes, she saw Isabella studying
her countenance, with an earnestness that again
drove the blood tumultuously to her temples.
You were speaking of Major Dunwoodie,
said Isabella faintly.
He was with Captain Singleton.
Do you know Dunwoodiehave you seen
him often? continued Isabella, in a voice that
startled her companion. Once more Frances
ventured
to look her guest in the face, and again she
met the piercing eyes bent on her as if to search
her inmost heart. Speak, Miss Wharton, is
Major Dunwoodie known to you?
He is my relative, said Frances, appalled at
the manner of the other.
A relative! echoed Miss Singleton; in
what degreespeak, Miss Wharton, I conjure you
to speak.
Our parents were cousins, replied Frances,
in still greater confusion at the vehemence of
Isabella
.
And he is to be your husband, cried the
stranger impetuously.
Frances felt her pride awakened by this direct
attack upon the delicacy of her feelings, and
she raised her eyes from the floor to her
interrogator
a little proudly, when the pale cheek and
quivering lip of Isabella removed her resentment
in a moment.
It is truemy conjecture is truespeak to
20*
me, Miss WhartonI conjure you, in mercy to
my feelings, to tell medo you love
Dunwoodie
?
There was a plaintive earnestness in the
voice of Miss Singleton, that disarmed Frances of
all resentment, and the only answer she could
make was hiding her burning face between her
hands, as she sunk back in a chair to conceal her
confusion.
Isabella paced the floor in silence for several
minutes, until she had succeeded in conquering
the violence of her feelings, when she approached
the place where Frances yet sat, endeavouring to
exclude the eyes of her companion from reading
the shame expressed in her countenance, and
taking the hand of the maid, she spoke with an
evident effort at composure.
Pardon me, Miss Wharton, if my
ungovernable
feelings have led me into improprietythe
powerful motivethe cruel reasonshe
hesitated
;
Frances now raised her face, and the eyes of
the maids once more metthey fell in each other's
arms, and laid their burning cheeks togetherthe
embrace was longwas ardent and sincerebut
neither spokeand on separating, Frances retired
to her own room without farther explanation.
While this extraordinary scene was acting in
the room of Miss Singleton, matters of great
importance
were agitated in the drawing-room. The
disposition of the fragments of such a dinner as
the one we have recorded, was a task that
required
no little exertion and calculation.
Notwithstanding
several of the small game had nestled
in the pocket of Capt. Lawton's man, and even the
assistant of Dr. Sitgreaves had calculated the
uncertainty
of his remaining long in such good
quarters
,
still there was more left unconsumed than the
prudent spinster knew how to dispose of to
advantage
.
Csar and his mistress had, therefore, a long
and confidential communication on this important
business, and the consequence was that Colonel
Wellmere was left to the hospitality of Sarah
Wharton. All the ordinary topics of conversation
were exhausted, when the colonel, with a little of
the uneasiness that is in some degree inseparable
from conscious error, touched lightly on the
transactions of the preceding day.
We little thought, Miss Wharton, when I first
saw this Mr. Dunwoodie in your house in
Queenstreet
,
that he was to be the renowned warrior he
has proved himself, said Wellmere, endeavouring
to smile contemptuously.
Renowned, when we consider the enemy he
overcame, said Sarah with consideration for her
companion's feelings. 'I' was most unfortunate
indeed in every respect that you met with the
accident
,
or doubtless the arms of our Prince would
have triumphed in their usual manner.
And yet the pleasure of such society as this
accident has introduced me to, would more than
repay the pain of a mortified spirit and wounded
body, added the colonel in a manner of peculiar
softness.
I hope the latter is but trifling, said Sarah,
stooping to hide her blushes under the pretext of
biting a thread from the work on her knee.
Trifling, indeed, to the former, returned the
colonel in the same manner. Ah! Miss
Wharton
,
it is in such moments we feel the full value of
friendship and sympathy.
Those who have never tried it, cannot easily
imagine, what a rapid progress a warm hearted
female
can make in love, in the short space of half
an hour, particularly where there is a
predisposition
to the distemper. Sarah found the
conversation
,
when it began to touch on friendship and
sympathy, too interesting to venture her voice
with a reply. She however turned her eyes on
the colonel, and saw him gazing at her fine face
with an admiration that was quite as manifest,
and much more soothing, than any words could
make it.
Their tete-a-tete was uninterrupted for an hour,
and although nothing that would be called decided
by an experienced matron was said by the
gentleman
,
he uttered a thousand things that delighted
his companion for the moment, who retired to her
rest with a lighter heart than she had felt since the
arrest of her brother by the Americans.
CHAPTER XVI.
And let me the canakin clink, clink
And let me the canakin clink:
A soldier's a man;
A life's but a span;
Why then, let a soldier drink.
Iago
.
The
position held by the corps of dragoons, we
have already said, was a favorite place of halting
with their commander. A cluster of some half
dozen small and dilapidated buildings formed
what, from the circumstance of two roads
intersecting
each other at right angles, was called the
village of the four corners. As usual, one of the
most imposing of these edifices had been termed,
in the language of the day, a house of
entertainment
for man and beast. On a rough board
suspended
from the gallows looking post that had
supported the ancient sign was, however, written
in red chalk Elizabeth Flanagan, her hotel,
an ebullition of wit from some of the idle wags of
the corps. The matron, whose name had thus
been exalted to an office of such unexpected
dignity
,
ordinarily discharged the duties of a female
sutler, washerwoman, and, to use the language of
Katy Haynes, bitch-doctor to the troops; she was
the widow of a soldier who had been killed in the
service, and who, like herself, was a native of a
distant island, that had early tried his fortune in
the colonies of North America. She constantly
migrated
with the troops, and it was seldom that
they became stationary for two days at a time,
but the little cart of the bustling woman was seen
driving into their encampment, loaded with such
articles, as she conceived would make her
presence
most welcome. With a celerity that
seemed
almost supernatural, Betty took up her ground
and commenced her occupation; sometimes the
cart itself was her shop; at others, the soldiers
made her a rude shelter of such materials as
offered
;
but on the present occasion she had seized
on a vacant building, and by dint of stuffing the
dirty breeches and half dried linen of the troopers
in the broken windows, to exclude the cold which
had now become severe, she formed what she
herself had pronounced to be most iligant
lodgings
.
The men were quartered in the adjacent
barns, and the officers collected in the Hotel
Flanagan, which they facetiously called
headquarters
.
Betty was well known to every trooper
in the corps, could call each by his christian or
nick-name, as best suited her fancy; and, although
absolutely intolerable to all whom habit had not
made familiar with her virtues, was a general
favorite
with these partizan warriors. Her faults
were, a trifling love of liquor, excessive filthiness,
and a total disregard to all the decencies of
language
;
her virtues, an unbounded love for her
adopted country, perfect honesty when dealing on
certain known principles with the soldiery, and
great good nature: added to these, Betty had the
merit of being the inventor of that beverage which
is so well known at the present hour, to all the
patriots who make a winter's march between the
commercial and political capitals of this great
state, and which is distinguished by the name of
cock-tail. Elizabeth Flanagan was peculiarly
well qualified by education and circumstances to
perfect this improvement in liquors, having been
literally brought up on its principal ingredient,
and having acquired from her Virginia customers
the use of mint, from its flavour in a julep, to its
height of renown in the article in question. Such,
then, was the mistress of the mansion, who,
reckless
of the cold northern blasts, showed her
blooming
face from the door of the building to welcome
the arrival of her favorite, Captain Lawton, and
his companion, her master in matters of surgery.
Ah! by my hopes of promotion, my gentle
Elizabeth, but you are welcome, cried the
trooper, as he threw himself from his saddle;
this villanous fresh water gas from the Canadas,
has been whistling among my bones till they ache
with the cold, but the sight of your fiery
countenance
is as cheering as a christmas fire.
Now, sure, Captain Jack, you are always full
of your complimentaries, replied the sutler,
taking
the bridle of her customer; but hurry in for
the life of you, darling; the fences hereabouts are
not so strong as in the Highlands, and there's that
within will warm both sowl and body.
So you have been laying the rails under
contribution
,
I see; well, that may do for the body,
said the captain coolly; but I have had a pull
at a bottle of cut glass with a silver stand, and
don't think I could relish your whiskey for a
month to come.
If it's silver or goold that your thinking of, it's
but little I have, though I've a trifling bit of the
continental, said Betty with a look of much
meaning
,
but there's that within that's fit to be put in
vessels of di'monds.
What can she mean, Archibald? asked
Lawton
quickly: the animal looks as if she meant
more than she says.
'Tis probably a wandering of the reasoning
powers, created by the frequency of intoxicating
draughts, observed the surgeon coolly, as he
deliberately
threw his left leg over the pommel of
his saddle, and slid down on the right side of his
horse.
Faith, my dear jewel of a doctor, but it was
this side I was expecting you; the whole corps
come down on this side but yourself, said Betty,
winking at the trooper; but I've been feeding
the wounded, in your absence, with the fat of the
land.
Barbarous stupidity! cried the panic-stricken
physician, to feed men labouring under the
excitement
of fever with powerful nutriment;
woman
,
woman, you are enough to defeat the skill
of Hippocrates himself.
Pooh! said Betty with infinite composure,
what a botheration you make about a little
whiskey; there was but a gallon betwixt a good
two dozen of them, and I gave it to the boys to
make them sleep easy; sure jist as slumbering
drops.
Lawton and his companion now entered the
building, and the first objects which met their
eyes explained the hidden meaning of Betty's
comfortable
declaration. A long table, made of boards
torn from the side of an out-building, was stretched
through the middle of the largest apartment or
bar-room, and on it was a very scanty display of
crockery ware. The steams of cooking arose from
an adjoining kitchen, but the principal attraction
was in a demi-john of fair proportions, which had
been ostentatiously placed on high by Betty as
the object most worthy of notice. Lawton soon
learnt that it was teeming with the real
amber-coloured
juice of the grape, and had been sent
from the Locusts as an offering to Major
Dunwoodie
,
from his friend Captain Wharton of the
royal army.
And a royal gift it is, said the grinning
subaltern
who made the explanation. The major
gives us an entertainment in honour of our victory,
and you see the principal expense is borne, as it
should be, by the enemy. Zounds, I am thinking
that after we have primed with such stuff, we
could charge through Sir Henry's head quarters
and carry off the knight himself.
The captain of dragoons was in no manner
displeased
at the prospect of terminating so pleasantly
a day that had been so agreeably commenced; he
was soon surrounded by his comrades, who made
many eager inquiries concerning his adventures,
while the surgeon proceeded with certain quakings
of the heart, to examine into the state of his
wounded
.
Enormous fires were crackling in the
chimneys
of the house, superseding the necessity of
candles, by the bright light which was thrown from
the blazing piles. The group within were all
young men, and tried soldiers; in number they
were rather more than a dozen, and their
manners
and conversation, were a strange mixture of
the bluntness of the partizan with the polish of
gentlemen. Their dresses were neat, though plain;
and a never failing topic amongst them was the
performance and quality of their horsessome
were endeavouring to sleep on the benches which
lined the walls, some were walking the
apartments
,
and others were seated in earnest
discussion
on subjects connected with the business of
their lives. Occasionally, as the door of the
kitchen
opened, the hissing sounds of the frying pans,
and the inviting savour of the food, created a
stagnation
in all other employments; even the
sleepers
,
at such moments, would open their eyes and
raise their heads to reconnoitre the state of the
preparations. All this time Dunwoodie sat by
himself gazing at the fire, and lost in reflections
that none of his officers presumed to disturb; he
had made earnest inquiries of Sitgreaves on his
21
entrance after the condition of Singleton, during
which a profound and respectful silence was
maintained
in the room; but as soon as he had ended
and resumed his seat, the usual ease and freedom
prevailed.
The arrangement of the table was a matter of
but little concern to Mrs. Flanagan, and Csar
would have been sadly scandalized at witnessing
the informality with which various dishes, each
bearing a wonderful resemblance to the others,
were placed before so many gentlemen of
consideration
.
In taking their places at the board, the
strictest attention was paid to precedency; for
notwithstanding the freedom of manners which
prevailed in the corps, the points of military
etiquette
were at all times observed, with something
approaching to religious veneration. Most of the
guests had been fasting too long to be in any
degree
fastidious in their appetites, but the case was
different with Captain Lawton; he felt an
unaccountable
loathing at the exhibition of Betty's
food, and could not refrain from making a few
passing comments on the condition of the knives,
and the clouded colourings of the plates. The
good nature and personal affection of Betty for
the offender, restrained her for some time from
answering
to his innuendos, until Lawton, with a
yawn, ventured to admit a piece of the black meat
before him into his mouth, where, either from sated
appetite, or qualities inherent in the food, much
time was spent in vain efforts at mastication, when
he cried with some spleen
What kind of animal might this have been
when living, Mrs. Flanagan?
Sure, captain, and was'nt it the ould cow,
replied the suttler with an emotion, that
proceeded
partly from dissatisfaction at the complaints of
her favourite, and partly from grief at the loss of
the deceased.
What! roared the trooper, stopping short as
he was happily about to swallow his morsel,
ancient
Jenny!
The devil! cried another dropping his knife
and fork, she who made the campaign of the
Jerseys with us?
The very same, replied the mistress of the
hotel with a most piteous aspect of woe; sure
gentlemen 'tis awful to have to eat sitch an ould
frind.
And has she sunk to this, said Lawton
pointing
with his knife to the remnants on the table.
Nay, captain, said Betty with spirit, I sould
two of her quarters to some of your troop; but
divil the word did I tell the boys what an ould
frind it was they had bought, for fear it might
damage their appetites.
Fury! cried the trooper with affected anger,
I shall have my fellows as limber as supple-jacks
on such fare. Afraid of an Englishman as a
Virginia
negro is of his driver.
Well, said Lieutenant Mason, dropping his
knife and fork in a kind of despair, my jaws have
more sympathy than many men's hearts. They
absolutely decline making any impression on the
relics of their old acquaintance.
Try a drop of the gift, said Betty soothingly,
pouring a large allowance of the wine into a bowl,
and drinking it off as taster to the corps. Faith
'tis but a wishy-washy sort of stuff after all.
The ice once broken, however, a clear glass of
wine was handed to Dunwoodie, who, bowing to
his companions, drank the liquor in the midst of a
most profound silence. For a few glasses there
was much formality observed, and sundry patriotic
toasts and sentiments were duly noticed by the
company. The liquor, however, performed its
wonted office; and before the second sentinel at
their door had been relieved, all recollection of
the dinner and their cares were lost in the present
festivity. Dr. Sitgreaves had not returned in
season
to partake of Jenny, but had come in time to
receive his fair proportion of Captain Wharton's
present.
A songa song from Captain Lawton, cried
two or three of the party in a breath, on
observing
the failure of some of the points of good
fellowship in the trooper; silence for the song
of Captain Lawton.
Gentlemen, returned Lawton, his dark
eyes swimming with the bumper he had finished,
though his head was as impenetrable as a post,
I am not much of a nightingale, but under the
favour of your good wishes, I consent to comply
with the demand.
Now, Jack, said Sitgreaves, nodding on his
seat, remember the air I taught you, andstop,
I have a copy of the words in my pocket.
Forbearforbear, good doctor, said the
trooper, filling his glass with great deliberation,
I never could wheel round those hard names.
Gentlemen I will give you an humble attempt of
my own.
Silence for Captain Lawton's song, roared
five or six at once, when the trooper proceeded,
in a fine full tone, to sing the following words to a
well known bacchanalian air; several of his
comrades
helping him through the chorus with a
fervour
that shook the crazy edifice they were in:
Now push the mug, my jolly boys,
And live, while live we can,
To-morrow's sun may end your joys,
For brief's the hour of man.
And he who bravely meets the foe
His lease of life can never know.
Old mother Flanagan
Come and fill the can again,
For you can fill, and we can swill,
Good Betty Flanagan.
If love of life pervades your breast,
Or love of ease your frame,
Quit honor's path, for peaceful rest,
And bear a coward's name;
For soon and late, we danger know,
And fearless on the saddle go.
Old mother, &c.
When foreign foes invade the land,
And wives and sweethearts call:
In freedom's cause we'll bravely stand,
Or will as bravely fall
In this fair home the fates have given,
We'll live as lords, or live in heaven.
Old mother, &c.
At each appeal made to herself, by the united
voices of the choir, Betty invariably advanced
and complied literally with the request contained
in the chorus, to the infinite delight of the
singers
,
and perhaps with no small participation in the
satisfaction on her own account. The hostess was
provided with a beverage more suited to the
high seasoning she had accustomed her palate to,
than the tasteless present of Captain Wharton;
by which means Betty had managed, with
tolerable
facility, to keep even pace with the
exhileration
of her guests. The applause received by
Captain Lawton, was general with the exception
of the surgeon, who rose from the bench during
the first chorus, and paced the floor, in a fine
glow of classical indignation. The bravos and
bravissimo's drowned all other noises for a short
time, but as they gradually ceased, the doctor
turned to the musician, and exclaimed, with
manifest
heat
21*
Captain Lawton, I marvel that a
gentlemen
,
and a gallant officer, can find no other
subject for his muse, in these times of trial, than
in such beastly invocations to that notorious
follower
of the camp, the filthy Elizabeth Flanagan.
Methinks the Goddess of Liberty could furnish a
more noble inspiration, and the sufferings of your
country a more befitting theme.
Heyday! shouted the hostess, advancing
upon him in a most threatening attitude, and
who is it that calls me filthy? Master squirt
Master
pop-gun
Peace, said Dunwoodie, in a voice that
was exerted but a little more than common, but
which was succeeded by the stillness of death;
woman leave the room. Dr. Sitgreaves, I call
you to your seat, to wait the order of the revels.
Proceedproceed, said the surgeon,
drawing
himself up in an attitude of dignified
composure
,
I trust, Major Dunwoodie, I am not
unacquainted
with the rules of decorum, nor ignorant
of the by-laws of good fellowship. Betty made
a hasty but somewhat devious retreat to her own
dominions, being unaccustomed to dispute the
orders
of the commanding officer.
Major Dunwoodie will honour us with a
sentimental
song, said Lawton, bowing to his
leader
,
with the politeness of a gentleman, and the
collected manner he so well knew how to
assume
.
The Major hesitated a moment, and then sung,
with fine execution, the following words:
Some love the heats of southern suns,
Where life's warm current mad'ning runs,
In one quick circling stream;
But dearer far's the mellow light,
Which trembling shines, reflected bright
In Luna's milder beams.
Some love the tulip's gandier dyes,
Where deep'ning blue with yellow vies,
And gorgeous beauty glows;
But happier he, whose bridal wreathe,
By love entwined, is found to breathe
The sweetness of the rose.
The voice of Dunwoodie never lost its
authority
with his inferiors, and the applause which
followed
his song, though by no means so riotous as
that which succeeded the effort of the captain,
was much more flattering.
If, sir, said the doctor, after joining in the
plaudits of his companions, you would but learn
to unite classical allusions with your delicate
imagination
,
you would become a pretty amateur
poet.
He who criticizes ought to be able to
perform
,
said Dunwoodie with a smile; I call on
Dr. Sitgreaves for a specimen of the style he
admires
.
Dr. Sitgreave's songDr. Sitgreaves song,
echoed all at the table with delight: a classical
ode from Dr. Sitgreaves.
The surgeon made a complacent bow of
acquiescence
,
took the remnant of his glass, and gave
a few preliminary hems, that served hugely to
delight
three or four young cornets at the foot of the
table. He then commenced singing in a cracked
voice, and to any thing but a tune, the following
ditty
Hast thou ever felt love's dart, dearest,
Or breathed his trembling sigh
Thought him, afar, was ever nearest,
Before that sparkling eye.
Then hast thou known, what 'tis to feel
The pain that Galen could not heal.
Hurrah! shouted Lawton in a burst of
applause
,
Archibald eclipses the muses themselves;
his words flow like the sylvan stream by
moonlight
,
and his melody is a cross breed of the
nightingale and the owl.
Captain Lawton, cried the exasperated
operator
,
it is one thing to despise the lights of
classical
learning, and another to be despised for your
own ignorance.
A loud summons at the door of the building
created a dead halt in the uproar, and the
dragoons
instinctively caught up their arms, to be
prepared for any intruders. The door was opened,
and the skinners entered, dragging in the pedlar,
bending under the load of his pack.
Which is Captain Lawton? said the leader
of the gang; gazing around him in some little
astonishment
.
He waits your pleasure, said the trooper
drily, and with infinite composure.
Then here I deliver to your hands a
condemned
traitorthis is Harvey Birch, the
pedlar-spy
.
Lawton started as he looked his old
acquaintance
in the face, and turning to the skinner with
a lowering look, continued
And who are you, sir, that speak so freely of
your neighbours? bowing to Dunwoodie, but
your pardon, sir; here is the commanding officer,
to him you will please to address yourself.
No, said the man sullenly, it is to you I
deliver
the pedlar, and from you I claim my
reward
.
Are you Harvey Birch? said Dunwoodie,
advancing with an air of authority, that instantly
drove the skinner to a corner of the room.
I am, said Birch proudly.
And a traitor to your country, continued the
major with sternness; do you know that I should
be justified in ordering your execution this night?
'Tis not the will of God to send a soul so
hastily to his presence, said the pediar with
solemnity
.
You speak truth, said Dunwoodie; and a
few brief hours shall be added to your life; but as
your offence is most odious to a soldier, so it will
be sure to meet with the soldier's vengeance:
you die tomorrow.
'Tis as God wills, returned Harvey without
moving a muscle.
I have spent many a good hour to entrap the
villain, said the skinner, advancing a little from
his corner, and I hope you will give me a
certificate
that will entitle us to the reward; 'twas
promised to be paid in gold.
Major Dunwoodie, said the officer of the
day entering the room, the patroles report a
hourse to be burnt, near yesterday's battle ground.
'Twas the hut of the pedlar, muttered the
leader of the gang; we have not left him a shingle
for shelter; I should have burnt it months ago, but
I wanted his shed for a trap to catch the sly fox
in.
You seem a most ingenious patriot, said
Lawton with extreme gravity; Major
Dunwoodie
,
I second the request of this worthy
gentleman
,
and crave the office of bestowing the
reward
on him and his fellows.
Take it; cried the major, and you,
miserable
man, prepare for that fate which will
surely
await you before the setting of to-morrow's
sun.
Life offers but little to tempt me with, said
Harvey, slowly raising his eyes, and gazing wildly
at the strange faces in the apartment.
Come, worthy children of America, said
Lawton, follow, and receive your reward.
The gang eagerly accepted this invitation, and
followed the captain towards the quarters assigned
to his troop. Dunwoodie paused a moment, from
reluctance to triumph over a fallen foe, and
proceeded
with great solemnity
You have already been tried, Harvey Birch,
and the truth has proved you to be an enemy, too
dangerous to the liberties of America, to be
suffered
to live.
The truth! echoed the pedlar starting, and
raising himself proudly, in a manner that regarded
the weight of his pack as nothing.
Ay, the truthyou were charged with
loitering
near the continental army, to gain intelligence
of its movements, and by communicating it to the
enemy, to enable him to frustrate the intentions of
Washington.
Will Washington say so, think you? said
Birch with a ghastly smile.
Doubtless he wouldeven the justice of
Washington condemns you.
Nonono, cried the pedlar, in a voice,
and with a manner that startled Dunwoodie;
Washington can see beyond the hollow views of
pretended patriots. Has he not risked his all on
the cast of the die?if a gallows is ready for me,
was there not one for him also? nonono,
Washington would never say, `lead him to a
gallows
.'
Have you any thing, wretched man, to urge
to the commander in chief, why you should not
die? said the major, recovering from the surprise
created by the manner of the other.
Birch trembled with the violence of the
emotions
that were contending in his bosom; his face
assumed the ghastly paleness of death, and his
hand drew a box of tin from the folds of his shirt
he opened it, and its contents was a small piece of
paperhis eye was for an instant fixed on ithe
had already held it towards Dunwoodie, when
suddenly withdrawing his hand, he exclaimed
Noit dies with meI know the conditions
of my service, and will not purchase life with their
forfeitureit dies with me.
Deliver that paper, and you may possibly yet
find favour, said Dunwoodie eagerly; expecting a
discovery of importance to the cause.
It dies with me, repeated Birch, a flush
passing
over his pallid features, and lighting them
with extraordinary brilliancy.
Seize the traitor, cried the major hastily,
and wrest the secret from his hands.
The order was immediately obeyed; but the
movements of the pedlar were too quick for them;
in an instant he swallowed it. The officers paused
in astonishment, at the readiness and energy of
the spy; but the surgeon cried eagerly
Hold him, while I administer an emetic.
Forbear, said Dunwoodie, beckoning him
back with his hand; if his crime is great, so will
his punishment be heavy.
Lead on, cried the pedlar, dropping his pack
from his shoulders, and advancing towards the
door with a manner of incomprehensible dignity.
Whither? asked Dunwoodie in amazement.
To the gallows.
No, said the major, recoiling in horror at his
own justice. My duty requires that I order you
to be executed; but surely not so hastilytake
until nine to-morrow to prepare for the awful
change you are to undergo.
Dunwoodie whispered his orders in the ear of a
subaltern, and motioned to the pedlar to
withdraw
.
The interruption caused by this scene
prevented further enjoyment around the table,
and the officers dispersed to their several places
of rest. In a short time the only noise to be
heard was the heavy tread of the sentinel, as he
paced over the frozen ground, in front of the Hotel
Flanagan.
END OF THE FIRST VOLUME.